2
THE WIGWAM AND THE CABIN.
GRAYLING; OR, MURDER WILL OUT.
CHAPTER I.
The
world has become monstrous matter-of-fact in latter days.
We can no longer get a ghost story, either for love or money.
The materialists have it all their own way; and even the little
urchin, eight years old, instead of deferring with decent reverence
to the opinions of his grandmamma, now stands up stoutly for his
own. He believes in every ology but pneumatology. Faust
and the Old Woman of Berkeley move his derision only, and
he would laugh incredulously, if he dared, at the Witch of
Endor
.
The whole armoury of modern reasoning is on his side;
and, however he may admit at seasons that belief can scarcely
be counted a matter of will, he yet puts his veto on all sorts of
credulity. That cold-blooded demon called Science has taken
the place of all the other demons. He has certainly cast out
innumerable
devils, however he may still spare the principal.
Whether we are the better for his intervention is another
question
.
There is reason to apprehend that in disturbing our human
faith in shadows, we have lost some of those wholesome moral
restraints
which might have kept many of us virtuous, where the
laws could not.
The effect, however, is much the more seriously evil in all that
concerns the romantic. Our story-tellers are so resolute to deal
in the real, the actual only, that they venture on no subjects the
details of which are not equally vulgar and susceptible of proof.
With this end in view, indeed, they too commonly choose their
subjects among convicted felons, in order that they may avail
themselves
of the evidence which led to their conviction; and, to prove
more conclusively their devoted adherence to nature and the truth,
they depict the former not only in her condition of nakedness, but
long before she has found out the springs of running water. It
is to be feared that some of the coarseness of modern taste arises
from the too great lack of that veneration which belonged to,
and elevated to dignity, even the errors of preceding ages. A
love of the marvellous belongs, it appears to me, to all those who
love and cultivate either of the fine arts. I very much doubt
whether the poet, the painter, the sculptor, or the romancer, ever
yet lived, who had not some strong biasa leaning, at least,
to a belief in the wonders of the invisible world. Certainly, the
higher orders of poets and painters, those who create and invent,
must have a strong taint of the superstitious in their composition.
But this is digressive, and leads us from our purpose.
It is so long since we have been suffered to see or hear of a
ghost, that a visitation at this time may have the effect of novelty,
and I propose to narrate a story which I heard more than once in
my boyhood, from the lips of an aged relative, who succeeded, at
the time, in making me believe every word of it; perhaps, for the
simple reason that she convinced me she believed every word of
it herself. My grandmother was an old lady who had been a
resident
of the seat of most frequent war in Carolina during the
Revolution
.
She had fortunately survived the numberless atrocities
which she was yet compelled to witness; and, a keen observer,
with a strong memory, she had in store a thousand legends of that
stirring period, which served to beguile me from sleep many and
many a long winter night. The story which I propose to tell was
one of these; and when I say that she not only devoutly believed
it herself, but that it was believed by sundry of her
contemporaries
,
who were themselves privy to such of the circumstances as
could be known to third parties, the gravity with which I repeat
the legend will not be considered very astonishing.
The revolutionary war had but a little while been concluded.
The British had left the country; but peace did not imply repose.
The community was still in that state of ferment which was
natural
enough to passions, not yet at rest, which had been brought
into exercise and action during the protracted seven years'
struggle
through which the nation had just passed. The state was
overrun by idlers, adventurers, profligates, and criminals.
Disbanded
soldiers, half-starved and reckless, occupied the highways,
outlaws, emerging from their hiding-places, skulked about the
settlements with an equal sentiment of hate and fear in their
hearts;patriots were clamouring for justice upon the tories, and
sometimes anticipating its course by judgments of their own;
while the tories, those against whom the proofs were too strong
for denial or evasion, buckled on their armour for a renewal of
the struggle. Such being the condition of the country, it may
easily
be supposed that life and property lacked many of their
necessary
securities. Men generally travelled with weapons which
were displayed on the smallest provocation: and few who could
provide themselves with an escort ventured to travel any distance
without one.
There was, about this time, said my grandmother, and while
such was the condition of the country, a family of the name of
Grayling, that lived somewhere upon the skirts of Ninety-six
district. Old Grayling, the head of the family, was dead. He
was killed in Buford's massacre. His wife was a fine woman,
not so very old, who had an only son named James, and a little
girl, only five years of age, named Lucy. James was but
fourteen
when his father was killed, and that event made a man of
him. He went out with his rifle in company with Joel Sparkman,
who was his mother's brother, and joined himself to Pickens's
Brigade. Here he made as good a soldier as the best. He had
no sort of fear. He was always the first to go forward; and his
rifle was always good for his enemy's button at a long hundred
yards. He was in several fights both with the British and tories;
and just before the war was ended he had a famous brush with
the Cherokees, when Pickens took their country from them. But
though he had no fear, and never knew when to stop killing while
the fight was going on, he was the most bashful of boys that I ever
knew; and so kind-hearted that it was almost impossible to
believe
all we heard of his fierce doings when he was in battle.
But they were nevertheless quite true for all his bashfulness.
Well, when the war was over, Joel Sparkman, who lived with
his sister, Grayling, persuaded her that it would be better to move
down into the low country. I don't know what reason he had
for it, or what they proposed to do there. They had very little
property, but Sparkman was a knowing man, who could turn
his hand to a hundred things; and as he was a bachelor, and
loved his sister and her children just as if they had been his own,
it was natural that she should go with him wherever he wished.
James, too, who was restless by natureand the taste he had
enjoyed
of the wars had made him more sohe was full of it; and
so, one sunny morning in April, their wagon started for the city.
The wagon was only a small one, with two horses, scarcely
larger than those that are employed to carry chickens and fruit
to the market from the Wassamaws and thereabouts. It was
driven by a negro fellow named Clytus, and carried Mrs.
Grayling
and Lucy. James and his uncle loved the saddle too well
to shut themselves up in such a vehicle; and both of them were
mounted on fine horses which they had won from the enemy.
The saddle that James rode on,and he was very proud of it,
was one that he had taken at the battle of Cowpens from one of
Tarleton's own dragoons, after he had tumbled the owner. The
roads at that season were excessively bad, for the rains of March
had been frequent and heavy, the track was very much cut up, and
the red clay gullies of the hills of Ninety-six were so washed
that it required all shoulders, twenty times a day, to get the
wagon-wheels
out of the bog. This made them travel very slowly,
perhaps, not more than fifteen miles a day. Another cause
for slow travelling was, the necessity of great caution, and a
constant look-out for enemies both up and down the road. James
and his uncle took it by turns to ride a-head, precisely as they
did when scouting in war, but one of them always kept along
with the wagon. They had gone on this way for two days, and
saw nothing to trouble and alarm them. There were few
persons
on the high-road, and these seemed to the full as shy of them
as they probably were of strangers. But just as they were about
to camp, the evening of the second day, while they were splitting
light-wood, and getting out the kettles and the frying-pan, a
person
rode up and joined them without much ceremony. He was
a short thick-set man, somewhere between forty and fifty: had
on very coarse and common garments, though he rode a fine black
horse of remarkable strength and vigour. He was very civil of
speech, though he had but little to say, and that little showed him
to be a person without much education and with no refinement. He
begged permission to make one of the encampment, and his
manner
was very respectful and even humble; but there was
something
dark and sullen in his facehis eyes, which were of a light
gray colour, were very restless, and his nose turned up sharply,
and was very red. His forehead was excessively broad, and his
eyebrows thick and shaggywhite hairs being freely mingled
with the dark, both in them and upon his head. Mrs. Grayling
did not like this man's looks, and whispered her dislike to her
son; but James, who felt himself equal to any man, said,
promptly
What of that, mother! we can't turn the stranger off and say
`no;' and if he means any mischief, there's two of us, you know.
The man had no weaponsnone, at least, which were then
visible; and deported himself in so humble a manner, that the
prejudice which the party had formed against him when he first
appeared, if it was not dissipated while he remained, at least
failed to gain any increase. He was very quiet, did not mention
an unnecessary word, and seldom permitted his eyes to rest upon
those of any of the party, the females not excepted. This,
perhaps
,
was the only circumstance, that, in the mind of Mrs.
Grayling
,
tended to confirm the hostile impression which his coming
had originally occasioned. In a little while the temporary
encampment
was put in a state equally social and warlike. The
wagon was wheeled a little way into the woods, and off the road;
the horses fastened behind it in such a manner that any attempt
to steal them would be difficult of success, even were the watch
neglectful which was yet to be maintained upon them. Extra
guns, concealed in the straw at the bottom of the wagon, were kept
well loaded. In the foreground, and between the wagon and the
highway, a fire was soon blazing with a wild but cheerful gleam;
and the worthy dame, Mrs. Grayling, assisted by the little girl,
Lucy, lost no time in setting on the frying-pan, and cutting into
slices the haunch of bacon, which they had provided at leaving
home. James Grayling patrolled the woods, meanwhile for a
mile or two round the encampment, while his uncle, Joel
Sparkman
,
foot to foot with the stranger, seemedif the absence of all
care constitutes the supreme of human felicityto realize the
most perfect conception of mortal happiness. But Joel was very
far from being the careless person that he seemed. Like an old
soldier, he simply hung out false colours, and concealed his real
timidity by an extra show of confidence and courage. He did
not relish the stranger from the first, any more than his sister;
and having subjected him to a searching examination, such as
was considered, in those days of peril and suspicion, by no means
inconsistent with becoming courtesy, he came rapidly to the
conclusion
that he was no better than he should be.
You are a Scotchman, stranger, said Joel, suddenly
drawing
up his feet, and bending forward to the other with an eye
like that of a hawk stooping over a covey of partridges. It was a
wonder that he had not made the discovery before. The broad
dialect of the stranger was not to be subdued; but Joel made slow
stages and short progress in his mental journeyings. The answer
was given with evident hesitation, but it was affirmative.
Well, now, it's mighty strange that you should ha' fou't with
us and not agin us, responded Joel Sparkman. There was a
precious few of the Scotch, and none that I knows on, saving
yourself, perhaps,that didn't go dead agin us, and for the tories,
through thick and thin. That `Cross Creek settlement' was a
mighty ugly thorn in the sides of us whigs. It turned out a raal
bad stock of varmints. I hope,I reckon, stranger,you aint
from that part.
No, said the other; oh no! I'm from over the other
quarter. I'm from the Duncan settlement above.
I've hearn tell of that other settlement, but I never know'd
as any of the men fou't with us. What gineral did you fight
under? What Carolina gineral?
I was at Gum Swamp when General Gates was defeated;
was the still hesitating reply of the other.
Well, I thank God,
I
warn't there, though I reckon things
wouldn't ha' turned out quite so bad, if there had been a leetle
sprinkling of Sumter's, or Pickens's, or Marion's men, among them
two-legged critters that run that day. They did tell that some of
the regiments went off without ever once emptying their rifles.
Now, stranger, I hope you warn't among them fellows.
I was not, said the other with something more of
promptness
.
I don't blame a chap for dodging a bullet if he can, or being
too quick for a bagnet, because, I'm thinking, a live man is
always
a better man than a dead one, or he can become so; but to
run without taking a single crack at the inimy, is downright
cowardice
.
There's no two ways about it, stranger.
This opinion, delivered with considerable emphasis, met with
the ready assent of the Scotchman, but Joel Sparkman was not
to be diverted, even by his own eloquence, from the object of his
inquiry.
But you ain't said, he continued, who was your Carolina
gineral. Gates was from Virginny, and he stayed a mighty short
time when he come. You didn't run far at Camden, I reckon,
and you joined the army ag'in, and come in with Greene? Was
that the how?
To this the stranger assented, though with evident disinclination.
Then, mou'tbe, we sometimes went into the same scratch
together
?
I was at Cowpens and Ninety-Six, and seen sarvice at
other odds and eends, where there was more fighting than fun.
I reckon you must have been at `Ninety-Six,'perhaps at
Cowpens
,
too, if you went with Morgan?
The unwillingness of the stranger to respond to these questions
appeared to increase. He admitted, however, that he had been
at Ninety-Six, though, as Sparkman afterwards remembered,
in this case, as in that of the defeat of Gates at Gum Swamp, he
had not said on which side he had fought. Joel, as he discovered
the reluctance of his guest to answer his questions, and perceived
his growing doggedness, forbore to annoy him, but mentally
resolved
to keep a sharper look-out than ever upon his motions.
His examination concluded with an inquiry, which, in the
plain-dealing
regions of the south and south-west, is not unfrequently
put first.
And what mout be your name, stranger?
Macnab, was the ready response, Sandy Macnab.
Well, Mr. Macnab, I see that my sister's got supper ready
for us; so we mou't as well fall to upon the hoecake and bacon.
Sparkman rose while speaking, and led the way to the spot, near
the wagon, where Mrs. Grayling had spread the feast. We're
pretty nigh on to the main road, here, but I reckon there's no
great danger now. Besides, Jim Grayling keeps watch for us,
and he's got two as good eyes in his head as any scout in the
country, and a rifle that, after you once know how it shoots,
'twould do your heart good to hear its crack, if so be that twa'n't
your heart that he drawed sight on. He's a perdigious fine shot,
and as ready to shoot and fight as if he had a nateral calling that
way.
Shall we wait for him before we eat? demanded Macnab,
anxiously.
By no sort o' reason, stranger, answered Sparkman.
He'll watch for us while we're eating, and after that I'll change
shoes with him. So fall to, and don't mind what's a coming.
Sparkman had just broken the hoecake, when a distant whistle
was heard.
Ha! That's the lad now! he exclaimed, rising to his feet.
He's on trail. He's got a sight of an inimy's fire, I reckon.
'Twon't be onreasonable, friend Macnab, to get our we'pons in
readiness; and, so speaking, Sparkman bid his sister get into the
wagon, where the little Lucy had already placed herself, while
he threw open the pan of his rifle, and turned the priming over
with his finger. Macnab, meanwhile, had taken from his
holsters
,
which he had before been sitting upon, a pair of horseman's
pistols, richly mounted with figures in silver. These were large
and long, and had evidently seen service. Unlike his companion,
his proceedings occasioned no comment. What he did seemed a
matter of habit, of which he himself was scarcely conscious.
Having looked at his priming, he laid the instruments beside him
without a word, and resumed the bit of hoecake which he had
just before received from Sparkman. Meanwhile, the signal
whistle, supposed to come from James Grayling, was repeated.
Silence ensued then for a brief space, which Sparkman employed
in perambulating the grounds immediately contiguous. At length,
just as he had returned to the fire, the sound of a horse's feet
was heard, and a sharp quick halloo from Grayling informed his
uncle that all was right. The youth made his appearance a
moment after accompanied by a stranger on horseback; a tall,
fine-looking young man, with a keen flashing eye, and a voice
whose lively clear tones, as he was heard approaching, sounded
cheerily like those of a trumpet after victory. James Grayling
kept along on foot beside the new-comer; and his hearty laugh,
and free, glib, garrulous tones, betrayed to his uncle, long ere he
drew nigh enough to declare the fact, that he had met
unexpectedly
with a friend, or, at least, an old acquaintance.
Why, who have you got there, James? was the demand of
Sparkman, as he dropped the butt of his rifle upon the ground.
Why, who do you think, uncle? Who but Major Spencer
our own major?
You don't say so!what!well! Li'nel Spencer, for
sartin
!
Lord bless you, major, who'd ha' thought to see you in
these parts; and jest mounted too, for all natur, as if the war was
to be fou't over ag'in. Well, I'm raal glad to see you. I am,
that's sartin!
And I'm very glad to see you, Sparkman, said the other,
as he alighted from his steed, and yielded his hand to the cordial
grasp of the other.
Well, I knows that, major, without you saying it. But
you've jest come in the right time. The bacon's frying, and
here's the bread;let's down upon our haunches, in right good
airnest, camp fashion, and make the most of what God gives us
in the way of blessings. I reckon you don't mean to ride any
further to-night, major?
No, said the person addressed, not if you'll let me lay my
heels at your fire. But who's in your wagon? My old friend,
Mrs. Grayling, I suppose?
That's a true word, major, said the lady herself, making her
way out of the vehicle with good-humoured agility, and coming
forward with extended hand.
Really, Mrs. Grayling, I'm very glad to see you. And
the stranger, with the blandness of a gentleman and the hearty
warmth of an old neighbour, expressed his satisfaction at once
more finding himself in the company of an old acquaintance.
Their greetings once over, Major Spencer readily joined the
group about the fire, while James Graylingthough with some
reluctancedisappeared to resume his toils of the scout while the
supper proceeded.
And who have you here? demanded Spencer, as his eye
rested on the dark, hard features of the Scotchman. Sparkman
told him all that he himself had learned of the name and
character
of the stranger, in a brief whisper, and in a moment after
formally introduced the parties in this fashion
Mr. Macnab, Major Spencer. Mr. Macnab says he's true
blue, major, and fou't at Camden, when General Gates run so
hard to `bring the dd militia back.' He also fou't at
Ninety-Six
,
and Cowpensso I reckon we had as good as count him one
of us.
Major Spencer scrutinized the Scotchman keenlya scrutiny
which the latter seemed very ill to relish. He put a few
questions
to him on the subject of the war, and some of the actions in
which he allowed himself to have been concerned; but his
evident
reluctance to unfold himselfa reluctance so unnatural to
the brave soldier who has gone through his toils honourablyhad
the natural effect of discouraging the young officer, whose sense
of delicacy had not been materially impaired amid the rude
jostlings
of military life. But, though he forbore to propose any
other questions to Macnab, his eyes continued to survey the
features
of his sullen countenance with curiosity and a strangely
increasing interest. This he subsequently explained to
Sparkman
,
when, at the close of supper, James Grayling came in, and
the former assumed the duties of the scout.
I have seen that Scotchman's face somewhere, Sparkman,
and I'm convinced at some interesting moment; but where, when,
or how, I cannot call to mind. The sight of it is even associated
in my mind with something painful and unpleasant; where could
I have seen him?
I don't somehow like his looks myself, said Sparkman, and
I mislists he's been rether more of a tory than a whig; but that's
nothing to the purpose now; and he's at our fire, and we've
broken hoecake together; so we cannot rake up the old ashes to
make a dust with.
No, surely not, was the reply of Spencer. Even though
we knew him to be a tory, that cause of former quarrel should
occasion none now. But it should produce watchfulness and
caution. I'm glad to see that you have not forgot your old
business
of scouting in the swamp.
Kin I forget it, major? demanded Sparkman, in tones which,
though whispered, were full of emphasis, as he laid his ear to the
earth to listen.
James has finished supper, majorthat's his whistle to tell
me so; and I'll jest step back to make it cl'ar to him how we're
to keep up the watch to-night.
Count me in your arrangements, Sparkman, as I am one of
you for the night, said the major.
By no sort of means, was the reply. The night must be
shared between James and myself. Ef so be you wants to keep
company with one or t'other of us, why, that's another thing, and,
of course, you can do as you please.
We'll have no quarrel on the subject, Joel, said the officer,
good-naturedly, as they returned to the camp together.
CHAPTER II.
The
arrangements of the party were soon made. Spencer
renewed
his offer at the fire to take his part in the watch; and the
Scotchman, Macnab, volunteered his services also; but the offer
of the latter was another reason why that of the former should be
declined. Sparkman was resolute to have everything his own
way; and while James Grayling went out upon his lonely rounds,
he busied himself in cutting bushes and making a sort of tent for
the use of his late commander. Mrs. Grayling and Lucy slept
in a wagon. The Scotchman stretched himself with little effort
before the fire; while Joel Sparkman, wrapping himself up in his
cloak, crouched under the wagon body, with his back resting
partly against one of the wheels. From time to time he rose and
thrust additional brands into the fire, looked up at the night, and
round upon the little encampment, then sunk back to his perch
and stole a few moments, at intervals, of uneasy sleep. The
first two hours of the watch were over, and James Grayling was
relieved. The youth, however, felt in no mood for sleep, and
taking his seat by the fire, he drew from his pocket a little
volume
of Easy Reading Lessons, and by the fitful flame of the
resinous
light-wood, he prepared, in this rude manner, to make up
for the precious time which his youth had lost of its legitimate
employments, in the stirring events of the preceding seven years
consumed in war. He was surprised at this employment by his
late commander, who, himself sleepless, now emerged from the
bushes and joined Grayling at the fire. The youth had been
rather
a favourite with Spencer. They had both been reared in the
same neighbourhood, and the first military achievements of James
had taken place under the eye, and had met the approbation of
his officer. The difference of their ages was just such as to
permit
of the warm attachment of the lad without diminishing any
of the reverence which should be felt by the inferior. Grayling
was not more than seventeen, and Spencer was perhaps
thirty-four
the
very prime of manhood. They sat by the fire and
talked of old times and told old stories with the hearty glee and
good-nature of the young. Their mutual inquiries led to the
revelation
of their several objects in pursuing the present journey.
Those of James Grayling were scarcely, indeed, to be considered
his own. They were plans and purposes of his uncle, and it
does not concern this narrative that we should know more of their
nature than has already been revealed. But, whatever they were,
they were as freely unfolded to his hearer as if the parties had
been brothers, and Spencer was quite as frank in his revelations
as his companion. He, too, was on his way to Charleston, from
whence he was to take passage for England.
I am rather in a hurry to reach town, he said, as I learn
that the Falmouth packet is preparing to sail for England in a
few days, and I must go in her.'
For England, major! exclaimed the youth with unaffected
astonishment.
Yes, James, for England. But whywhat astonishes you?
Why, lord! exclaimed the simple youth, if they only knew
there, as I do, what a cutting and slashing you did use to make
among their red coats, I reckon they'd hang you to the first
hickory.
Oh, no! scarcely, said the other, with a smile.
But I reckon you'll change your name, major? continued
the youth.
No, responded Spencer, if I did that, I should lose the
object
of my voyage. You must know, James, that an old
relative
has left me a good deal of money in England, and I can only
get it by proving that I am Lionel Spencer; so you see I must
carry my own name, whatever may be the risk.
Well, major, you know best; but I do think if they could
only have a guess of what you did among their sodgers at
Hobkirk's
and Cowpens, and Eutaw, and a dozen other places, they'd
find some means of hanging you up, peace or no peace. But I
don't see what occasion you have to be going cl'ar away to
England
for money, when you've got a sight of your own already.
Not so much as you think for, replied the major, giving an
involuntary and uneasy glance at the Scotchman, who was
seemingly
sound asleep on the opposite side of the fire. There is,
you know, but little money in the country at any time, and I must
get what I want for my expenses when I reach Charleston. I
have just enough to carry me there.
Well, now, major, that's mighty strange. I always thought
that you was about the best off of any man in our parts; but if
you're strained so close, I'm thinking, major,if so be you
wouldn't think me too presumptuous,you'd better let me lend
you a guinea or so that I've got to spare, and you can pay me
back when you get the English money.
And the youth fumbled in his bosom for a little cotton wallet,
which, with its limited contents, was displayed in another instant
to the eyes of the officer.
No, no, James, said the other, putting back the generous
tribute; I have quite enough to carry me to Charleston, and
when there I can easily get a supply from the merchants. But I
thank you, my good fellow, for your offer. You
are
a good
fellow
,
James, and I will remember you.
It is needless to pursue the conversation farther. The night
passed away without any alarms, and at dawn of the next day
the whole party was engaged in making preparation for a start.
Mrs. Grayling was soon busy in getting breakfast in readiness.
Major Spencer consented to remain with them until it was over;
but the Scotchman, after returning thanks very civilly for his
accommodation
of the night, at once resumed his journey. His
course seemed, like their own, to lie below; but he neither
declared
his route nor betrayed the least desire to know that of
Spencer. The latter had no disposition to renew those inquiries
from which the stranger seemed to shrink the night before, and
he accordingly suffered him to depart with a quiet farewell, and
the utterance of a good-natured wish, in which all the parties
joined, that he might have a pleasant journey. When he was
fairly out of sight, Spencer said to Sparkman,
Had I liked that fellow's looks, nay, had I not positively
disliked
them, I should have gone with him. As it is, I will remain
and share your breakfast.
The repast being over, all parties set forward; but Spencer,
after keeping along with them for a mile, took his leave also.
The slow wagon-pace at which the family travelled, did not suit
the high-spirited cavalier; and it was necessary, as he assured
them, that he should reach the city in two nights more. They
parted with many regrets, as truly felt as they were warmly
expressed
;
and James Grayling never felt the tedium of wagon
travelling to be so severe as throughout the whole of that day
when he separated from his favourite captain. But he was too
stout-hearted a lad to make any complaint; and his
dissatisfaction
only showed itself in his unwonted silence, and an
over-anxiety
,
which his steed seemed to feel in common with himself, to
go rapidly ahead. Thus the day passed and the wayfarers at
its close had made a progress of some twenty miles from sun to
sun. The same precautions marked their encampment this night
as the last, and they rose in better spirits with the next morning,
the dawn of which was very bright and pleasant, and
encouraging
.
A similar journey of twenty miles brought them to the place
of bivouac as the sun went down; and they prepared as usual
for their securities and supper. They found themselves on the
edge of a very dense forest of pines and scrubby oaks, a portion
of which was swallowed up in a deep bayso called in the
dialect
of the countrya swamp-bottom, the growth of which
consisted
of mingled cypresses and bay-trees, with tupola, gum, and
dense thickets of low stunted shrubbery, cane grass, and dwarf
willows, which filled up every interval between the trees, and to
the eye most effectually barred out every human intruder. This
bay was chosen as the background for the camping party. Their
wagon was wheeled into an area on a gently rising ground in
front, under a pleasant shade of oaks and hickories, with a lonely
pine rising loftily in occasional spots among them. Here the
horses were taken out, and James Grayling prepared to kindle
up a fire; but, looking for his axe, it was unaccountably missing,
and after a fruitless search of half an hour, the party came to
the conclusion that it had been left on the spot where they had
slept last night. This was a disaster, and, while they meditated
in what manner to repair it, a negro boy appeared in sight,
passing
along the road at their feet, and driving before him a small
herd of cattle. From him they learned that they were only a
mile or two from a farmstead where an axe might be borrowed;
and James, leaping on his horse, rode forward in the hope to obtain
one. He found no difficulty in his quest; and, having obtained
it from the farmer, who was also a tavern-keeper, he casually
asked if Major Spencer had not stayed with him the night before.
He was somewhat surprised when told that he had not.
There was one man stayed with me last night, said the
farmer
,
but he didn't call himself a major, and didn't much look
like one.
He rode a fine sorrel horse,tall, bright colour, with white
fore foot, didn't he? asked James.
No, that he didn't! He rode a powerful black, coal black,
and not a bit of white about him.
That was the Scotchman! But I wonder the major didn't
stop with you. He must have rode on. Isn't there another
house near you, below?
Not one. There's ne'er a house either above or below for a
matter of fifteen miles. I'm the only man in all that distance
that's living on this road; and I don't think your friend could
have gone below, as I should have seen him pass. I've been all
day out there in that field before your eyes, clearing up the brush.
3
CHAPTER III.
Somewhat
wondering that the major should have turned aside
from the track, though without attaching to it any importance at
that particular moment, James Grayling took up the borrowed
axe and hurried back to the encampment, where the toil of
cutting
an extra supply of light-wood to meet the exigencies of the
ensuing night, sufficiently exercised his mind as well as his body,
to prevent him from meditating upon the seeming strangeness of
the circumstance. But when he sat down to his supper over the
fire that he had kindled, his fancies crowded thickly upon him,
and he felt a confused doubt and suspicion that something was to
happen, he knew not what. His conjectures and apprehensions
were without form, though not altogether void; and he felt a
strange sickness and a sinking at the heart which was very
unusual
with him. He had, in short, that lowness of spirits, that
cloudy apprehensiveness of soul which takes the form of
presentiment
,
and makes us look out for danger even when the skies are
without a cloud, and the breeze is laden, equally and only, with
balm and music. His moodiness found no sympathy among his
companions. Joel Sparkman was in the best of humours, and his
mother was so cheery and happy, that when the thoughtful boy
went off into the woods to watch, he could hear her at every
moment
breaking out into little catches of a country ditty, which the
gloomy events of the late war had not yet obliterated from her
memory.
It's very strange! soliloquized the youth, as he wandered
along the edges of the dense bay or swamp-bottom, which we
have passingly referred to,it's very strange what troubles me
so! I feel almost frightened, and yet I know I'm not to be
frightened
easily, and I don't see anything in the woods to frighten me.
It's strange the major didn't come along this road! Maybe he
took another higher up that leads by a different settlement. I
wish I had asked the man at the house if there's such another
road. I reckon there must be, however, for where could the
major
have gone?
The unphilosophical mind of James Grayling did not, in his
farther meditations, carry him much beyond this starting point;
and with its continual recurrence in soliloquy, he proceeded to
traverse the margin of the bay, until he came to its junction with,
and termination at, the high-road. The youth turned into this,
and, involuntarily departing from it a moment after, soon found
himself on the opposite side of the bay thicket. He wandered on
and on, as he himself described it, without any power to restrain
himself. He knew not how far he went; but, instead of
maintaining
his watch for two hours only, he was gone more than four;
and, at length, a sense of weariness which overpowered him all
of a sudden, caused him to seat himself at the foot of a tree, and
snatch a few moments of rest. He denied that he slept in this
time. He insisted to the last moment of his life that sleep never
visited his eyelids that night,that he was conscious of fatigue
and exhaustion, but not drowsiness,and that this fatigue was so
numbing as to be painful, and effectually kept him from any sleep.
While he sat thus beneath the tree, with a body weak and
nerveless
,
but a mind excited, he knew not how or why, to the most
acute degree of expectation and attention, he heard his name
called by the well-known voice of his friend, Major Spencer.
The voice called him three times,James Grayling!James!
James Grayling! before he could muster strength enough to
answer. It was not courage he wanted,of that he was positive,
for he felt sure, as he said, that something had gone wrong, and
he was never more ready to fight in his life than at that moment,
could he have commanded the physical capacity; but his throat
seemed dry to suffocation,his lips effectually sealed up as if
with wax, and when he did answer, the sounds seemed as fine
and soft as the whisper of some child just born.
Oh! major, is it you?
Such, he thinks, were the very words he made use of in reply;
and the answer that he received was instantaneous, though the
voice came from some little distance in the bay, and his own
voice he did not hear. He only knows what he meant to say.
The answer was to this effect.
It is, James!It is your own friend, Lionel Spencer, that
speaks to you; do not be alarmed when you see me! I have
been shockingly murdered!
James asserts that he tried to tell him that he would not be
frightened, but his own voice was still a whisper, which he
himself
could scarcely hear. A moment after he had spoken, he
heard something like a sudden breeze that rustled through the
bay bushes at his feet, and his eyes were closed without his effort,
and indeed in spite of himself. When he opened them, he saw
Major Spencer standing at the edge of the bay, about twenty
steps from him. Though he stood in the shade of a thicket, and
there was no light in the heavens save that of the stars, he was
yet enabled to distinguish perfectly, and with great ease, every
lineament of his friend's face.
He looked very pale, and his garments were covered with
blood; and James said that he strove very much to rise from the
place where he sat and approach him;for, in truth, said the
lad, so far from feeling any fear, I felt nothing but fury in my
heart; but I could not move a limb. My feet were fastened to
the ground; my hands to my sides; and I could only bend
forward
and gasp. I felt as if I should have died with vexation
that I could not rise; but a power which I could not resist, made
me motionless, and almost speechless. I could only say, `
Murdered
!'and
that one word I believe I must have repeated a
dozen times.
`Yes, murdered!murdered by the Scotchman who slept
with us at your fire the night before last. James, I look to you
to have the murderer brought to justice! James!do you hear
me, James?'
These, said James, I think were the very words, or near
about the very words, that I heard; and I tried to ask the major
to tell me how it was, and how I could do what he required; but
I didn't hear myself speak, though it would appear that he did,
for almost immediately after I had tried to speak what I wished
to say, he answered me just as if I had said it. He told me that
the Scotchman had waylaid, killed, and hidden him in that very
bay; that his murderer had gone to Charleston; and that if I
made haste to town, I would find him in the Falmouth packet,
which was then lying in the harbour and ready to sail for
England
.
He farther said that everything depended on my making
haste,that I must reach town by to-morrow night if I wanted to
be in season, and go right on board the vessel and charge the
criminal with the deed. `Do not be afraid,' said he, when he
had finished; `be afraid of nothing, James, for God will help and
strengthen you to the end.' When I heard all I burst into a flood
of tears, and then I felt strong. I felt that I could talk, or fight,
or do almost anything; and I jumped up to my feet, and was just
about to run down to where the major stood, but, with the first
step which I made forward, he was gone. I stopped and looked
all around me, but I could see nothing; and the bay was just as
black as midnight. But I went down to it, and tried to press in
where I thought the major had been standing; but I couldn't get
far, the brush and bay bushes were so close and thick. I was
now bold and strong enough, and I called out, loud enough to be
heard half a mile. I didn't exactly know what I called for, or
what I wanted to learn, or I have forgotten. But I heard nothing
more. Then I remembered the camp, and began to fear that
something might have happened to mother and uncle, for I now
felt, what I had not thought of before, that I had gone too far
round the bay to be of much assistance, or, indeed, to be in time for
any, had they been suddenly attacked. Besides, I could not think
how long I had been gone; but it now seemed very late. The
stars were shining their brightest, and the thin white clouds of
morning were beginning to rise and run towards the west. Well,
I bethought me of my course,for I was a little bewildered and
doubtful where I was; but, after a little thinking, I took the back
track, and soon got a glimpse of the camp-fire, which was nearly
burnt down; and by this I reckoned I was gone considerably
longer than my two hours. When I got back into the camp, I
looked under the wagon, and found uncle in a sweet sleep, and
though my heart was full almost to bursting with what I had
heard, and the cruel sight I had seen, yet I wouldn't waken him;
and I beat about and mended the fire, and watched, and
waited
,
until near daylight, when mother called to me out of the
wagon, and asked who it was. This wakened my uncle, and
then I up and told all that had happened, for if it had been to
save my life, I couldn't have kept it in much longer. But though
mother said it was very strange, Uncle Sparkman considered that
I had been only dreaming; but he couldn't persuade me of it;
and when I told him I intended to be off at daylight, just as the
major had told me to do, and ride my best all the way to
Charleston
,
he laughed, and said I was a fool. But I felt that I was no
fool, and I was solemn certain that I hadn't been dreaming; and
though both mother and he tried their hardest to make me put off
going, yet I made up my mind to it, and they had to give up.
For, wouldn't I have been a pretty sort of a friend to the major,
if, after what he told me, I could have stayed behind, and gone on
only at a wagon-pace to look after the murderer! I dont think
if I had done so that I should ever have been able to look a white
man in the face again. Soon as the peep of day, I was on
horse-back
.
Mother was mighty sad, and begged me not to go, but
Uncle Sparkman was mighty sulky, and kept calling me fool
upon fool, until I was almost angry enough to forget that we were
of blood kin. But all his talking did not stop me, and I reckon I
was five miles on my way before he had his team in traces for a
start. I rode as briskly as I could get on without hurting my
nag. I had a smart ride of more than forty miles before me, and
the road was very heavy. But it was a good two hours from
sunset when I got into town, and the first question I asked of
the people I met was, to show me where the ships were kept.
When I got to the wharf they showed me the Falmouth packet,
where she lay in the stream, ready to sail as soon as the wind
should favour.
CHAPTER IV.
James Grayling,
with the same eager impatience which he has
been suffered to describe in his own language, had already hired
a boat to go on board the British packet, when he remembered
that he had neglected all those means, legal and otherwise, by
which alone his purpose might be properly effected. He did not
know much about legal process, but he had common sense enough,
the moment that he began to reflect on the subject, to know that
some such process was necessary. This conviction produced
another
difficulty; he knew not in which quarter to turn for
counsel
and assistance; but here the boatman who saw his
bewilderment
,
and knew by his dialect and dress that he was a
back-countryman
,
came to his relief, and from him he got directions where
to find the merchants with whom his uncle, Sparkman, had done
business in former years. To them he went, and without
circumlocution
,
told the whole story of his ghostly visitation. Even as
a dream, which these gentlemen at once conjectured it to be, the
story of James Grayling was equally clear and curious; and his
intense warmth and the entire absorption, which the subject had
effected, of his mind and soul, was such that they judged it not
improper, at least to carry out the search of the vessel which he
contemplated. It would certainly, they thought, be a curious
coincidence
believing
James to be a veracious youthif the
Scotchman
should be found on board. But another test of his narrative
was proposed by one of the firm. It so happened that the
business
agents of Major Spencer, who was well known in Charleston,
kept their office but a few rods distant from their own; and to
them all parties at once proceeded. But here the story of James
was encountered by a circumstance that made somewhat against
it. These gentlemen produced a letter from Major Spencer,
intimating
the utter impossibility of his coming to town for the space
of a month, and expressing his regret that he should be unable to
avail himself of the opportunity of the foreign vessel, of whose
arrival
in Charleston, and proposed time of departure, they had
themselves advised him. They read the letter aloud to James
and their brother merchants, and with difficulty suppressed their
smiles at the gravity with which the former related and insisted
upon the particulars of his vision.
He has changed his mind, returned the impetuous youth;
he was on his way down, I tell you,a hundred miles on his
way,when he camped with us. I know him well, I tell you,
and talked with him myself half the night.
At least, remarked the gentlemen who had gone with James,
it can do no harm to look into the business. We can procure a
warrant for searching the vessel after this man, Macnab; and
should he be found on board the packet, it will be a sufficient
circumstance
to justify the magistrates in detaining him, until we
can ascertain where Major Spencer really is.
The measure was accordingly adopted, and it was nearly
sunset
before the warrant was procured, and the proper officer in
readiness. The impatience of a spirit so eager and so devoted as
James Grayling, under these delays, may be imagined; and
when in the boat, and on his way to the packet where the
criminal
was to be sought, his blood became so excited that it was with
much ado he could be kept in his seat. His quick, eager action
continually disturbed the trim of the boat, and one of his
mercantile
friends, who had accompanied him, with that interest in the
affair which curiosity alone inspired, was under constant
apprehension
lest he would plunge overboard in his impatient desire to
shorten the space which lay between. The same impatience
enabled
the youth, though never on shipboard before, to grasp the
rope which had been flung at their approach, and to mount her
sides with catlike agility. Without waiting to declare himself or
his purpose, he ran from one side of the deck to the other, greedily
staring, to the surprise of officers, passengers, and seamen, in the
faces of all of them, and surveying them with an almost offensive
scrutiny. He turned away from the search with disappointment.
There was no face like that of the suspected man among them.
By this time, his friend, the merchant, with the sheriff's officer,
had entered the vessel, and were in conference with the captain.
Grayling drew nigh in time to hear the latter affirm that there
was no man of the name of Macnab, as stated in the warrant,
among his passengers or crew.
He ishe must be! exclaimed the impetuous youth. The
major never lied in his life, and couldn't lie after he was dead.
Macnab is herehe is a Scotchman
The captain interrupted him
We have, young gentleman, several Scotchmen on board, and
one of them is named Macleod
Let me see himwhich is he? demanded the youth.
By this time, the passengers and a goodly portion of the crew
were collected about the little party. The captain turned his
eyes upon the group, and asked,
Where is Mr. Macleod?
He is gone belowhe's sick! replied one of the passengers.
That's he! That must be the man! exclaimed the youth.
I'll lay my life that's no other than Macnab. He's only taken
a false name.
It was now remembered by one of the passengers, and remarked,
that Macleod had expressed himself as unwell, but a few moments
before, and had gone below even while the boat was rapidly
approaching
the vessel. At this statement, the captain led the way
into the cabin, closely followed by James Grayling and the rest.
Mr. Macleod, he said with a voice somewhat elevated, as
he approached the berth of that person, you are wanted on deck
for a few moments.
I am really too unwell, captain, replied a feeble voice from
behind the curtain of the berth.
It will be necessary, was the reply of the captain. There
is a warrant from the authorities of the town, to look after a
fugitive
from justice.
Macleod had already begun a second speech declaring his
feebleness
,
when the fearless youth, Grayling, bounded before the
captain and tore away, with a single grasp of his hand, the
curtain
which concealed the suspected man from their sight.
It is he! was the instant exclamation of the youth, as he
beheld
him. It is heMacnab, the Scotchmanthe man that
murdered Major Spencer!
Macnab,for it was he,was deadly pale. He trembled like
an aspen. His eyes were dilated with more than mortal
apprehension
,
and his lips were perfectly livid. Still, he found strength
to speak, and to deny the accusation. He knew nothing of the
youth before himnothing of Major Spencerhis name was
Macleod, and he had never called himself by any other. He
denied
,
but with great incoherence, everything which was urged
against him.
You must get up, Mr. Macleod, said the captain; the
circumstances
are very much against you. You must go with the
officer!
Will you give me up to my enemies? demanded the culprit.
You are a countrymana Briton. I have fought for the king,
our master, against these rebels, and for this they seek my life.
Do not deliver me into their bloody hands!
Liar! exclaimed James GraylingDidn't you tell us at
our own camp-fire that you were with us? that you were at
Gates's defeat, and Ninety-Six?
But I didn't tell you, said the Scotchman, with a grin,
which side I was on!
Ha! remember that! said the sheriff's officer. He denied,
just a moment ago, that he knew this young man at all; now, he
confesses that he did see and camp with him.
The Scotchman was aghast at the strong point which, in his
inadvertence, he had made against himself; and his efforts to
excuse
himself, stammering and contradictory, served only to
involve
him more deeply in the meshes of his difficulty. Still he
continued his urgent appeals to the captain of the vessel, and his
fellow-passengers, as citizens of the same country, subjects to the
same monarch, to protect him from those who equally hated and
would destroy them all. In order to move their national
prejudices
in his behalf, he boasted of the immense injury which he had
done, as a tory, to the rebel cause; and still insisted that the
murder was only a pretext of the youth before him, by which to
gain possession of his person, and wreak upon him the revenge
which his own fierce performances during the war had naturally
enough provoked. One or two of the passengers, indeed, joined
with him in entreating the captain to set the accusers adrift and
make sail at once; but the stout Englishman who was in
command
,
rejected instantly the unworthy counsel. Besides, he was
better aware of the dangers which would follow any such rash
proceeding. Fort Moultrie, on Sullivan's Island, had been
already
refitted and prepared for an enemy; and he was lying, at
that moment, under the formidable range of grinning teeth, which
would have opened upon him, at the first movement, from the jaws
of Castle Pinckney.
No, gentlemen, said he, you mistake your man. God
forbid that I should give shelter to a murderer, though he were
from my own parish.
But I am no murderer, said the Scotchman.
You look cursedly like one, however, was the reply of the
captain. Sheriff, take your prisoner.
The base creature threw himself at the feet of the Englishman,
and clung, with piteous entreaties, to his knees. The latter shook
him off, and turned away in disgust.
Steward, he cried, bring up this man's luggage.
He was obeyed. The luggage was brought up from the cabin
and delivered to the sheriff's officer, by whom it was examined in
the presence of all, and an inventory made of its contents. It
consisted of a small new trunk, which, it afterwards appeared, he
had bought in Charleston, soon after his arrival. This contained
a few changes of raiment, twenty-six guineas in money, a gold
watch, not in repair, and the two pistols which he had shown while
at Joel Sparkman's camp fire; but, with this difference, that the
stock of one was broken off short just above the grasp, and the
butt was entirely gone. It was not found among his chattels. A
careful examination of the articles in his trunk did not result in
anything calculated to strengthen the charge of his criminality;
but there was not a single person present who did not feel as
morally
certain of his guilt as if the jury had already declared the
fact. That night he sleptif he slept at allin the common jail
of the city.
CHAPTER V.
His
accuser, the warm-hearted and resolute James Grayling,
did not sleep. The excitement, arising from mingling and
contradictory
emotions,sorrow for his brave young commander's
fate, and the natural exultation of a generous spirit at the
consciousness
of having performed, with signal success, an arduous
and painful task combined to drive all pleasant slumbers from his
eyes; and with the dawn he was again up and stirring, with his
mind still full of the awful business in which he had been
engaged
.
We do not care to pursue his course in the ordinary walks
of the city, nor account for his employments during the few days
which ensued, until, in consequence of a legal examination into
the circumstances which anticipated the regular work of the
sessions
,
the extreme excitement of the young accuser had been
renewed
.
Macnab or Macleod,and it is possible that both names
were fictitious,as soon as he recovered from his first terrors,
sought the aid of an attorneyone of those acute, small,
chopping
lawyers, to be found in almost every community, who are
willing to serve with equal zeal the sinner and the saint,
provided
that they can pay with equal liberality. The prisoner was
brought before the court under
habeas corpus,
and several grounds
submitted by his counsel with the view to obtaining his discharge.
It became necessary to ascertain, among the first duties of the
state, whether Major Spencer, the alleged victim, was really
dead. Until it could be established that a man should be
imprisoned
,
tried, and punished for a crime, it was first necessary
to show that a crime had been committed, and the attorney made
himself exceedingly merry with the ghost story of young
Grayling
.
In those days, however, the ancient Superstition was not
so feeble as she has subsequently become. The venerable judge
was one of those good men who had a decent respect for the faith
and opinions of his ancestors; and though he certainly would not
have consented to the hanging of Macleod under the sort of
testimony
which had been adduced, he yet saw enough, in all the
circumstances
,
to justify his present detention. In the meantime,
efforts were to be made, to ascertain the whereabouts of Major
Spencer
;
though, were he even missing,so the counsel for Macleod
contended,his death could be by no means assumed in
consequence
.
To this the judge shook his head doubtfully.  'Fore
God! said he, I would not have you to be too sure of that.
He was an Irishman, and proceeded after the fashion of his
country
.
The reader will therefore
bear
with his
bull
. A man may
properly be hung for murdering another, though the murdered
man be not dead; ay, before God, even though he be actually
unhurt and uninjured, while the murderer is swinging by the
neck for the bloody deed!
The judge,who it must be understood was a real existence,
and who had no small reputation in his day in the south,
proceeded
to establish the correctness of his opinions by authorities
and argument, with all of which, doubtlessly, the bar were
exceedingly
delighted; but, to provide them in this place would
only be to interfere with our own progress. James Grayling,
however, was not satisfied to wait the slow processes which were
suggested for coming at the truth. Even the wisdom of the judge
was lost upon him, possibly, for the simple reason that he did not
comprehend it. But the ridicule of the culprit's lawyer stung
him to the quick, and he muttered to himself, more than once,
a determination to lick the life out of that impudent chap's
leather. But this was not his only resolve. There was one
which he proceeded to put into instant execution, and that was to
seek the body of his murdered friend in the spot where he fancied
it might be foundnamely, the dark and dismal bay where the
spectre had made its appearance to his eyes.
The suggestion was approvedthough he did not need this to
prompt his resolutionby his mother and uncle, Sparkman. The
latter determined to be his companion, and he was farther
accompanied
by the sheriff's officer who had arrested the suspected
felon
.
Before daylight, on the morning after the examination before
the judge had taken place, and when Macleod had been
remanded
to prison, James Grayling started on his journey. His fiery
zeal received additional force at every added moment of delay, and
his eager spurring brought him at an early hour after noon, to the
neighbourhood of the spot through which his search was to be
made. When his companions and himself drew nigh, they were
all at a loss in which direction first to proceed. The bay was
one of those massed forests, whose wall of thorns, vines, and close
tenacious shrubs, seemed to defy invasion. To the eye of the
townsman it was so forbidding that he pronounced it absolutely
impenetrable. But James was not to be baffled. He led them
round it, taking the very course which he had pursued the night
when the revelation was made him; he showed them the very
tree at whose foot he had sunk when the supernatural torporas
he himself esteemed itbegan to fall upon him; he then pointed
out the spot, some twenty steps distant, at which the spectre made
his appearance. To this spot they then proceeded in a body, and
essayed an entrance, but were so discouraged by the difficulties
at the outset that all, James not excepted, concluded that neither
the murderer nor his victim could possibly have found entrance
there.
But, lo! a marvel! Such it seemed, at the first blush, to all the
party. While they stood confounded and indecisive,
undetermined
in which way to move, a sudden flight of wings was heard, even
from the centre of the bay, at a little distance above the spot
where they had striven for entrance. They looked up, and
beheld
about fifty buzzardsthose notorious domestic vultures of
the southascending from the interior of the bay, and perching
along upon the branches of the loftier trees by which it was
overhung
.
Even were the character of these birds less known, the
particular business in which they had just then been engaged, was
betrayed by huge gobbets of flesh which some of them had borne
aloft in their flight, and still continued to rend with beak and bill,
as they tottered upon the branches where they stood. A piercing
scream issued from the lips of James Grayling as he beheld this
sight, and strove to scare the offensive birds from their repast.
The poor major! the poor major! was the involuntary and
agonized exclamation of the youth. Did I ever think he
would come to this!
The search, thus guided and encouraged, was pressed with
renewed
diligence and spirit; and, at length, an opening was found
through which it was evident that a body of considerable size had
but recently gone. The branches were broken from the small
shrub trees, and the undergrowth trodden into the earth. They
followed this path, and, as is the case commonly with waste tracts
of this description, the density of the growth diminished sensibly
at every step they took, till they reached a little pond, which,
though circumscribed in area, and full of cypresses, yet proved to
be singularly deep. Indeed, it was an alligator-hole, where, in all
probability, a numerous tribe of these reptiles had their dwelling.
Here, on the edge of the pond, they discovered the object which
had drawn the keen-sighted vultures to their feast, in the body of
a horse, which James Grayling at once identified as that of
Major
Spencer. The carcass of the animal was already very much torn
and lacerated. The eyes were plucked out, and the animal
completely
disembowelled. Yet, on examination, it was not difficult
to discover the manner of his death. This had been effected by
fire-arms. Two bullets had passed through his skull, just above
the eyes, either of which must have been fatal. The murderer
had led the horse to the spot, and committed the cruel deed where
his body was found. The search was now continued for that of
the owner, but for some time it proved ineffectual. At length, the
keen eyes of James Grayling detected, amidst a heap of moss and
green sedge that rested beside an overthrown tree, whose
branches
jutted into the pond, a whitish, but discoloured object, that did
not seem native to the place. Bestriding the fallen tree, he was
enabled to reach this object, which, with a burst of grief, he
announced
to the distant party was the hand and arm of his
unfortunate
friend, the wristband of the shirt being the conspicuous
object which had first caught his eye. Grasping this, he drew
the corse, which had been thrust beneath the branches of the tree,
to the surface; and, with the assistance of his uncle, it was
finally
brought to the dry land. Here it underwent a careful
examination
.
The head was very much disfigured; the skull was
fractured in several places by repeated blows of some hard
instrument
,
inflicted chiefly from behind. A closer inspection revealed
a bullet-hole in the abdomen, the first wound, in all probability,
which the unfortunate gentleman received, and by which he was,
perhaps, tumbled from his horse. The blows on the head would
seem to have been unnecessary, unless the murdererwhose
proceedings
appeared to have been singularly deliberate,was
resolved
upon making assurance doubly sure. But, as if the
watchful
Providence had meant that nothing should be left doubtful
which might tend to the complete conviction of the criminal, the
constable stumbled upon the butt of the broken pistol which had
been found in Macleod's trunk. This he picked up on the edge
of the pond in which the corse had been discovered, and while
James Grayling and his uncle, Sparkman, were engaged in
drawing
it from the water. The place where the fragment was
discovered
at once denoted the pistol as the instrument by which the
final blows were inflicted. 'Fore God, said the judge to the
criminal, as these proofs were submitted on the trial, you may
be a very innocent man after all, as, by my faith, I do think there
have been many murderers before you; but you ought,
nevertheless
,
to be hung as an example to all other persons who suffer
such strong proofs of guilt to follow their innocent misdoings.
Gentlemen of the jury, if this person, Macleod or Macnab, didn't
murder Major Spencer, either you or I did; and you must now
decide which of us it is! I say, gentlemen of the jury, either
you, or I, or the prisoner at the bar, murdered this man; and if
you have any doubts which of us it was, it is but justice and
mercy
that you should give the prisoner the benefit of your doubts; and
so find your verdict. But, before God, should you find him not
guilty, Mr. Attorney there can scarcely do anything wiser than
to put us all upon trial for the deed.
The jury, it may be scarcely necessary to add, perhaps under
certain becoming fears of an alternative such as his honour had
suggested, brought in a verdict of Guilty, without leaving the
panel; and Macnab,
alias
Macleod, was hung at White Point,
Charleston, somewhere about the year 178.
And here, said my grandmother, devoutly, you behold a
proof of God's watchfulness to see that murder should not be
hidden
,
and that the murderer should not escape. You see that he
sent the spirit of the murdered mansince, by no other mode
could the truth have been revealedto declare the crime, and to
discover the criminal. But for that ghost, Macnab would have
got off to Scotland, and probably have been living to this very
day on the money that he took from the person of the poor
major
.
As the old lady finished the ghost story, which, by the way,
she had been tempted to relate for the fiftieth time in order to
combat my father's ridicule of such superstitions, the latter took
up the thread of the narrative.
Now, my son, said he, as you have heard all that your
grandmother has to say on this subject, I will proceed to show
you what you have to believe, and what not. It is true that
Macnab murdered Spencer in the manner related; that James
Grayling made the dicovery and prosecuted the pursuit; found
the body and brought the felon to justice; that Macnab suffered
death, and confessed the crime; alleging that he was moved to
do so, as well because of the money that he suspected Spencer to
have in his possession, as because of the hate which he felt for a
man who had been particularly bold and active in cutting up a
party of Scotch loyalists to which he belonged, on the borders of
North Carolina. But the appearance of the spectre was nothing
more than the work of a quick imagination, added to a shrewd
and correct judgment. James Grayling saw no ghost, in fact,
but such as was in his own mind; and, though the instance was
one of a most remarkable character, one of singular combination,
and well depending circumstances, still, I think it is to be
accounted
for by natural and very simple laws.
The old lady was indignant.
And how could he see the ghost just on the edge of the same
bay where the murder had been conmitted, and where the body
of the murdered man even then was lying?
My father did not directly answer the demand, but proceeded
thus:
James Grayling, as we know, mother, was a very ardent,
impetuous, sagacious man. He had the sanguine, the race-horse
temperament. He was generous, always prompt and ready, and
one who never went backward. What he did, he did quickly,
boldly, and thoroughly! He never shrank from trouble of any
kind: nay, he rejoiced in the constant encounter with difficulty
and trial; and his was the temper which commands and enthrals
mankind. He felt deeply and intensely whatever occupied his
mind, and when he parted from his friend he brooded over little
else than their past communion and the great distance by which
they were to be separated. The dull travelling wagon-gait at
which he himself was compelled to go, was a source of
annoyance
to him; and he became sullen, all the day, after the
departure
of his friend. When, on the evening of the next day, he
came to the house where it was natural to expect that Major
Spencer would have slept the night before, and he learned the fact
that no one stopped there but the Scotchman, Macnab, we see
that he was struck with the circumstance. He mutters it over
to himself, Strange, where the major could have gone! His
mind then naturally reverts to the character of the Scotchman;
to the opinions and suspicions which had been already expressed
of him by his uncle, and felt by himself. They had all,
previously
,
come to the full conviction that Macnab was, and had always
been, a tory, in spite of his protestations. His mind next, and
very naturally, reverted to the insecurity of the highways; the
general dangers of travelling at that period; the frequency of
crime, and the number of desperate men who were everywhere
to be met with. The very employment in which he was then
engaged, in scouting the woods for the protection of the camp,
was calculated to bring such reflections to his mind. If these
precautions were considered necessary for the safety of persons
so poor, so wanting in those possessions which might prompt
cupidity
to crime, how much more necessary were precautions in
the case of a wealthy gentleman like Major Spencer! He then
remembered the conversation with the major at the camp-fire,
when they fancied that the Scotchman was sleeping. How
natural
to think then, that he was all the while awake; and, if
awake, he must have heard him speak of the wealth of his
companion
.
True, the major, with more prudence than himself,
denied
that he had any money about him, more than would bear his
expenses to the city; but such an assurance was natural enough
to the lips of a traveller who knew the dangers of the country.
That the man, Macnab, was not a person to be trusted, was the
equal impression of Joel Sparkman and his nephew from the first.
The probabilities were strong that he would rob and perhaps
murder, if he might hope to do so with impunity; and as the
youth made the circuit of the bay in the darkness and solemn
stillness of the night, its gloomy depths and mournful shadows,
naturally gave rise to such reflections as would be equally
active
in the mind of a youth, and of one somewhat familiar with
the arts and usages of strife. He would see that the spot
was just the one in which a practised partisan would delight to
set an ambush for an unwary foe. There ran the public road,
with a little sweep, around two-thirds of the extent of its dense
and impenetrable thickets. The ambush could lie concealed,
and at ten steps command the bosom of its victim. Here, then,
you perceive that the mind of James Grayling, stimulated by an
active and sagacious judgment, had by gradual and reasonable
stages come to these conclusions: that Major Spencer was an
object
to tempt a robber; that the country was full of robbers;
that Macnab was one of them; that this was the very spot in
which a deed of blood could be most easily committed, and
most easily concealed; and, one important fact, that gave strength
and coherence to the whole, that Major Spencer had not reached
a well-known point of destination, while Macnab had.
With these thoughts, thus closely linked together, the youth
forgets the limits of his watch and his circuit. This fact, alone,
proves how active his imagination had become. It leads him
forward
,
brooding more and more on the subject, until, in the very
exhaustion of his body, he sinks down beneath a tree. He sinks
down and falls asleep; and in his sleep, what before was
plausible
conjecture, becomes fact, and the creative properties of his
imagination give form and vitality to all his fancies. These forms
are bold, broad, and deeply coloured, in due proportion with the
degree of force which they receive from probability. Here, he
sees the image of his friend; but, you will remarkand this
should almost conclusively satisfy any mind that all that he sees
is the work of his imagination,that, though Spencer tells him
that he is murdered, and by Macnab, he does not tell him how,
in what manner, or with what weapons. Though he sees him
pale and ghostlike, he does not see, nor can he say, where his
wounds are! He sees his pale features distinctly, and his
garments
are bloody. Now, had he seen the spectre in the true
appearances
of death, as he was subsequently found, he would not
have been able to discern his features, which were battered,
according
to his own account, almost out of all shape of humanity,
and covered with mud; while his clothes would have streamed
with mud and water, rather than with blood.
Ah! exclaimed the old lady, my grandmother, it's hard
to make you believe anything that you don't see; you are like
Saint Thomas in the Scriptures; but how do you propose to
account
for his knowing that the Scotchman was on board the
Falmouth
packet? Answer to that!
That is not a more difficult matter than any of the rest.
You forget that in the dialogue which took place between James
and Major Spencer at the camp, the latter told him that he was
about to take passage for Europe in the Falmouth packet, which
then lay in Charleston harbour, and was about to sail. Macnab
heard all that...'
True enough, and likely enough, returned the old lady;
but, though you show that it was Major Spencer's intention to
go to Europe in the Falmouth packet, that will not show that it
was also the intention of the murderer.
Yet what more probable, and how natural for James
Grayling
to imagine such a thing! In the first place he knew that
Macnab was a Briton; he felt convinced that he was a tory; and
the inference was immediate, that such a person would scarcely
have remained long in a country where such characters laboured
under so much odium, disfranchisement, and constant danger
from popular tumults. The fact that Macnab was compelled to
disguise his true sentiments, and affect those of the people against
whom he fought so vindictively, shows what was his sense of the
danger which he incurred. Now, it is not unlikely that Macnab
was quite as well aware that the Falmouth packet was in
Charleston
,
and about to sail, as Major Spencer. No doubt he was
pursuing
the same journey, with the same object, and had he not
murdered Spencer, they would, very likely, have been
fellow-passengers
together to Europe. But, whether he knew the fact
before or not, he probably heard it stated by Spencer while he
seemed to be sleeping; and, even supposing that he did not then
know, it was enough that he found this to be the fact on reaching
the city. It was an after-thought to fly to Europe with his
ill-gotten
spoils; and whatever may have appeared a politic course
to the criminal, would be a probable conjecture in the mind of
him by whom he was suspected. The whole story is one of strong
probabilities which happened to be verified; and, if proving
anything
,
proves only that which we knowthat James Grayling was
a man of remarkably sagacious judgment, and quick, daring
imagination
.
This quality of imagination, by the way, when
possessed
very strongly in connexion with shrewd common sense
and well-balanced general faculties, makes that particular kind
of intellect which, because of its promptness and powers of
creation
and combination, we call genius. It is genius only which
can make ghosts, and James Grayling was a genius. He never,
my son, saw any other ghosts than those of his own making!
I heard my father with great patience to the end, though he
seemed very tedious. He had taken a great deal of pains to
destroy
one of my greatest sources of pleasure. I need not add
that I continued to believe in the ghost, and, with my
grandmother
,
to reject the philosophy. It was more easy to believe the one
than to comprehend the other.
4
THE TWO CAMPS.
A LEGEND OF THE OLD NORTH STATE.
CHAPTER I.
These, the forest born
And forest nurtureda bold, hardy race,
Fearless and frank, unfettered, with big souls
In hour of danger.
It
is frequently the case, in the experience of the professional
novelist or tale-writer, that his neighbour comes in to his
assistance
when he least seeks, and, perhaps, least desires any succour.
The worthy person, man or woman, however,probably some
excellent
octogenarian whose claims to be heard are based chiefly
upon
the fact that he himself no longer possesses the faculty of
hearing
,has
some famous incident, some wonderful fact, of which he
has been the eye-witness, or of which he has heard from his
great-grandmother
,
which he fancies is the very thing to be woven into
song or story. Such is the strong possession which the matter
takes of his brain, that, if the novelist whom he seeks to benefit
does not live within trumpet-distance, he gives him the narrative by
means of post, some three sheets of stiff foolscap, for which the
hapless tale-writer, whose works are selling in cheap editions at
twelve or twenty cents, pays a sum of one dollar sixty-two postage.
Now, it so happens, to increase the evil, that, in ninety-nine cases
in the hundred, the fact thus laboriously stated is not worth a
strawconsisting of some simple deed of violence, some mere
murder, a downright blow with gun-butt or cudgel over the skull,
or a hidden thrust, three inches deep, with dirk or bowie knife,
into the abdomen, or at random among the lower ribs. The man
dies and the murderer gets off to Texas, or is prematurely caught
and stops by the wayand still stops by the way! The thing is
fact, no doubt. The narrator saw it himself, or his brother saw
it, ormore solemn, if not more certain testimony stillhis
grandmother
saw it, long before he had eyes to see at all. The
circumstance
is attested by a cloud of witnessesa truth solemnly
sworn toand yet, for the purposes of the tale-writer, of no
manner
of value. This assertion may somewhat conflict with the
received opinions of many, who, accustomed to find deeds of
violence
recorded in almost every work of fiction, from the time of
Homer to the present day, have rushed to the conclusion that this
is all, and overlook that labour of the artist, by which an
ordinary
event is made to assume the character of novelty; in other
words, to become an extraordinary event. The least difficult
thing in the world, on the part of the writer of fiction, is to find
the assassin and the bludgeon; the art is to make them appear in
the right place, strike at the right time, and so adapt one fact to
another, as to create mystery, awaken curiosity, inspire doubt as
to the result, and bring about the catastrophe, by processes which
shall be equally natural and unexpected. All that class of
sagacious
persons, therefore, who fancy they have found a mare's
nest, when, in fact, they are only gazing at a goose's, are
respectfully
counselled that no factno traditionis of any importance to
the artist, unless it embodies certain peculiar characteristics of its
own, or unless it illustrates some history about which curiosity
has already been awakened. A mere brutality, in which John
beats and bruises Ben, and Ben in turn shoots John, putting
eleven
slugs, or thereabouts, between his collar-bone and vertebr
or, maybe, stabs him under his left pap, or any where you please,
is just as easily conceived by the novelist, without the help of
history. Nay, for that matter, he would perhaps rather not have
any precise facts in his way, in such cases, as then he will be
able to regard the picturesque in the choice of his weapon, and to
put the wounds in such parts of the body, as will better bear the
examination of all persons. I deem it right to throw out this hint,
just at this moment, as well for the benefit of my order as for
my own protection. The times are hard, and the post-office
requires
all its dues in hard money. Literary men are not
proverbially
prepared at all seasons for any unnecessary outlay
and to be required to make advances for commodities of which
they have on hand, at all times, the greatest abundance, is an
injustice
which, it is to be hoped, that this little intimation will
somewhat lessen. We take for granted, therefore, that our
professional
brethren will concur with us in saying to the public,
that we are all sufficiently provided with disastrous chances
for some time to comethat our moving accidents by flood and
field are particularly numerous, and of hair-breadth 'scapes
we have enough to last a century. Murders, and such matters,
as they are among the most ordinary events of the day, are
decidedly
vulgar; and, for mere cudgelling and bruises, the taste
of the belles-lettres reader, rendered delicate by the monthly
magazines, has voted them equally gross and unnatural.
But, if the character of the materials usually tendered to the
novelist by the incident-mongers, is thus ordinarily worthless as
we describe it, we sometimes are fortunate in finding an
individual
,
here and there, in the deep forests,a sort of recluse, hale
and lusty, but white-headed,who unfolds from his own budget
of experience a rare chronicle, on which we delight to linger.
Such an one breathes life into his deeds. We see them as we
listen to his words. In lieu of the dead body of the fact, we have
its living spiritsubtle, active, breathing and burning, and fresh
in all the provocations and associations of life. Of this sort
was the admirable characteristic narrative of Horse-Shoe
Robinson
,
which we owe to Kennedy, and for which he was indebted
to the venerable hero of the story. When we say that the
subject
of the sketch which follows was drawn from not dissimilar
sources, we must beg our readers not to understand us as inviting
any reference to that able and national storywith which it
is by no means our policy or wish to invite or provoke
comparison
.
CHAPTER II.
There
are probably some old persons still living upon the
upper
dividing line between North and South Carolina, who still
remember
the form and features of the venerable Daniel Nelson.
The old man was still living so late as 1817. At that period he
removed to Mississippi, where, we believe, he died in less than
three months after his change of residence. An old tree does not
bear transplanting easily, and does not long survive it. Daniel
Nelson came from Virginia when a youth. He was one of the
first who settled on the southern borders of North Carolina, or,
at least in that neighbourhood where he afterwards passed the
greatest portion of his days.
At that time the country was not only a forest, but one thickly
settled with Indians. It constituted the favourite hunting-grounds
for several of their tribes. But this circumstance did not
discourage
young Nelson. He was then a stalwart youth, broad-chested,
tall, with a fiery eye, and an almost equally fiery soulcertainly
with a very fearless one. His companions, who were few in
number, were like himself. The spirit of old Daniel Boone was
a more common one than is supposed. Adventure gladdened and
excited their hearts,danger only seemed to provoke their
determination
,and
mere hardship was something which their frames
appeared to covet. It was as refreshing to them as drink.
Having
seen the country, and struck down some of its game,tasted
of its bear-meat and buffalo, its deer and turkey,all, at that
time, in the greatest abundance,they returned for the one thing
most needful to a brave forester in a new country,a good, brisk,
fearless wife, who, like the damsel in Scripture, would go
whither-soever
went the husband to whom her affections were surrendered.
They had no fear, these bold young hunters, to make a home and
rear an infant family in regions so remote from the secure walks
of civilization. They had met and made an acquaintance and a
sort of friendship with the Indians, and, in the superior vigour of
their own frames, their greater courage, and better weapons, they
perhaps had come to form a too contemptuous estimate of the
savage
.
But they were not beguiled by him into too much
confidence
.
Their log houses were so constructed as to be fortresses
upon occasion, and they lived not so far removed from one
another
,
but that the leaguer of one would be sure, in twenty-four
hours, to bring the others to his assistance. Besides, with a stock
of bear-meat and venison always on hand, sufficient for a winter,
either of these fortresses might, upon common calculations, be
maintained for several weeks against any single band of the
Indians
,
in the small numbers in which they were wont to range
together
in those neighbourhoods. In this way these bold pioneers
took possession of the soil, and paved the way for still mightier
generations. Though wandering, and somewhat averse to the
tedious
labours of the farm, they were still not wholly unmindful
of its duties; and their open lands grew larger every season, and
increasing comforts annually spoke for the increasing civilization
of the settlers. Corn was in plenty in proportion to the
bearmeat
,
and the squatters almost grew indifferent to those first
apprehensions
,
which had made them watch the approaches of the
most friendly Indian as if he had been an enemy. At the end of
five years, in which they had suffered no hurt and but little
annoyance
of any sort from their wild neighbours, it would seem as
if this confidence in the security of their situation was not without
sufficient justification.
But, just then, circumstances seemed to threaten an
interruption
of this goodly state of things. The Indians were becoming
discontented. Other tribes, more frequently in contact with the
larger settlements of the whites,wronged by them in trade, or
demoralized by drink,complained of their sufferings and
injuries
,
or, as is more probable, were greedy to obtain their treasures,
in bulk, which they were permitted to see, but denied to enjoy, or
only in limited quantity. Their appetites and complaints were
transmitted, by inevitable sympathies, to their brethren of the
interior
,
and our worthy settlers upon the Haw, were rendered
anxious
at signs which warned them of a change in the peaceful
relations
which had hitherto existed in all the intercourse between
the differing races. We need not dwell upon or describe these
signs, with which, from frequent narratives of like character, our
people are already sufficiently familiar. They were easily
understood
by our little colony, and by none more quickly than
Daniel Nelson. They rendered him anxious, it is true, but not
apprehensive; and, like a good husband, while he strove not to
frighten his wife by what he said, he deemed it necessary to
prepare
her mind for the worst that might occur. This task over,
he felt somewhat relieved, though, when he took his little girl,
now five years old, upon his knee that evening, and looked upon
his infant boy in the lap of his mother, he felt his anxieties very
much increase; and that very night he resumed a practice which
he had latterly abandoned, but which had been adopted as a
measure of strict precaution, from the very first establishment of
their little settlement. As soon as supper was over, he resumed
his rifle, thrust his
couteau de chasse
into his belt, and, taking his
horn about his neck, and calling up his trusty dog, Clinch, he
proceeded to scour the woods immediately around his habitation.
This task, performed with the stealthy caution of the hunter,
occupied
some time, and, as the night was clear, a bright starlight,
the weather moderate, and his own mood restless, he determined
to strike through the forest to the settlement of Jacob Ransom,
about four miles off, in order to prompt him, and, through him,
others of the neighbourhood, to the continued exercise of a caution
which he now thought necessary. The rest of this night's
adventure
we propose to let him tell in his own words, as he has been
heard to relate it a thousand times in his old age, at a period of
life when, with one foot in his grave, to suppose him guilty of
falsehood, or of telling that which he did not himself fervently
believe
,
would be, among all those who knew him, to suppose the
most impossible and extravagant thing in the world.
CHAPTER III.
Well,
my friends, said the veteran, then seventy, drawing
his figure up to its fullest height, and extending his right arm,
while his left still grasped the muzzle of his ancient rifle, which
he swayed from side to side, the butt resting on the floorWell,
my friends, seeing that the night was cl'ar, and there was no
wind, and feeling as how I didn't want for sleep, I called to Clinch
and took the path for Jake Ransom's. I knew that Jake was a
sleepy sort of chap, and if the redskins caught any body napping,
he'd, most likely, be the man. But I confess, 'twarn't so much
for his sake, as for the sake of all,of my own as well as the
rest;for, when I thought how soon, if we warn't all together in
the business, I might see, without being able to put in, the long
yellow hair of Betsy and the babies twirling on the thumbs of
some painted devil of the tribe,I can't tell you how I felt, but
it warn't like a human, though I shivered mightily like one,
'twas wolfish, as if the hair was turned in and rubbing agin the
very heart within me. I said my prayers, where I stood, looking
up at the stars, and thinking that, after all, all was in the hands
and the marcy of God. This sort o' thinking quieted me, and I
went ahead pretty free, for I knew the track jest as well by night
as by day, though I didn't go so quick, for I was all the time on
the look-out for the enemy. Now, after we reached a place in
the woods where there was a gully and a mighty bad crossing,
there were two roads to get to Jake'sone by the hollows, and
one jest across the hills. I don't know why, but I didn't give
myself time to think, and struck right across the hill, though that
was rather the longest way.
Howsomedever, on I went, and Clinch pretty close behind me.
The dog was a good dog, with a mighty keen nose to hunt, but
jest then he didn't seem to have the notion for it. The hill was
a sizeable one, a good stretch to foot, and I began to remember,
after awhile, that I had been in the woods from blessed dawn;
and that made me see how it was with poor Clinch, and why he
didn't go for'ad; but I was more than half way, and wasn't
guine to turn back till I had said my say to Jake. Well, when I
got to the top of the hill, I stopped, and rubbed my eyes. I had
cause to rub 'em, for what should I see at a distance but a great
fire. At first I was afeard lest it was Jake's house, but I
considered
,
the next moment, that he lived to the left, and this fire was
cl'ar to the right, and it did seem to me as if 'twas more near to
my own. Here was something to scare a body. But I couldn't
stay there looking, and it warn't now a time to go to Jake's; so
I turned off, and, though Clinch was mighty onwilling, I bolted on
the road to the fire. I say road, but there was no road; but the
trees warn't over-thick, and the land was too poor for undergrowth;
so we got on pretty well, considering. But, what with the tire I
had had, and the scare I felt, it seemed as if I didn't get for'ad a
bit. There was the fire still burning as bright and almost as far
off as ever. When I saw this I stopt and looked at Clinch, and
he stopped and looked at me, but neither of us had any thing
to say. Well, after a moment's thinking, it seemed as if I
shouldn't be much of a man to give up when I had got so far, so
I pushed on. We crossed more than one little hill, then down
and through the hollow, and then up the hill again. At last we
got upon a small mountain the Indians called Nolleehatchie, and
then it seemed as if the fire had come to a stop, for it was now
burning bright, on a little hill below me, and not two hundred
yards in front. It was a regular camp fire, pretty big, and there
was more than a dozen Indians sitting round it. `Well,' says I
to myself, `it's come upon us mighty sudden, and what's to be
done? Not a soul in the settlement knows it but myself, and
nobody's on the watch. They'll be sculped, every human of
them, in their very beds, or, moutbe, waken up in the blaze, to be
shot with arrows as they run.' I was in a cold sweat to think of
it. I didn't know what to think and what to do. I looked round
to Clinch, and the strangest thing of all was to see him sitting
quiet on his haunches, looking at me, and at the stars, and not at
the fire jest before him. Now, Clinch was a famous fine hunting
dog, and jest as good on an Indian trail as any other. He know'd
my ways, and what I wanted, and would give tongue, or keep it
still, jest as I axed him. It was sensible enough, jest then, that
he shouldn't bark, but, dang it!he didn't even seem to see.
Now, there warn't a dog in all the settlement so quick and keen
to show sense as Clinch, even when he didn't say a word;and
to see him looking as if he didn't know and didn't care what was
a-going on, with his eyes sot in his head and glazed over with
sleep, was, as I may say, very onnatural, jest at that time, in a
dog of any onderstanding. So I looked at him, half angry, and
when he saw me looking at him, he jest stretched himself off, put
his nose on his legs, and went to sleep in 'arnest. I had half a
mind to lay my knife-handle over his head, but I considered
better
of it, and though it did seem the strangest thing in the world
that he shouldn't even try to get to the fire, for warm sake, yet I
recollected that dog natur', like human natur', can't stand every
thing, and he hadn't such good reason as I had, to know that the
Indians were no longer friendly to us. Well, there I stood, a
pretty considerable chance, looking, and wondering, and
onbeknowing
what to do. I was mighty beflustered. But at last I felt
ashamed to be so oncertain, and then again it was a needcessity
that we should know the worst one time or another, so I
determined
to push for'ad. I was no slouch of a hunter, as you may
suppose
;
so, as I was nearing the camp, I begun sneaking; and,
taking it sometimes on hands and knees, and sometimes flat to the
ground, where there was neither tree nor bush to cover me, I
went ahead, Clinch keeping close behind me, and not showing any
notion of what I was after. It was a slow business, because it
was a ticklish business; but I was a leetle too anxious to be
altogether
so careful as a good sneak ought to be, and I went on
rather faster than I would advise any young man to go in a time
of war, when the inimy is in the neighbourhood. Well, as I went,
there was the fire, getting larger and larger every minute, and
there were the Indians round it, getting plainer and plainer.
There was so much smoke that there was no making out, at any
distance, any but their figures, and these, every now and then,
would be so wrapt in the smoke that not more than half of them
could be seen at the same moment. At last I stopped, jest at a
place where I thought I could make out all that I wanted. There
was a sizeable rock before me, and I leaned my elbows on it to look.
I reckon I warn't more than thirty yards from the fire. There
were some bushes betwixt us, and what with the bushes and the
smoke, it was several minutes before I could separate man from
man, and see what they were all adoing, and when I did, it was
only for a moment at a time, when a puff of smoke would wrap
them all, and make it as difficult as ever. But when I did
contrive
to see clearly, the sight was one to worry me to the core,
for, in the midst of the redskins, I could see a white one, and that
white one a woman. There was no mistake. There were the
Indians, some with their backs, and some with their faces to me;
and there, a little a-one side, but still among them, was a woman.
When the smoke bloke off, I could see her white face, bright
like any star, shining out of the clouds, and looking so pale and
ghastly that my blood cruddled in my veins to think lest she might
be dead from fright. But it couldn't be so, for she was sitting up
and looking about her. But the Indians were motionless. They
jest sat or lay as when I first saw themdoing nothingsaying
nothing, but jest as motionless as the stone under my elbow. I
couldn't stand looking where I was, so I began creeping again,
getting nigher and nigher, until it seemed to me as if I ought to
be able to read every face. But what with the paint and smoke,
I couldn't make out a single Indian. Their figures seemed plain
enough in their buffalo-skins and blankets, but their faces seemed
always in the dark. But it wasn't so with the woman. I could
make her out clearly. She was very young; I reckon not more
than fifteen, and it seemed to me as if I knew her looks very well.
She was very handsome, and her hair was loosed upon her back.
My heart felt strange to see her. I was weak as any child. It
seemed as if I could die for the gal, and yet I hadn't strength enough
to raise my rifle to my shoulder. The weakness kept on me the
more I looked; for every moment seemed to make the poor child
more and more dear to me. But the strangest thing of all was
to see how motionless was every Indian in the camp. Not a word
was spokennot a limb or finger stirred. There they sat, or lay,
round about the fire, like so many effigies, looking at the gal, and
she looking at them. I never was in such a fix of fear and
weakness
in my life. What was I to do? I had got so nigh that I
could have stuck my knife, with a jerk, into the heart of any one
of the party, yet I hadn't the soul to lift it; and before I knew
where I was, I cried like a child. But my crying didn't make
'em look about 'em. It only brought my poor dog Clinch leaping
upon me, and whining, as if he wanted to give me consolation.
Hardly knowing what I did, I tried to set him upon the camp,
but the poor fellow didn't seem to understand me; and in my
desperation, for it was a sort of madness growing out of my scare,
I jumped headlong for'ad, jest where I saw the party sitting,
willing
to lose my life rather than suffer from such a strange sort of
misery.
CHAPTER IV.
Will
you believe me! there were no Indians, no young
woman
,
no fire! I stood up in the very place where I had seen the
blaze and the smoke, and there was nothing! I looked for'ad
and about methere was no sign of fire any where. Where I
stood was covered with dry leaves, the same as the rest of the
forest. I was stupefied. I was like a man roused out of sleep
by a strange dream, and seeing nothing. All was dark and silent.
The stars were overhead, but that was all the light I had. I was
more scared than ever, and, as it's a good rule when a man feels
that he can do nothing himself, to look to the great God who can
do every thing, I kneeled down and said my prayersthe second
time that night that I had done the same thing, and the second
time, I reckon, that I had ever done so in the woods. After that
I felt stronger. I felt sure that this sign hadn't been shown to me
for nothing; and while I was turning about, looking and thinking
to turn on the back track for home, Clinch began to prick up his
ears and waken up. I clapped him on his back, and got my
knife ready. It might be a
painter
that stirred him, for he could
scent that beast a great distance. But, as he showed no fright,
only a sort of quickening, I knew there was nothing to fear. In
a moment he started off, and went boldly ahead. I followed him,
but hadn't gone twenty steps down the hill and into the hollow,
when I heard something like a groan. This quickened me, and
keeping up with the dog, he led me to the foot of the hollow,
where was a sort of pond. Clinch ran right for it, and another
groan set me in the same direction. When I got up to the dog,
he was on the butt-end of an old tree that had fallen, I reckon,
before my time, and was half buried in the water. I jumped on
it, and walked a few steps for'ad, when, what should I see but a
human, half across the log, with his legs hanging in the water,
and his head down. I called Clinch back out of my way, and
went to the spot. The groans were pretty constant. I stooped
5
down and laid my hands upon the person, and, as I felt the hair, I
knew it was an Indian. The head was clammy with blood, so
that my fingers stuck, and when I attempted to turn it, to look at
the face, the groan was deeper than ever; but 'twarn't a time
to suck one's fingers. I took him up, clapped my shoulders to it,
and, fixing my feet firmly on the old tree, which was rather
slippery
,
I brought the poor fellow out without much trouble. Though
tall, he was not heavy, and was only a boy of fourteen or fifteen.
The wonder was how a lad like that should get into such a fix.
Well, I brought him out and laid him on the dry leaves. His
groans stopped, and I thought he was dead, but I felt his heart,
and it was still warm, and I thought, though I couldn't be sure,
there was a beat under my fingers. What to do was the next
question. It was now pretty late in the night. I had been all
day a-foot, and, though still willing to go, yet the thought of such
a weight on my shoulders made me stagger. But 'twouldn't do
to leave him where he was to perish. I thought, if so be I had a
son in such a fix, what would I think of the stranger who should
go home and wait till daylight to give him help! No, darn my
splinters, said I,though I had just done my prayers,if I leave
the ladand, tightening my girth, I give my whole soul to it, and
hoisted him on my shoulders. My cabin, I reckoned, was good
three miles off. You can guess what trouble I had, and what a
tire under my load, before I got home and laid the poor fellow
down by the fire. I then called up Betsy, and we both set to
work to see if we could stir up the life that was in him. She cut
away his hair, and I washed the blood from his head, which was
chopped to the bone, either with a knife or hatchet. It was a God's
blessing it hadn't gone into his brain, for it was fairly enough
aimed for it, jest above the ear. When we come to open his
clothes, we found another wound in his side. This was done
with a knife, and, I suppose, was pretty deep. He had lost blood
enough, for all his clothes were stiff with it. We knew nothing
much of doctoring, but we had some rum in the cabin, and after
washing his wounds clean with it, and pouring some down his
throat, he began to groan more freely, and by that we knew he
was coming to a nateral feeling. We rubbed his body down with
warm cloths, and after a little while, seeing that he made some
signs, I give him water as much as he could drink. This seemed
to do him good, and having done every thing that we thought could
help him, we wrapped him up warmly before the fire, and I
stretched myself off beside him. 'Twould be a long story to tell,
step by step, how he got on. It's enough to say that he didn't
die that bout. We got him on his legs in a short time, doing
little
or nothing for him more than we did at first. The lad was a
good lad, though, at first, when he first came to his senses, he was
mighty shy, wouldn't look steadily in our faces, and, I do believe,
if he could have got out of the cabin, would have done so as soon
as he could stagger. But he was too weak to try that, and,
meanwhile
,
when he saw our kindness, he was softened. By little and
little, he got to play with my little Lucy, who was not quite six
years old; and, after a while, he seemed to be never better
pleased
than when they played together. The child, too, after her
first fright, leaned to the lad, and was jest as willing to play with
him as if he had been a cl`ar white like herself. He could say
a few words of English from the beginning, and learnt quickly;
but, though he talked tolerable free for an Indian, yet I could
never get him to tell me how he was wounded, or by whom. His
brow blackened when I spoke of it, and his lips would be shut
together
,
as if he was ready to fight sooner than to speak. Well,
I didn't push him to know, for I was pretty sure the head of the
truth will be sure to come some time or other, if you once have
it by the tail, provided you don't jerk it off by straining too hard
upon it.
CHAPTER V.
I suppose
the lad had been with us a matter of six weeks,
getting
better every day, but so slowly that he had not, at the end of
that time, been able to leave the picket. Meanwhile, our
troubles
with the Indians were increasing. As yet, there had been no
bloodshed in our quarter, but we heard of murders and sculpings
on every side, and we took for granted that we must have our
turn. We made our preparations, repaired the pickets, laid in
ammunition, and took turns for scouting nightly. At length, the
signs of Indians got to be thick in our parts, though we could see
none. Jake Ransom had come upon one of their camps after
they had left it; and we had reason to apprehend every thing,
inasmuch
as the outlyers didn't show themselves, as they used to
do, but prowled about the cabins and went from place to place,
only by night, or by close skulking in the thickets. One evening
after this, I went out as usual to go the rounds, taking Clinch
with me, but I hadn't got far from the gate, when the dog
stopped
and gave a low bark;then I knew there was mischief, so I
turned round quietly, without making any show of scare, and got
back safely, though not a minute too soon. They trailed me to
the gate the moment after I had got it fastened, and were pretty
mad, I reckon, when they found their plan had failed for
surprising
me. But for the keen nose of poor Clinch, with all my skill
in scouting,and it was not small even in that early day,
they'd 'a had me, and all that was mine, before the sun could
open his eyes to see what they were after. Finding they had
failed in their ambush, they made the woods ring with the
war-whoop
,
which was a sign that they were guine to give us a
regular siege. At the sound of the whoop, we could see the eyes
of the Indian boy brighten, and his ears prick up, jest like a
hound's when he first gets scent of the deer, or hears the horn of
the hunter. I looked closely at the lad, and was dub'ous what to
do. He moutbe only an enemy in the camp, and while I was
fighting in front, he might be cutting the throats of my wife and
children within. I did not tell you that I had picked up his bow
and arrows near the little lake where I had found him, and his
hunting-knife was sticking in his belt when I brought him home.
Whether to take these away from him, was the question.
Suppose
I did, a billet of wood would answer pretty near as well.
I thought the matter over while I watched him. Thought runs
mighty quick in time of danger! Well, after turning it over on
every side, I concluded 'twas better to trust him jest as if he had
been a sure friend. I couldn't think, after all we had done for
him, that he'd be false, so I said to him`Lenatew!''twas so
he called himself`those are your people!' `Yes!' he
answered
slowly, and lifting himself up as if he had been a lordhe
was a stately-looking lad, and carried himself like the son of a
Micco,
1
1.
A prince or chief.
as he was`Yes, they are the people of Lenatew
must he go to them?' and he made the motion of going out. But
I stopped him. I was not willing to lose the security which I
had from his being a sort of prisoner. `No,' said I; `no,
Lenatew
,
not to-night. To-morrow will do. To-morrow you can
tell them I am a friend, not an enemy, and they should not
come to burn my wigwam.' `Brotherfriend!' said the lad,
advancing with a sort of freedom and taking my hand. He then
went to my wife, and did the same thing,not regarding she was
a woman,`Brotherfriend!' I watched him closely, watched
his eye and his motions, and I said to Betsy, `The lad is true;
don't be afeard!' But we passed a weary night. Every now
and then we could hear the whoop of the Indians. From the
loop-holes
we could see the light of three fires on different sides, by
which we knew that they were prepared to cut off any help that
might come to us from the rest of the settlement. But I didn't
give in or despair. I worked at one thing or another all night,
and though Lenatew gave me no help, yet he sat quietly, or laid
himself down before the fire, as if he had nothing in the world to
do in the business. Next morning by daylight, I found him
already
dressed in the same bloody clothes which he had on when I
found him. He had thrown aside all that I gave him, and though
the hunting-shirt and leggins which he now wore, were very
much stained with blood and dirt, he had fixed them about him
with a good deal of care and neatness, as if preparing to see
company
.
I must tell you that an Indian of good family always has
a nateral sort of grace and dignity which I never saw in a white
man. He was busily engaged looking through one of the
loop-holes
,
and though I could distinguish nothing, yet it was cl'ar
that he saw something to interest him mightily. I soon found out
that, in spite of all my watchfulness, he had contrived to have some
sort of correspondence and communication with those outside.
This was a wonder to me then, for I did not recollect his bow and
arrows. It seems that he had shot an arrow through one of the
loop-holes, to the end of which he had fastened a tuft of his own
hair. The effect of this was considerable, and to this it was owing
that, for a few hours afterwards, we saw not an Indian. The
arrow was shot at the very peep of day. What they were about,
in the meantime, I can only guess, and the guess was only easy,
after I had known all that was to happen. That they were in
council what to do was cl'ar enough. I was not to know that the
council was like to end in cutting some of their own throats
instead
of ours. But when we did see the enemy fairly, they came
out of the woods in two parties, not actually separated, but not
moving together. It seemed as if there was some strife among
them. Their whole number could not be less than forty, and
some eight or ten of these walked apart under the lead of a chief,
a stout, dark-looking fellow, one-half of whose face was painted
black as midnight, with a red circle round both his eyes. The
other party was headed by an old white-headed chief, who couldn't
ha'been less than sixty yearsa pretty fellow, you may be sure,
at his time of life, to be looking after sculps of women and
children
.
While I was kneeling at my loop-hole looking at them,
Lenatew came to me, and touching me on the arm, pointed to
the old chief, saying`Micco Lenatew Glucco,' by which I
guessed he was the father or grandfather of the lad. `Well,' I
said, seeing that the best plan was to get their confidence and
friendship if possible,`Well, lad, go to your father and tell him
what Daniel Nelson has done for you, and let's have peace. We
can fight, boy, as you see; we have plenty of arms and
provisions
;
and with this rifle, though you may not believe it, I could
pick off your father, the king, and that other chief, who has so
devilled himself up with paint.' `Shoot!' said the lad quickly,
pointing to the chief of whom I had last spoken. `Ah! he is
your enemy then?' The lad nodded his head, and pointed to the
wound on his temple, and that in his side. I now began to see
the true state of the case. `No,' said I; `no, Lenatew, I will
shoot none. I am for peace. I would do good to the Indians,
and be their friend. Go to your father and tell him so. Go, and
make him be my friend.' The youth caught my hand, placed it on
the top of his head, and exclaimed, `Good!' I then attended him
down to the gate, but, before he left the cabin, he stopped and put
his hand on the head of little Lucy,and I felt glad, for it seemed
to say, `you shan't be hurtnot a hair of your head!' I let him
out, fastened up, and then hastened to the loop-hole.
CHAPTER VI.
And
now came a sight to tarrify. As soon as the Indians
saw the young prince, they set up a general cry. I couldn't tell
whether it was of joy, or what. He went for'ad boldly, though
he was still quite weak, and the king at the head of his party
advanced
to meet him. The other and smaller party, headed by
the black chief, whom young Lenatew had told me to shoot, came
forward also, but very slowly, and it seemed as if they were
doubtful whether to come or go. Their leader looked pretty
much beflustered. But they hadn't time for much study, for,
after
the young prince had met his father, and a few words had
passed between them, I saw the finger of Lenatew point to the
black chief. At this, he lifted up his clenched fists, and worked
his body as if he was talking angrily. Then, sudden, the
war-whoop
sounded from the king's party, and the other troop of
Indians
began to run, the black chief at their head; but he had not
got twenty steps when a dozen arrows went into him, and he
tumbled
for'a'ds, and grappled with the earth. It was all over with
him. His party was scattered on all sides, but were not pursued.
It seemed that all the arrows had been aimed at the one person,
and when he sprawled, there was an end to it: the whole affair
was over in five minutes.
CHAPTER VII.
It
was a fortunate affair for us. Lenatew soon brought the
old Micco to terms of peace. For that matter, he had only
consented
to take up the red stick because it was reported by the
black chiefwho was the uncle of the young Micco, and had
good reasons for getting him out of the waythat he had been
murdered by the whites. This driv' the old man to desperation,
and brought him down upon us. When he knew the whole truth,
and saw what friends we had been to his son, there was no end
to his thanks and promises. He swore to be my friend while the
sun shone, while the waters run, and while the mountains stood,
and I believe, if the good old man had been spared so long, he
would have been true to his oath. But, while he lived, he kept
it, and so did his son when he succeeded him as Micco
Glucco-Year
after year went by, and though there was frequent war
between
the Indians and the whites, yet Lenatew kept it from our
doors. He himself was at war several times with our people, but
never with our settlement. He put his
totem
on our trees, and
the Indians knew that they were sacred. But, after a space of
eleven years, there was a change. The young prince seemed to
have forgotten our friendship. We now never saw him among
us, and, unfortunately, some of our young menthe young men
of our own settlementmurdered three young warriors of the
Ripparee tribe, who were found on horses stolen from us. I was
very sorry when I heard it, and began to fear the consequences;
and they came upon us when we least looked for it. I had every
reason to think that Lenatew would still keep the warfare from
my little family, but I did not remember that he was the prince
of a tribe only, and not of the nation. This was a national
warfare
,
in which the whole Cherokee people were in arms. Many
persons, living still, remember that terrible war, and how the
Carolinians humbled them at last; but there's no telling how
much blood was shed in that war, how many sculps taken, how
much misery suffered by young and old, men, women, and
children
.
Our settlement had become so large and scattered that
we had to build a sizeable blockhouse, which we stored, and to
which we could retreat whenever it was necessary. We took
possession of it on hearing from our scouts that Indian trails had
been seen, and there we put the women and children, under a
strong guard. By day we tended our farms, and only went to
our families at night. We had kept them in this fix for five
weeks or thereabouts, and there was no attack. The Indian signs
disappeared, and we all thought the storm had blown over, and
began to hope and to believe that the old friendship of Lenatew
had saved us. With this thinking, we began to be less watchful.
The men would stay all night at the farms, and sometimes, in the
day, would carry with them the women, and sometimes some even
the children. I cautioned them agin this, but they mocked me,
and said I was gitting old and scary. I told them, `Wait and
see who'll scare first.' But, I confess, not seeing any Indians in
all my scouting, I began to feel and think like the rest, and to
grow careless. I let Betsy go now and then with me to the farm,
though she kept it from me that she had gone there more than
once with Lucy, without any man protector. Still, as it was only
a short mile and a half from the block, and we could hear of no
Indians, it did not seem so venturesome a thing. One day we
heard of some very large b'ars among the thicketsa famous
range for them, about four miles from the settlement; and a
party
of us, Simon Lorris, Hugh Darling, Jake Ransom, William
Harkless, and myself, taking our dogs, set off on the hunt. We
started the b'ar with a rush, and I got the first shot at a mighty big
she b'ar, the largest I had ever seenlamed the critter slightly,
and dashed into the thickets after her! The others pushed, in
another
direction, after the rest, leaving me to finish my work as I
could.
I had two dogs with me, Clap and Claw, but they were young
things, and couldn't be trusted much in a close brush with a b'ar.
Old Clinch was dead, or he'd ha' made other guess-work with the
varmint. But, hot after the b'ar, I didn't think of the quality of
the dogs till I found myself in a fair wrestle with the brute. I
don't brag, my friends, but that
was
a fight. I tell you my
breath was clean gone, for the b'ar had me about the thin of my
body, and I thought I was doubled up enough to be laid down
without more handling. But my heart was strong when I thought
of Betsy and the children, and I got my knife, with hard
jugging
though I couldn't use my arm above my elbowthrough the
old critter's hide, and in among her ribs. That only seemed to
make her hug closer, and I reckon I was clean gone, if it hadn't
been that she blowed out before me. I had worked a pretty deep
window in her waist, and then life run out plentiful. Her nose
dropped agin my breast, and then her paws; and when the strain
was gone, I fell down like a sick child, and she fell on top of me.
But she warn't in a humour to do more mischief. She roughed me
once or twice more with her paws, but that was only because she
was at her last kick. There I lay a matter of half an hour, with
the dead b'ar alongside o' me. I was almost as little able to
move as she, and I vomited as if I had taken physic. When I
come to myself and got up, there was no sound of the hunters.
There I was with the two dogs and the b'ar, all alone, and the
sun already long past the turn. My horse, which I had fastened
outside of the thicket, had slipped his bridle, and, I reckoned, had
either strayed off grazing, or had pushed back directly for the
block. These things didn't make me feel much better. But,
though my stomach didn't feel altogether right, and my ribs were
as sore as if I had been sweating under a coating of hickory, I
felt that there was no use and no time to stand there grunting.
But I made out to skin and to cut up the b'ar, and a noble
mountain
of fat she made. I took the skin with me, and, covering the
flesh with bark, I whistled off the dogs, after they had eat to fill,
and pushed after my horse. I followed his track for some time,
till I grew fairly tired. He had gone off in a scare and at a full
gallop, and, instead of going home, had dashed down the lower
side of the thicket, then gone aside, to round some of the hills, and
thrown himself out of the track, it moutbe seven miles or more.
When I found this, I saw there was no use to hunt him that day
and afoot, and I had no more to do but turn about, and push as
fast as I could for the block. But this was work enough. By
this time the sun was pretty low, and there was now a good seven
miles, work it how I could, before me. But I was getting over
my b'ar-sickness, and though my legs felt weary enough, my
stomach was better, and my heart braver; and, as I was in no
hurry, having the whole night before me, and knowing the way
by night as well as by light, I began to feel cheerful enough, all
things considering. I pushed on slowly, stopping every now and
then for rest, and recovering my strength this way. I had some
parched meal and sugar in my pouch which I ate, and it helped
me mightily. It was my only dinner that day. The evening
got to be very still. I wondered I had seen and heard nothing of
Jake Ransom and the rest, but I didn't feel at all oneasy about
them, thinking that, like all other hunters, they would naterally
follow the game to any distance. But, jest when I was thinking
about them, I heard a gun, then another, and after that all got to
be as quiet as ever. I looked to my own rifle and felt for my
knife, and put forward a little more briskly. I suppose I had
walked an hour after this, when it came on close dark, and I was
still four good miles from the block. The night was cloudy,
there were no stars, and the feeling in the air was damp and
oncomfortable
.
I began to wish I was safe home, and felt queerish,
almost as bad as I did when the b'ar was 'bracing me; but it
warn't so much the body-sickness as the heart-sickness. I felt as
if something was going wrong. Jest as this feeling was most
worrisome
,
I stumbled over a human. My blood cruddled, when,
feeling about, I put my hand on his head, and found the sculp
was gone. Then I knew there was mischief. I couldn't make
out who 'twas that was under me, but I reckoned 'twas one of
the hunters. There was nothing to be done but to push for'ad.
I didn't feel any more tire. I felt ready for fight, and when I
thought of our wives and children in the block, and what might
become of them, I got wolfish, though the Lord only knows what
I was minded to do. I can't say I had any raal sensible thoughts
of what was to be done in the business. I didn't trust myself to
think whether the Indians had been to the block yet or no; though
ugly notions came across me when I remembered how we let the
women and children go about to the farms. I was in a complete
fever and agy. I scorched one time and shivered another, but I
pushed on, for there was now no more feeling of tire in my limbs
than if they were made of steel. By this time I had reached
that long range of hills where I first saw that strange
campfire
,
now eleven years gone, that turned out to be a deception, and
it was nateral enough that the thing should come fresh into my
mind, jest at that moment. While I was thinking over the wonder,
and asking myself, as I had done over and often before, what it
possibly could mean, I reached the top of one of the hills, from
which I could see, in daylight, the whole country for a matter of
ten miles or more on every side. What was my surprise, do you
reckon, when there, jest on the very same hill opposite where I
had seen that apparition of a camp, I saw another, and this time
it was a raal one. There was a rousing blaze, and though the
woods and undergrowth were thicker on this than on the other
side, from which I had seen it before, yet I could make out that
there were several figures, and them Indians. It sort o' made
me easier to see the enemy before, and then I could better tell
what I had to do. I was to spy out the camp, see what the
red-devils
were thinking to do, and what they had already done. I
was a little better scout and hunter this time than when I made
the same sort o' search before, and I reckoned that I could get
nigh enough to see all that was going on, without stirring up any
dust among 'em. But I had to keep the dogs back. I couldn't
tie 'em up, for they'd howl; so I stripped my hunting-shirt and
put it down for one to guard, and I gave my cap and horn
to another. I knew they'd never leave 'em, for I had l'arned
'em all that sort of businessto watch as well as to fetch and
carry. I then said a sort of short running prayer, and took the
trail. I had to work for'ad slowly. If I had gone on this time
as I did in that first camp transaction, I'd ha' lost my sculp to
a sartainty. Well, to shorten a long business, I tell you that I
got nigh enough, without scare or surprise, to see all that I cared
to see, and a great deal more than I wished to see; and now, for
the first time, I saw the meaning of that sight which I had, eleven
years before, of the camp that come to nothing. I saw that first
sight over again, the Indians round the fire, a young woman in
the middle, and that young woman my own daughter, my child,
my poor, dear Lucy!
CHAPTER VIII.
That
was a sight for a father. I can't tell youand I won't
tryhow I felt. But I lay there, resting upon my hands and
knees, jest as if I had been turned into stone with looking. I lay
so for a good half hour, I reckon, without stirring a limb; and you
could only tell that life was in me, by seeing the big drops that
squeezed out of my eyes now and then, and by a sort of shivering
that shook me as you sometimes see the canebrake shaking with
the gust of the pond inside. I tried to pray to God for help, but I
couldn't pray, and as for thinking, that was jest as impossible.
But I could do nothing by looking, and, for that matter, it was
pretty cla'r to me, as I stood, with no helpby myselfone rifle
only and knifeI couldn't do much by moving. I could have
lifted the gun, and in a twinkle- tumbled the best fellow in the
gang, but what good was that guine to do me? I was never fond
of blood-spilling, and if I could have been made sure of my
daughter, I'd ha' been willing that the red devils should have had
leave to live for ever. What was I to do? Go to the block?
Who know'd if it warn't taken, with every soul in it? And
where else was I to look for help? Nowhere, nowhere but to
God! I groanedI groaned so loud that I was dreadful 'feared
that they'd hear me; but they were too busy among themselves,
eating supper, and poor Lucy in the midst, not eating, but so pale,
and looking so miserablejest as I had seen her, when she was
only a childin the same fix, though 'twas only an appearance
eleven years ago! Well, at last, I turned off. As I couldn't
say what to do, I was too miserable to look, and I went down to
the bottom of the hill and rolled about on the ground, pulling the
hair out of my head and groaning, as if that was to do me any
good. Before I knew where I was, there was a hand on my
shoulder. I jumped up to my feet, and flung my rifle over my
head, meaning to bring the butt down upon the strangerbut his
voice stopped me.
`Brother,' said he, `me Lenatew!'
The way he talked, his soft tones, made me know that the
young prince meant to be friendly, and I gave him my hand; but
the tears gushed out as I did so, and I cried out like a man struck
in the very heart, while I pointed to the hill`My child, my
child!'
`Be man!' said he, `come!' pulling me away.
`But, will you save her, Lenatew?'
He did not answer instantly, but led me to the little lake, and
pointed to the old tree over which I had borne his lifeless body so
many years ago. By that I knew he meant to tell me, he had not
forgotten what I had done for him; and would do for me all he
could. But this did not satisfy me. I must know how and when
it was to be done, and what was his hope; for I could see from
his caution, and leading me away from the camp, that he did not
command the party, and had no power over them. He then asked
me, if I had not seen the paint of the warriors in the camp. But I
had seen nothing but the fix of my child. He then described the
paint to me, which was his way of showing me that the party on
the hill were his deadly enemies. The paint about their eyes
was that of the great chief, his uncle, who had tried to murder
him years ago, and who had been shot, in my sight, by the party
of his father. The young chief, now in command of the band on
the hill was the son of his uncle, and sworn to revenge the death
of his father upon him, Lenatew. This he made me onderstand
in a few minutes. And he gave me farther to onderstand, that
there was no way of getting my child from them onless by
cunning
.
He had but two followers with him, and they were even
then busy in making preparations. But of these preparations he
either would not or could not give me any account; and I had to
wait on him with all the patience I could muster; and no easy
trial it was, for an Indian is the most cool and slow-moving
creature
in the world, unless he's actually fighting, and then he's
about the quickest. After awhile, Lenatew led me round the
hill. We fetched a pretty smart reach, and before I knew where
I was, he led me into a hollow that I had never seen before. Here,
to my surprise, there were no less than twelve or fourteen horses
fastened, that these red devils had stolen from the settlement that
very day, and mine was among, them. I did not know it till the
young prince told me.
`Him soon move,' said he, pointing to one on the outside,
which a close examination showed me to be my own`Him soon
move,'and these words gave me a notion of his plan. But he
did not allow me to have any hand in itnot jest then, at least.
Bidding me keep a watch on the fire above, for the hollow in which
we stood was at the foot of the very hill the Indians had made
their camp onthough the stretch was a long one betweenhe
pushed for'ad like a shadow, and so slily, so silently, that, though I
thought myself a good deal of a scout before, I saw then that I warn't
fit to hold a splinter to him. In a little time he had unhitched my
horse, and quietly led him farther down the hollow, half round
the hill, and then up the opposite hill. There was very little
noise, the wind was from the camp, and, though they didn't show
any alarm, I was never more scary in my life. I followed
Lenatew
,
and found where he had fastened my nag. He had placed
him several hundred yards from the Indians, on his way to the
block; and, where we now stood, owing to the bend of the hollow,
the camp of the Indians was between us and where they had
hitched the stolen horses. When I saw this, I began to guess
something of his plan. Meantime, one after the other, his two
followers came up, and made a long report to him in their own
language. This done, he told me that three of my hunting
companions
had been sculped, the other, who was Hugh Darling, had
got off cl'ar, though fired upon twice, and had alarmed the block,
and that my daughter had been made prisoner at the farm to
which she had gone without any company. This made me a
little
easier, and Lenatew then told me what he meant to do. In
course, I had to do something myself towards it. Off he went,
with his two men, leaving me to myself. When I thought they
had got pretty fairly round the hill, I started back for the camp,
trying my best, you may be sure, to move as slily as Lenatew.
I got within twenty-five yards, I reckon, when I thought it better
to lie by quietly and wait. I could see every head in the huddle,
and my poor child among them, looking whiter than a sheet,
beside
their ugly painted skins. Well, I hadn't long to wait, when
there was such an uproar among the stolen horses in the hollow
on the opposite side of the hillsuch a trampling, such a whinnying
and whickering, you never heard the like. Now, you must know,
that a stolen horse, to an Indian, is jest as precious as a
sweet-heart
to a white man; and when the rumpus reached the camp,
there was a rush of every man among them, for his critter.
Every redskin, but one, went over the hill after the horses, and he
jumped up with the rest, but didn't move off. He stood over poor
Lucy with his tomahawk, shaking it above her head, as if guine
to strike every minute. She, poor childI could see her as plain
as the fire-light, for she sat jest on one side of ither hands were
clasped together. She was praying, for she must have looked
every minute to be knocked on the head. You may depend, I
found it very hard to keep in. I was a'most biling over, the more
when I saw the red devil making his flourishes, every now and
then, close to the child's ears, with his bloody we'pon. But it
was a needcessity to keep in till the sounds died off pretty much,
so as not to give them any scare this side, till they had dashed
ahead pretty far 'pon the other. I don't know that I waited quite
as long as I ought to, but I waited as long as my feelings would
let me, and then I dropped the sight of my rifle as close as I could
fix it on the breast of the Indian that had the keeping of my child.
I took aim, but I felt I was a little tremorsome, and I stopped. I
know'd I had but one shoot, and if I didn't onbutton him in that
one, it would be a bad shoot for poor Lucy. I didn't fear to hit
her,
and I was pretty sure I'd hit him. But it must be a dead
shot to do good, for I know'd if I only hurt him, that he'd sink the
tomahawk in her head with what strength he had left him. I
brought myself to it again, and this time I felt strong. I could
jest hear a little of the hubbub of men and horses afar off. I knew
it was the time, and, resting the side of the muzzle against a tree,
I give him the whole blessing of the bullet. I didn't stop to ask
what luck, but run in, with a sort o' cry, to do the finishing with
the knife. But the thing was done a'ready. The beast was on
his back, and I only had to use the knife in cutting the vines that
fastened the child to the sapling behind her. The brave gal
didn't scream or faint. She could only say, `Oh, my father!'
and I could only say, `Oh! my child!' And what a precious
hug followed; but it was only for a minute. We had no time to
waste in hugging. We pushed at once for the place where I had
left the critter, and if the good old nag ever used his four shanks
to any purpose, he did that night. I reckon it was a joyful
surprise
to poor Betsy when we broke into the block. She had given
it out for sartin that she'd never see me or the child again, with
a nateral sculp on our heads.
CHAPTER IX.
There's
no need to tell you the whole story of this war
between
our people and the redskins. It's enough that I tell you
of what happened to us, and our share in it. Of the great affair,
and all the fights and burnings, you'll find enough in the printed
books and newspapers. What I tell you, though you can't find it
in any books, is jest as true, for all that. Of our share in it, the
worst has already been told you. The young chief, Oloschottee
for that was his namethe cousin and the enemy of Lenatew,
had command of the Indians that were to surprise our settlements;
and though he didn't altogether do what he expected and intended,
he worked us quite enough of mischief as it was. He soon put
fire to all our farms to draw us out of the block, but finding that
wouldn't do, he left us; for an Indian gets pretty soon tired of a
long siege where there is neither rum nor blood to git drunk on.
His force was too small to trouble us in the block, and so he
drawed off his warriors, and we saw no more of him until the
peace. That followed pretty soon after General Middleton gave
the nation that licking at Echotee,a licking, I reckon, that they'll
remember long after my day. At that affair Lenatew got an
ugly bullet in his throat, and if it hadn't been for one of his men,
he'd ha' got a bag'net in his breast. They made a narrow run
with him, head foremost down the hill, with a whole swad of the
mounted men from the low country at their heels. It was some
time after the peace before he got better of his hurt, though the
Indians are naterally more skilful in cures than white men. By
this time we had all gone home to our farms, and had planted and
rebuilt, and begun to forget our troubles, when who should pop
into our cabin one day, but Lenatew. He had got quite well
of his hurts. He was a monstrous fine-looking fellow, tall and
handsome, and he was dressed in his very best. He wore
pantaloons
,
like one of us, and his hunting shirt was a raally fine blue,
with a white fringe. He wore no paint, and was quite nice and
neat with his person. We all received him as an old friend, and
he stayed with us three days. Then he went, and was gone for
a matter of two weeks, when he came back and stayed with us
another three days. And so, off and on, he came to visit us,
until
Betsy said to me one day, `Daniel, that Indian, Lenatew,
comes here after Lucy. Leave a woman to guess these things.'
After she told me, I recollected that the young prince was quite
watchful of Lucy, and would follow her out into the garden, and
leave us, to walk with her. But then, again, I thought`What
if he is favourable to my daughter? The fellow's a good fellow;
and a raal, noble-hearted Indian, that's sober, is jest as good, to
my thinking, as any white man in the land.` But Betsy wouldn't
hear to it. `Her daughter never should marry a savage, and a
heathen, and a redskin, while her head was hot:'and while her
head was so hot, what was I to do? All I could say was this
only, `Don't kick, Betsy, till you're spurred. 'Twill be time
enough to give the young Chief his answer when he asks the
question; and it won't do for us to treat him rudely, when we
consider how much we owe him.' But she was of the mind that
the boot was on the other leg,that it was he and not us that
owed the debt; and all that I could do couldn't keep her from
showing the lad a sour face of it whenever he came. But he didn't
seem much to mind this, since I was civil and kind to him. Lucy
too, though her mother warned her against him, always treated
him civilly as I told her; though she naterally would do so, for
she couldn't so easily forget that dreadful night when she was a
prisoner in the camp of the enimy, not knowing what to expect,
with an Indian tomahawk over her head, and saved, in great part,
by the cunning and courage of this same Lenatew. The girl
treated him kindly, and I was not sorry she did so. She walked
and talked with him jest as if they had been brother and sister,
and he was jest as polite to her as if he had been a born
Frenchman
.
You may be sure, it was no pleasant sight to my wife to see
them two go out to walk. `Daniel Nelson,' said she, `do you see
and keep an eye on those people. There's no knowing what may
happen. I do believe that Lucy has a liking for that redskin,
and should they run!'`Psho!' said I,but that wouldn't do for
her, and so she made me watch the young people sure enough.
'Twarn't a business that I was overfond of, you may reckon, but
I was a rough man and didn't know much of woman natur'. I left
the judgment of such things to my wife, and did pretty much what
she told me. Whenever they went out to walk, I followed them,
rifle in hand; but it was only to please Betsy, for if I had seen
the lad running off with the girl, I'm pretty sure, I'd never ha'
been the man to draw trigger upon him. As I said before,
Lenatew
was jest as good a husband as she could have had. But,
poor fellow, the affair was never to come to that. One day,
after
he had been with us almost a week, he spoke softly to Lucy,
and she got up, got her bonnet and went out with him. I didn't
see them when they started, for I happened to be in the upper
story,a place where we didn't so much live, but where we used
to go for shelter and defence whenever any Indians came about
us. `Daniel,' said my wife, and I knew by the quickness and
sharpness of her voice what 'twas she had to tell me. But jest
then I was busy, and, moreover, I didn't altogether like the sort
of business upon which she wanted me to go. The sneaking after
an enimy, in raal warfare, is an onpleasant sort of thing enough;
but this sneaking after one that you think your friend is worse than
running in a fair fight, and always gave me a sheepish feeling
after it. Besides, I didn't fear Lenatew, and I didn't fear my
daughter. It's true, the girl treated him kindly and sweetly, but
that was owing to the nateral sweetness of her temper, and
because
she felt how much sarvice he had been to her and all of
us. So, instead of going out after them, I thought I'd give them
a look through one of the loop-holes. Well, there they went,
walking among the trees, not far from the picket, and no time out
of sight. As I looked at them, I thought to myself, `Would n't
they make a handsome couple!' Both of them were tall and well
made. As for Lucy, there wasn't, for figure, a finer set girl in
all the settlement, and her face was a match for her figure. And
then she was so easy in her motion, so graceful, and walked, or
sate, or danced,jest, for all the world, as if she was born only
to do the particular thing she was doing. As for Lenatew, he
was a lad among a thousand. Now, a young Indian warrior,
when he don't drink, is about the noblest-looking creature, as he
carries himself in he woods, that God ever did make. So straight,
so proud, so stately, always as if he was doing a great action
as if he knew the whole world was looking at him. Lenatewa
was pretty much the handsomest and noblest Indian I had ever
seen; and then, I know'd him to be raally so noble. As they
walked together, their heads a little bent downwards, and Lucy's
pretty low, the thought flashed across me that, jest then, he was
telling her all about his feelings; and perhaps, said I to myself,
the girl thinks about it pretty much as I do. Moutbe now, she
likes him better than any body she has ever seen, and what more
nateral? Then I thought, if there is any picture in this life more
sweet and beautiful than two young people jest beginning to feel
love for one another, and walking together in the innocence of
their hearts, under the shady trees,I've never seen it! I laid
the rifle on my lap, and sat down on the floor and watched 'em
through the loop until I felt the water in my eyes. They walked
backwards and for'ads, not a hundred yards off, and I could see
all their motions, though I couldn't hear their words. An Indian
don't use his hands much generally, but I could see that
Lenatew
was using his,not a great deal, but as if he felt every
word he was saying. Then I began to think, what was I to do,
if so be he was raally offering to marry Lucy, and she willing!
How was I to do? what was I to say?how could I refuse him
when I was willing? how could I say `yes,' when Betsy said
`no!'
Well, in the midst of this thinking, what should I hear but a
loud cry from the child, then a loud yell,a regular war-whoop,
sounded right in front, as if it came from Lenatew himself.
I looked up quickly, for, in thinking, I had lost sight of them, and
was only looking at my rifle; I looked out, and there, in the
twinkle of an eye, there was another sight. I saw my daughter
flat upon the ground, lying like one dead, and Lenatew
staggering
back as if he was mortally hurt; while, pressing fast upon
him, was an Indian warrior, with his tomahawk uplifted, and
striking
once,
twice, three timeshard and heavy, right upon the
face and forehead of the young prince. From the black paint on
his face, and the red ring about his eyes, and from his figure and
the eagle feathers in his head, I soon guessed it was Oloschottee,
and I then knew it was the old revenge for the killing of his
father
;
for an Indian never forgets that sort of obligation. Of
course, I didn't stand quiet to see an old friend, like Lenatew
tumbled in that way, without warning, like a bullock; and there
was my own daughter lying flat, and I wasn't to know that he
hadn't struck her too. It was only one motion for me to draw
sight upon the savage, and another to pull trigger; and I reckon
he dropped jest as soon as the young Chief. I gave one whoop
for all the world as if I was an Indian myself, and run out to the
spot; but Lenatew had got his discharge from further service.
He warn't exactly dead, but his sense was swimming. He
couldn't say much, and that warn't at all to the purpose. I
could hear him, now and then, making a sort of singing noise,
but that was soon swallowed up in a gurgle and a gasp, and it
was all over. My bullet was quicker in its working than
Oloschottee's
hatchet; he was stone dead before I got to him. As for
poor Lucy, she was not hurt, either by bullet or hatchet; but
she had a hurt in the heart, whether from the scare she had, or
because she had more feeling for the young prince than we
reckoned
,
there's no telling. She warn't much given to smiling after
that. But, whether she loved Lenatew, we couldn't know, and
I never was the man to ask her. It's sartain she never married,
and she had about as many chances, and good ones, too, as any
girl in our settlement. You've seen hersome among you
and warn't she a beautythough I say it myselfthe very
flower of the forest!
THE LAST WAGER,
OR THE GAMESTER OF THE MISSISSIPPI.
CHAPTER I.
I have set my life upon a cast,
And I will stand the hazard of the die.
Shakspeare
.
Our
story will be found to illustrate one of the current
commonplaces
of the day. Ever since my Lord Byron, in that poem
of excellently expressed commonplaces, Don Juan, declared that
truth was stranger than fiction, every newspaper witling rings
the changes upon the theme, until there is no relief to its
dull-toned
dissonance. That truth should frequently be found to be
much stranger than any fiction, is neither so strange nor out of
the course of things; but is just in accordance, if we bestow any
thought upon the matter, with the deliberate convictions of every
reasoning mind. For, what is fiction, but the nice adaptation,
by an artist, of certain ordinary occurrences in life, to a natural
and probable conclusion? It is not the policy of a good artist to
deal much in the merely extravagant. His real success, and the
true secret of it, is to be found in the
naturalness
of his story, its
general seemliness, and the close resemblance of its events to
those which may or must take place in all instances of individuals
subjected to like influences with those who figure in his narrative.
The naturalness must be that of life as it is, or with life as it is
shown in such picturesque situations as are probableseemingly
realand such as harmonize equally with the laws of nature,
and such as the artist has chosen for his guide. Except in
stories
of broad extravaganceghost stories for examplein which
the one purpose of the romancerthat of exciting wonderis
declared
at the outsetexcept in such stories, or in others of the
broad grinsuch as are common and extravagant enough among
the frontier
raconteurs
of the West, it were the very worst policy
in the world for a writer of fiction to deal much in the marvellous.
He would soon wear out the patience of the reader, who would
turn away, with a dissatisfaction almost amounting to disgust, from
any author who should be found too frequently to employ what is
merely possible in human progress. We require as close
reasoning
,
and deductions as logically drawn, in tale and novel, as
in a case at law or in equity; much more close, indeed, than is
often found to be the case in a Congressional harangue, and a far
more tenacious regard to the
interest
of the reader than is shown
in the report of a modern secretary. Probability, unstrained,
must be made apparent at every step; and if the merely possible
be used at all, it must be so used only, as, in looking like the
probable, it is made to lose all its ambiguous characteristics.
What we show must not only be the truth, but it must also seem
like the truth; for, as the skill of the artist can sometimes enable
him to make what is false appear true, so it is equally the case,
that a want of skill may transmute the most unquestionable truth
into something that nine persons in ten shall say, when they
behold
it, it looks monstrous like a lie!
That we are not at liberty to use too freely what is merely
possible
in the material brought before us, is a fact more
particularly
known to painters, who have often felt the danger of any attempt
to paint the sky as it sometimes appears to them. They dread to
offend the suspicious incredulity of the cold and unobserving
citizen
.
They see, with equal amazement and delightbut without
daring to delineatethose intenser hues and exquisite gradations
of light and shadow, those elaborate and graceful shapes of cloud,
born of the rainbowcarnation, green and purple, which the sun
sometimes, in fantastic mood, and as if in equal mockery of
human
faith and art, makes upon the lovely background of the sky
which he leaves at setting. The beautiful vision gone from sight,
who would believe the poor artist, whatever his accuracy and
felicity
of touch and taste, who had endeavoured to transfer, before
it faded, the vanishing glory to his canvass? Who could suppose,
and how admit, that there had ever been such a panorama, of
such super-artistical splendour, displayed before his eyes, without
commanding his admiration and fixing his attention? The very
attempt to impose such an exhibition upon him as natural, would
be something of a sarcasm, and a commentary upon the dull eye
and drowsy mind which had failed to discern it for themselves.
Nay, though the artist grappled the dull citizen by the arm at the
very instant, and compelled his gaze upon the glorious vision ere it
melted into the thin gray haze of evening, would he not be apt to
say, How strange! how very unnatural! Certainly, it would
be a nature and a truth infinitely more strange than the most
audacious fiction that ever grew up at the touch of the most
fantastic
votary of art.
CHAPTER II.
The
sketch which I propose will scarcely justify this long
digression
;
and its character will be still less likely to correspond with
the somewhat poetic texture of the introduction. It is simply a
strange narrative of frontier life; one of those narratives in which
a fact will appear very doubtful, unless the artist shall exhibit
such sufficient skill in his elaborations, as to keep its rude points
from offending too greatly the suspicious judgment of the reader.
This is the task before me. The circumstances were picked up,
when, a lad of eighteen, I first wandered over the then dreary and
dangerous wastes of the Mississippi border. Noble, indeed, though
wild and savage, was the aspect of that green forest country, as
yet only slightly smitten by the sharp edges of the ranger's axe.
I travelled along the great Yazoo wilderness, in frequent
proximity
with the Choctaw warriors. Most frequently I rode alone.
Sometimes, a wayfarer from the East, solitary with myself, turned
his horse's head, for a few days' space, on the same track with
mine; but, in most cases, my only companion was some sullen
Choctaw, or some still more sullen half-breed, who, emerging
suddenly
from some little foot-path, would leave me half in doubt
whether his introduction would be made first with the tomahawk
or the tongue. Very few white men were then settled in the
country; still fewer were stationary. I rode forty and fifty miles
without sign of human habitation, and found my bed and supper
at night most generally in the cabin of the half-breed. But there
was one, and that a remarkable exception to this universal
necessity
;
and in this exception my story takes its rise. I had at
length reached the borders of the nation, and the turbid waters
of the Mississippi, at no great distance, flowed down towards the
Gulf. The appearances of the white settler, some doubtful
glimmerings of a more civilized region, were beginning to display
themselves. Evening was at hand. The sun was fast waning
along the mellow heights of heaven; and my heart was
beginning
to sink with the natural sense of loneliness which such a
setting is apt to inspire in the bosom of the youthful wanderer.
It was also a question with me, where I should find my pillow for
the night. My host of the night before, a low, dark-looking white
squatter, either was, or professed to be, too ignorant to give me
any information on this head, which would render the matter one
of reasonable certainty. In this doubtful and somewhat desolate
state of mind, I began to prick my steed forward at a more rapid
pace, to cast my eyes up more frequently to the fading light
among the tree-tops, and, occasionally, to send a furtive glance on
either hand, not altogether assured that my road was as safe as it
was lonely. The question where shall I find my bed
to-night
?
was beginning to be one of serious uncertainty, when I
suddenly caught a glimpse of an opening on my right, a sort of
wagon-path, avenue like, and which reminded me of those dear,
dim passages in my own Carolina, which always promised the
traveller a hot supper and happy conclusion to his wanderings of
the day. Warmed with the notion, and without a farther doubt
or thought, I wheeled my sorrel into the passage, and pressed him
forward with a keener spur. A cheery blast of the horn ahead,
and the dull heavy stroke of an axe immediately after, were so
many urgent entreaties to proceed; and now the bellow of a cow,
and next the smoke above the cottage roof-trees, assured me that
my apprehensions were at an end. In a few seconds I stood
before
one of the snuggest little habitations which ever kindled
hope and satisfied hunger.
This was one of those small log-cabins which are common to
the country. Beyond its snug, trim and tidy appearance, there
was nothing about it to distinguish it from its class. The
clearing
was small, just sufficient, perhaps, for a full supply of corn
and provisions. But the area in front of the dwelling was
cleanly
swept, and the trees were trimmed, and those which had been
left were evergreens, and so like favourite domestics, with such
an air of grace, and good-nature, and venerableness about them,
that one's heart warmed to see them, as at sight of one of the
old familiar faces. The aspect of the dwelling within consisted
happily with that without. Every thing was so neat, and snug,
and comfortable.
The windows were sashed and glassed, and hung with the
whitest curtains of cotton, with fringes fully a foot deep. The
floors were neatly sanded, the hearth was freshly brightened with
the red ochrous clay of the country, and chairs and tables,
though made of the plainest stuffs, and by a very rude mechanic,
were yet so clean, neat and well-arranged, that the eye
involuntarily
surveyed them again and again with a very pleased
sensation
.
Nor was this all in the shape of unwonted comforts. Some
other matters were considered in this cottage, which are scarcely
even dreamed of in the great majority. In one corner of the
hall stood a hat-stand; in another there were pins for cloaks;
above the fire-place hung a formidable rifle, suspended upon
tenter-hooks made of three monstrous antlers, probably those of
gigantic bucks which had fallen beneath the weapon which they
were now made to sustain. Directly under this instrument, and
the only object beside which had been honoured with a place so
conspicuous,
was a pack of ordinary playing cards
not hung or
suspended against the wall,
but nailed to it;
driven through and
through with a tenpenny nail, and so fastened to the solid log, the
black head of the nail showing with particular prominence in
contrast with the red spot of the ace of hearts, through which it
had been driven. Of this hereafter. On this pack of cards
hangs my story. It is enough, in this place, to add, that it was
only after supper was fairly over, that my eyes were drawn to
this very unusual sort of chimney decoration.
At the door of the cottage sat a very venerable old man,
between
seventy and eighty. His hair was all white, but still thick,
betraying the strength of his constitution and the excellence of
his health. His skin was florid, glowing through his white beard,
which might have been three days old, and his face bore the
burden
of very few wrinkles. He had a lively, clear blue eye, and
good-humour played about his mouth in every movement of his
lips. He was evidently one of those fortunate men, whose
winters
,
if frosty, had always proved kindly. A strong man in his
youth, he was now but little bent with years; and when he stood
up, I was quite ashamed to find he was rather more erect than
myself, and quite as tall. This was the patriarch of the family,
which consisted of three members besides himself. The first of
these was his only son, a man thirty-eight or forty years of age,
of whom it will be quite explicit enough to say, that the old man,
in his youth, must very nearly have resembled him. Then, there
was the wife of the son, and her son, a lad now ten years old, a
smart-looking lad enough, but in no wise resembling his male
parent. Instead of the lively, twinkling blue eye of his father, he
had the dark, deep, oriental sad ones of the mother; and his
cheeks were rather pale than rosy, rather thin than full; and his
hair was long, black and silky, in all respects the counterpart of
his mother's. A brief description of this lady may assist us in
our effort to awaken the interest of the reader.
Conducted into the house by the son, and warmly welcomed by
the old man as well as himself, I was about to advance with the
bold dashing self-possession of a young cavalier, confident in his
course, and accustomed to win golden opinions of all sorts of
people. But my bold carriage and sanguine temper were
suddenly
checked, not chilled, by the appearance of the lady in front
of whom I suddenly stood. She sat beside the fireplace, and was
so very different a looking person from any I had expected to see
in such a region, that the usual audacity of my temperament was
all at once abashed. In place of the good, cheerful, buxom, plain
country housewife whom I looked to see, mending Jacky's
breeches
,
or knitting the good-man's hose, I found myself confronted by
a dame whose aristocratic, high-bred, highly composed, easy and
placid demeanour, utterly confounded me. Her person was
small, her complexion darkly oriental, her eye flashing with all
the spiritual fires of that region; habitually bright and searching,
even while the expression of her features would have made her
seem utterly emotionless. Never did features, indeed, appear so
thoroughly inflexible. Her beauty,for she was all beauty,was
not, however, the result of any regularity of feature. Beauties of her
order, brunette and piquant, are most usually wanting in
preciseness
,
and mutual dependance and sympathy of outline. They
are beautiful in spite of irregularity, and in consequence of the
paramount exquisiteness of some particular feature. The charm
of the face before me grew out of the piercing, deep-set, and
singularly
black eye, and the wonderful vitality about the lips. Never
was mouth so small, or so admirably delineated. There was
witchcraft enough in the web of it to make my own lips water.
But I speak like the boy I was then, and am no longer.
Let me not be understood to mean that there was any levity,
any lightness of character betrayed in the expression of those lips.
Very far otherwise. While soft, sweet, beautiful, and full of
life, they were the most sacred and sad-looking forms,drooping
blossoms of beauty, mourning, as it would seem, because beauty
does not imply immortality; and this expression led me to
observe
more closely the character of the eye, the glance of which,
at first, had only seemed to denote the brilliance of the diamond,
shining through an atmosphere of jet. I now discerned that its
intense blaze was not its only character. It was marked with the
weight of tears, that, freezing as they had birth, maintained their
place in defiance of the light to which they were constantly
exposed
.
It was the brightness of the ice palace, in the Northern
Saga, which, in reflecting the bright glances of Balder, the God
of Day, still gives defiance to the fervour of his beams.
But a truce to these frigid comparisons, which suit any age
but ours. Enough to say that the lady was of a rare and
singular
beauty, with a character of face and feature not common
to our country, and with a deportment seldom found in the homely
cabin of the woodman or the squatter. The deep and
unequivocal
sadness which marked her looks, intense as it was, did not
affect or impair the heightened aristocratic dignity of her subdued
and perfectly assured manner. To this manner did she seem to
have been born; and, being habitual, it is easy to understand that
she could not be divested of it, except in a very small degree, by
the pressure of any form of affliction. You could see that there
had been affliction, but its effect was simply to confirm that
elevated
social tone, familiar to all mental superiority, which seems,
however it may feel, to regard the confession of its griefs as
perhaps
something too merely human to be altogether becoming in a
confessedly superior caste. Whether the stream was only frozen
over, or most effectually crystallized, it does not suit our purpose
to inquire. It is, at all events, beyond my present ability to
determine
the doubt.
She was introduced to me, by the husband, as Mrs. Rayner. I
afterwards discovered that her Christian name was Rachel; a
circumstance that tended to strengthen the impression in my mind
that she might be of Jewish parents. That she was a Christian
herself, I had reason to believe, from her joining freely and
devoutly
,
and on bended knee, in the devotions of the night. She
spoke seldom, yet looked intelligence throughout the conversation,
which was carried on freely between the old man, the husband,
and myself. When she spoke, her words and accents were
marked by the most singular propriety. There was nothing in
her utterance to lessen the conviction that she was familiar with
the most select circles of city life; and I could see that the
husband
listened to her with a marked deference, and, though
himself
,
evidently, a rough honest backwoodsman, I detected him, in
one or two instances, checking the rude phrase upon his lips, and
substituting for it some other, more natural to the ear of
civilization
and society. There was a touching something in the
meekness
and quiet deportment of the boy who sat by his mother's
knee in silence, her fingers turning in his hair, while he
diligently
pored over some little trophy of juvenile literature, looking
up timidly at moments, and smiling sadly, when he met the deep
earnest gaze of the mother's eyes, as she seemed to forget all
around in the glance at the one object. I need not say that there
was something in this family picture so entirely out of the
common
run of my woodland experience in the Southwest, at that
early day, that I felt my curiosity equally excited with my
pleasure
.
I felt assured that there was something of a story to be
learned, which would amply recompense the listener. The old
patriarch was himself a studythe husband a very noble
specimen
of the sturdy, frank, elastic frontier-mana race too often
confounded with the miserable runagates by whom the first
explorations
of the country are begun, but who seldom make the
real axe-marks of the wilderness. You could see at a glance
that he was just the man whom a friend could rely upon and a
foe most fearfrank, ardent, firm, resolute in endurance, patient,
perhaps, and slow to anger, as are all noble-minded persons who
have a just confidence in their own strength; but unyielding
when the field is to be fought, and as cheerful in the moment
of danger as he was good-humoured in that of peace. Every
thing in his look, language and bearing, answered to this
description
;
and I sat down at the supper table beside him that night, as
familiar and as much at my ease as if we had jumped together
from the first moment of existence.
I pass over much of the conversation preceding, and at the
evening repast; for, though interesting enough at the time,
particularly
to me, it would only delay us still longer in the approach
to our story. It was after the table had been withdrawn, when
the family were all snugly huddled about the fireplace, and the
dialogue, which had been rather brisk before, had begun to flag,
that I casually looked up over the chimney-place, and
discovered
,
for the first time, the singular ornament of which I have
already
spoken. Doubtful of what I saw, I rose to my feet, and
grasped the object with my fingers. I fancied that some
eccentric
forest genius, choosing for his subject one of the great agents
of popular pastime in the West, might have succeeded in a
delineation
sufficiently felicitous, as, at a short distance, to baffle
any vision. But, palpable, the realI had almost said, the
living
things
were there, unlike the dagger of Macbeth, as
sensible
to feeling as to sight. A complete pack of cards, none of
the cleanest, driven through with a tenpenny nail, the ace of
hearts, as before said, being the top card, and very fairly
covering
the retinue of its own and the three rival houses. The
corners
of the cards were curled, and the ends smoked to partial
blackness. They had evidently been in that situation for several
years. I turned inquiringly to my hosts
You have a very singular ornament for your mantleplace,
Mr. Rayner; was my natural remark, the expression of
curiosity
in my face being coupled with an apologetic sort of smile.
But it met with no answering smiles from any of the family.
On the contrary, every face was grave to sadness, and in a
moment
more Mrs. Rayner rose and left the room. As soon as she
was gone, her husband remarked as follows:
Why, yes, sir, it is uncommon; but there's a reason why
it's there, which I'll explain to you after we've gone through
prayers
.
By this time the wife had returned, bringing with her the
family
Bible, which she now laid upon a stand beside the venerable
elder. He, good old man, with an action that seemed to be
perfectly
7
habitual, drew forth the spectacles from the sacred pages,
where they seemed to have been left from the previous evening,
and commenced reading the third chapter of Ecclesiastes,
beginning
,
Hear me, your father, O children! and do thereafter, that
ye may be safe. Then, this being read, we all sunk devoutly
upon our knees, and the patriarch put up as sweet and fervent a
prayer as I should ever wish to listen to. The conceited
whipster
of the school might have found his pronunciation vulgar, and
his sentences sometimes deficient in grammatical nicety; but the
thought
was there, and the
heart,
and the ears of perfect wisdom
might well be satisfied with the good sense and the true morality
of all that was spoken. We rose refreshed, and, after a lapse of
a very few moments which were passed in silence, the wife,
leading
the little boy by the hand, with a kind nod and courtesy took
her leave, and retired to her chamber. Sweetness and dignity were
most happily blended in her parting movements; but I fancied,
as I caught the glance of her eye, that there had been a
freshening
and overflowing there of the deep and still gathering
fountains
.
Her departure was followed by that of the old man, and
the husband and myself were left alone. It was not long after
this, before he, himself, without waiting for any suggestion of mine,
brought up the subject of the cards, which had been so
conspicuously
elevated into a mantel ornament.
CHAPTER III.
Stranger,
said he, there is a sort of history in those cards
which I am always happy to tell to any young man that's a
beginner
in the world like yourself. I consider them as a sort of
Bible, for, when I look at them and remember all that I know
concerning them, I feel as if I was listening to some prime
sermon
,
or may be, hearing just such a chapter as the old man read
to us out of the good book to-night. It's quite a long history, and
I'll put on a fresh handful of lightwood before I begin.
The interruption was brief, and soon overcome, and the
narrative
of the husband ran as follows:
It is now, said he, going on to twelve years since the
circumstances
took place which belong to the story of those cards,
and I will have to carry you back to that time before you can
have a right knowledge of what I want to tell. I was then pretty
much such a looking person as you now see me, for I haven't
undergone much change. I was a little sprightlier, perhaps
always famous for light-headedness and laughingfond of fun
and frolic, but never doing any thing out of mischief and bad
humour
.
The old man, my father, too, was pretty much the same.
We lived here where you find us now, but not quite so snugly
offnot so well settledrather poor, I may say, though still with
a plentiful supply to live on and keep warm and feel lively.
There was only us two, and we had but two workers, a man and
woman, and they had two children, who could do nothing for us
and precious little for themselves. But we were snug, and
worked steadily, and were comfortable. We didn't make much
money, but we always spent less than we made. We didn't have
very nice food, but we had no physic to take, and no doctor's bills
to pay. We had a great deal to make us happy, and still more
to be thankful for; and I trust in God we were thankful for all
of his blessings. I think we were, for he gave us other blessings;
and for these, stranger, we are trying to be thankful also.
Well, as I was saying, about twelve years ago, one hot day
in August, I rode out a little piece towards the river bluff to see
if any goods had been left for us at the landing. We had heard
the steamboat gun the night before, or something like it, and that,
you know, is the signal to tell us when to look after our
plunder
.
When I got there I found a lot of things, some for us, and some
for other people. There was a bag of coffee, a keg of sugar,
three sacks of salt, and a box of odds and ends for us. But the
chaps on board the steamboatwhich was gonehad thrown
down the stuff any where, and some of the salt was half melted
in a puddle of water. I turned in, and hauled it out of the
water
,
and piled it up in a dry place. What was wet belonged
chiefly to our neighbours, and the whole of it might have been
lost if I had not got there in season. This kept me a good hour,
and as I had no help, and some of the sacks were large and
heavy
,
I was pretty nigh tired out when the work was done. So I
took a rest of half an hour more in the shade. The heat was
powerful, and I had pretty nigh been caught by sleepI don't
know but I did sleep, for in midsummer one's not always sure of
himself in a drowsy momentwhen I was suddenly roused up
by a noise most like the halloo of a person in distress. I took the
saddle on the spur, and went off in the quarter that the sound
came from. It so happened that my route homeward lay the
same way, and on the river road, the only public road in the
settlement
;
and I had only gone two hundred yards or thereabout,
when, in turning an elbow of the path, I came plump upon a
stranger, who happened to be the person whom I heard calling.
He was most certainly in distress. His horse was flat upon his
side, groaning powerfully, and the man was on his knees, rubbing
the creature's legs with a pretty hard hand. A little way behind
him lay a dead rattlesnake, one of the largest I ever did see,
counting twenty-one rattles besides the button; and the sight of
the snake told me the whole story. I jumped down to see what
I could do in the way of help, but I soon discovered that the nag
had the spasms, and was swelled up to her loins. I however cut
into her leg with my knife, just where she was bitten, and when
I had dug out the poisoned flesh, as much as I thought was
reasonable
,
I got on my horse and rode back to the salt bags at full
speed, and brought away a double handful of the salt. I rubbed
it into the animal's wound, I really believe, a few minutes after
she had groaned her last and stiffened out, but I wasn't rubbing
very long. She was about the soonest killed of any creature
that I ever saw snakebit before.
It was only after I was done with the mare, that I got a fair
look at her owner. He was a small and rather oldish man, with
a great stoop of the shoulders, with a thin face, glossy black
hair, and eyes black too, but shining as bright, I reckon, as those
of the rattlesnake he had killed. They had a most strange and
troublesome brightness, that made me look at them whether
I would or not. His face was very pale, and the wrinkles were
deep, like so many seams, and, as I have said, he was what I
would call a rather oldish man; but still he was very nicely
dressed, and wore a span-new velvet vest, a real English
broad-cloth
coat, gold watch with gold seals; and every now and then
he pulled out a snuff-box made like a horn, with a curl at the
end of it, which was also set with a gold rim, and had a cap
of the same precious stuff upon it. He was taking snuff every
moment while I was doctoring his mare, and when the creature
went dead, he offered it to me; but I had always thought it work
enough to feed my mouth, and had no notion of making another
mouth of my nose, so I refused him civilly.
He didn't seem to be much worried by the death of his
creature, and when I told him how sorry I was on his account,
he answered quickly,
`Oh! no matter; you have a good horse; you will let me
have him; you look like a good fellow.'
I was a little surprised, you may reckon. I looked at the old
man, and then at my creature. He
was
a good creature; and
as prime an animal as ever stepped in traces; good at any thing,
plough, wagon, or saddle; as easy-going as a girl of sixteen, and
not half so skittish. I had no notion of giving him up to a
stranger
,
you may be sure, and didn't half like the cool, easy,
impudent
manner with which the old man spoke to me. I had no
fearsI didn't think of his taking my nag from me by force
but, of a sudden, I almost begun to think he might be a wizard,
as we read in Scripture, and hear of from the old people, or
mou't be, the old devil himself, and then I didn't well know what
I had to expect. But he soon made the matter clear to me.
Perhaps
he saw that I was a little beflustered.
`Young man,' says he, `your horse
is
a fine one. Will you
sell him? I am willing to pay you a fair pricegive you his
full value.'
There was something to consider in that. When did you ever
find a Western man unwilling for a horse-barter? Besides, though
the creature was a really first-rate nag, he was one more than I
wanted. One for the plough, and one for the saddleas the old
man didn't ride oftenwas enough for us; and we had three.
But Rainbowthat was his namewas so sleek an animal! He
could a'most do any thing that you'd tell him. I didn't want to
sell him, but I didn't want to keep a mouth too many. You know
a horse that you don't want begins by gnawing through your
pockets, and ends by eating off his own head. That's the say,
at least. But I raised Rainbow, fed him with my own hands,
curried him night and morning myself, and looked upon him as a
sort of younger brother. I hated powerful bad to part with him;
but then there was no reason to keep him when he was of no use.
'Twas a satisfaction, to be sure, to have such a creature; and
'twas a pleasure to cross him, and streak it away, at a brushing
canter, of a bright morning, for a good five miles at a stretch;
but poor people can't afford such pleasures and satisfactions; and
when I thought of the new wagon that we wanted, and such a
smart chance of other things about the farm, I looked at the old
man and thought better of his offer. I said to him, though a little
slowly,
`It's a famous fine horse this, stranger.'
`I know it,' said he; `I never saw one that better pleased my
eyes. I'll pay you a famous fine price for him.'
`What'll you give?' said I.
`Pshaw!' said he, `speak out like a man. I'm no baby,
and you are old enough to know better. What's your price?'
`He's low,' said I, `at one hundred and seventy dollars.'
`He is,' said he, `he's worth morewill you take that?'
`Yes.'
`You shall have it,' he answered, `and I'll throw the dead
horse into the bargain; she was a famous fine animal too, in
her day, and her skin's worth stuffing as a keepsake. You can
stuff it and put it up in your stables, as an example to your other
horses.'
CHAPTER IV.
All
the time he was talking, he was counting out the money,
which was almost all in gold. I was a little dub'ous that it
wasn't good money; but I smelt it, and it had no smell of brass,
and I was a leetle ashamed to let on that I didn't know good
money from bad; besides, there was a something about the old
gentleman so much like a gentleman, so easy, and so
commanding
,
that I couldn't find the heart to doubt or to dispute any thing
he said. And then, every thing about him looked like a
gentleman
:
his clothes, his hat, the watch he wore, the very dead
horse and her coverings, saddle, bridle, and so forth, all
convinced
me that there was nothing of make-believe.
`There,' said he, `my good fellow,' putting the money in my
hand, `I reckon you never handled so much gold in your life
before
.'
`No,' said I, `to tell you the truth, though I've hearn a good
deal of gold, and know it when I see it by what I've hearn, I
never set eyes on a single piece till now.'
`May it do your eyes good now, then,' said he; `you look
like a good fellow. Your horse is sound?'
`Yes,' said I, `I can answer better for him than I can for
your gold.'
`That's good.'
`Well!' said I, `I'm not sure that I've dealt fairly with you,
stranger. I've asked you a little more than I've been asking other
people. My price on Rainbow has been only one hundred and
fifty dollars, before.'
`And your conscience troubles you. You
are
an honest
fellow
,'
said he, `but never mind, my lad, I'll show you a way to
relieve it.'
With these words he pulled out a buckskin roll from his
pocket, and out of this he tumbled a pack of cards; the very
cards which you see nailed above my fireplace.
`We'll play for that twenty dollars,' said he, throwing down
two gold pieces on the body of the dead mare, and beginning to
shuffle the cards immediately. Somehow, I did as he did. I put
down two ten dollar pieces along with his. I couldn't help
myself
.
He seemed to command me. I felt scaredI felt that I
was doing wrong; but he seemed to take every thing so much
as a matter of course, that I hadn't the courage to say `no' to
any thing he did or said.
`What do you play?' said he, and he named some twenty
games of cards, some in French, I believe, and some in Spanish,
but no one of which did I know any thing about. He seemed
beflustered.
`Do you play any thing at all?' he asked.
`Yesa little of
old sledge
that's all.'
`Oh! that will do. A common game enough. I wonder I
should have omitted it. Here! you may shuffle them, and we'll
cut for deal.'
I didn't shuffle, but cut at once. He cut after me, and the
deal fell to him. He took up and then put the cards down again
put his hand into his pocket, and drew out a little silver box,
about the size of a small snuff-box,that had in it a good many
little pills of a dark gray gummy look. One of these he
swallowed
,
then began to deal, his eye growing brighter every
moment
,
and looking into mine till I felt quite dazzled and strange.
Our table was the belly of the dead horse. He sat on one of the
thighs. I knelt down upon the grass on the opposite side, and
though it pained me, I couldn't take my eyes from him to save
my life. He asked me a great many questions while he was
throwing out the cardshow old I waswhat was my name
what family I hadhow far I livedwhere I came fromevery
thing, indeed, about me, and my way of life, and what I had and
what I knew:and all this in no timeas fast as I tell it to you.
Then he said, `You are an honest fellow, take up your cards,
and let us see if you are as lucky as you are honest.' It seemed
as if I was, for I beat him. I played a pretty stiff game of
old
sledge,
or as he called it, `
all fours,
' for I used to play, as long
as I could remember, with the old man, my father, every night.
Old people like these plays, and it's good for them to play. It
keeps 'em lively, keeps them from sleeping too much, and from
drinking. It's good for them, so long as it makes their own
fireside
sweet to them. Well! I was lucky. I won the game, and
it worried me mightily when I did so. I didn't touch the money.
`I suppose,' said the stranger, `that I must cover those
pieces,' and before I could guess what he was about, he flung
down four other gold pieces, making forty dollars, in the pile
with mine, and began again shuffling the cards. If I was scared
and unhappy before, I was twice as much so now. I could
scarcely breathe, and why, I can't say exactly. It wasn't from
any anxiety about the winning or the losing, for I preferred not
to have the stranger's money: but it was his very indifference
and unconcern that worried and distressed me. It seemed so
unnatural, that I half the time thought that I was dealing with
nothing human: and though I could shuffle, and cut, and play,
yet it seemed to me as if I did it without altogether knowing
why, or how. As luck would have it, I won the second time;
and the third time he pulled out his purse and put down as many
more pieces as lay there. I looked at the growing heap with a
heart that seemed ready to burst. There was eighty dollars
before
me, and I felt my face grow red when I caught his eye
looking
steadily at mine. I began to feel sort o' desperate, and flung
about the cards like a person in liquor. The old man laughed,
a low chuckle like, that made my blood crawl in my veins, half
frozen, as it were. But, neither his skill and coolness, nor my
fright, altered the luck at all. I again won, and trembled all over,
to see the pile, and to see him take out his purse, and empty every
thing upon it.
`Stranger,' said I, `don't think of it; keep your money, and
let me go home.'
`Pshaw! said he, `you're a good fellow, and as lucky as you
are good. Why shouldn't you be my heir? I prefer that a good
fellow should win my money if any body. It'll do your sight
good.'
`But not my heart, I'm afraid,' was my answer.
`That's precisely as you use it,' said he; `money's a good
creature, like every other good creature that God gives us. It's
a good thing to be rich, for a rich man's always able to
do
good,
when a poor man can only wish to do it. Get money, my lad,
and be wise with it; wiser, I trust, than I have been.'
With these words, he took out his silver box, swallowed
another
of the pills, and was busy dealing out the cards in another
moment. I, somehow, was better pleased with him for what he
said. The mention of God convinced me that he wasn't the
devil, and what he said seemed very sensible. But I didn't feel
any more right and happy than before. I only wanted the
strength to refuse him. I couldn't refuse him. I took up the
cards as he threw them, and it did seem to me that I scarcely
saw to make out the spots when I played them. I hardly knew
how the game was played; I didn't count; I couldn't tell what
I made. I only heard him say at the close of the second hand,
`The money's yours. You are a lucky fellow.'
With these words he pushed the gold heap to me, and threw
me the empty purse.
`There's something to put it in.'
`No!' said I; `no, strangerI can't take this money.'
`Why, pray?'
`It's not right. It don't seem to me to be got honestly. I
haven't worked for it.'
`Worked, indeed! If nobody used money but those who
worked for it, many a precious fellow would gnaw his finger ends
for a dinner. Put up your money!'
I pushed it to him, all but the two eagles which I begun
with; but he pushed it back. I got up without touching it.
`Stay,' said he, `you
are
a good fellow! Sit down again; sit
down.' I sat down. `I can't take that money,' said he, `for it
is yours. According to my way of thinking, it is yoursit is
none of mine. There is only one way in which it may become
mine; only one way in which I could take it or make use of it,
and that is by winning it back. That may be done. I will put
the horse against the gold.'
CHAPTER V.
My
heart beat quicker than ever when he pointed to Rainbow.
Not that I expected or wished to win him back, for I would only
have taken him back by giving up all the money, or all
except
the hundred and fifty dollars; but it now seemed to me as
if I looked on the old man with such feelings as would have made
me consent to almost any thing he wished. I had a strange sort
of pity for him. I considered him a sort of kind-hearted, rich old
madman. I said, `Very well;' and he took another pill out of
his box, and begun again at the cards.
`You are a very fortunate fellow,' said he, `and seem a very
good one. I really see no reason why you should not be my heir.
You say you are not married.'
`No.'
`But you have your sweetheart, I suppose. A lad of
twenty-five
,
which I suppose is much about your age, is seldom
without
one.'
`It's not the case with me,' said I. `In these parts we have
mighty few folks and fewer women, and I don't know the girl
among them that's ever seemed to me exactly the one that I should
be willing to make my wife.'
`Why, you're not conceited, I hope? You don't think
yourself
too fine a fellow for a poor girl, do you?'
`No, by no means, stranger; but there's a sort of liking
that one must have before he can think of a wife, and I haven't
seen the woman yet to touch me in the right way.'
`You are hard to please, and properly. Marriage is easier
found than lost. A man is too noble an animal to be kept in a
mouse-trap. But there
are
women'
He stopped short. I waited for him to say something more,
but by this time the cards had been distributed, and he was
sorting
his hand.
`There are women!' he said again, though as if he was
talking to himself. There he stopt for a minute, then looking
up, and fixing his bright eyes upon mine, he continued:
`Come, Rayner,' said he, good-humouredly. `The cards are
in your hands, and remember to play your best, for that famous
fine horse may become your own again. I warn you, I have a
good hand. What do you do?'
`Good or not,' said I, something more boldly, `I will stand
on mine.'
I had a most excellent hand, being sure of high and low,
with a strong leading hand for game.
`Play then!' he answered; and at the word, I clapped down
the ace of hearts, the very ace you see atop of the pack over the
chimney now.
`You
are
a lucky fellow, Rayner,' said he, as he flung down
the Jack upon it, the only heart he held in his hand. The game
ended; I was owner of horse and money. But I jumped to my
feet instantly.
`Stranger,' said I, `don't think I'm going to rob you of your
horse or money. I don't exactly know why I played with you
so long, unless it be because you insisted upon it, and I did'nt
wish to disoblige an old gentleman like yourself. Take your
money, and give me my horse; or, if you want the horse, leave
me the hundred and fifty, which is a fair price for him, and put
the rest in your own pocket. I wont't touch a copper more of it.'
`You
are
a good fellow, Rayner, but, with some persons,
younger and rasher persons than myself, your words would be
answered with a bullet. Nay, were I the boy I have been, it would
be dangerous for you to speak,
even to me,
in such a manner.
Among gentlemen, the obligation to pay up what is lost by cards
is sacred. The loser
must
deliver, and the winner
must
receive.
There
is your money, and that is your horse again; but I am
not yet done with you. As I said before, you
are
a good fellow,
and most certainly a lucky one. I like you, though your
principles
are scarcely fixed yetnot certain! Still, I like you;
and there's some chance that you will be my heir yet. A few
more trials at the cards must determine that. I suppose you are
not unwilling to give me a chance to win back my losses?'
I caught at the suggestion.
`Surely not,' I replied.
`Very good,' says he. `Don't suppose that, because you've
emptied my purse, you've cleaned me out quite. I have a
diamond
ring and a diamond breastpin yet to stake. They are
worth something more than your horse and your heap of money.
We will place them against your eagles and horse.'
`No!' said I quickly. `I'm willing to put down all the
eagles, but not the horse; or I'll put down the horse and all the
money, except the hundred and fifty.'
`As you please,' said he, `but, my good fellow, you must
take my word for the ring and breastpin. I do not carry them
with me. I know it's rather awkward to talk of playing a
promised stake against one that we see, but I give you the
honour
of a gentleman that the diamonds shall be forthcoming if I
lose.'
I began to think that what he said was only a sort of
comeoff
but
I didn't want his money, and was quite willing that he
should win it back. If he had said, `I'll stake my toothpick
against the money,' I'd have been just as willing, for all that I
now aimed at was to secure my horse or the price of him. I
felt very miserable at the thought of winning the man's money
such a heap of it! I had never played cards for money in all
my life before, and there's something in the feeling of winning
money, for the first time, that's almost like thieving. As I tell
you, if he had said his toothpick, or any worthless thing, instead
of his diamonds, I'd have been willing. I didn't say so, however,
and I thought his offer to stake diamonds that he couldn't show,
was pretty much like a come-off. But I was willing enough, for
the money seemed to scald my eyes to look upon. He took out
a pencil, the case of which I saw was gold also, and wrote on a
slip of paper, `Good for two brilliants, one a ring, the other a
breastpin, the latter in form of a Maltese cross, both set in gold,
with an inner rim of silver, valued at seven hundred dollars.'
This was signed with two letters only, the initials of his name.
I have the paper now. He bade me read it, and when I did so,
I thought him madder than a March hare; but if I thought so
then, I was more than ever convinced of it, when, a moment
after, and when we were about to play, he spoke to this effect:
`There's one thing, Rayner. There's a little incumbrance
on these jewels.'
`Well, sir,' I said.
I didn't care a fig for the incumbrance, for I didn't believe a
word of the jewels.
`If you win them, you win a woman along with them. You
win a wife.'
I laughed outright.
`Don't laugh,' said he; `you don't see me laugh. I'm
serious
;
never more so. You are unmarried. You need a wife.
Don't you want one?'
`Yes! if I could get a good oneone to my liking.'
`You
are
a good fellow. You deserve a good wife, Rayner;
and such is the very one I propose to give you.'
`Ay, ay,' said I; `but will she be to my liking?'
`I hope so; I believe so. She has all the qualities which
should command the liking of a sensible and worthy young man.
She, too, is sensible; she is intelligent; she has knowledge; she
has read books; she has accomplishments; she sings like an
angel
;
plays on several instrumentspiano and guitar!'
`Piano and guitar!' said I.
I didn't know what they were. I felt sure that the old fellow
was mad, just out of a hospital, perhaps; but then where did he
get the money and the gold things? I began to think more
suspiciously
of him than ever.
`Yes, piano and guitar,' said he; `she draws and paints too,
the loveliest picturesshe can make these trees live on canvass;
ah! can she not? Money has not been spared, Rayner, to make
Rachel what she is.'
`Rachelis that her name?' I asked.
`Yes, it is.'
`What's the other name?'
`You shall know, if you win the diamonds.'
`Yesbut how old is she? how does she look? is she young
and handsome? I wouldn't want an ugly wife because she
happened
to be wise. I've heard that your wise women are
generally
too ugly for any thing else than wisdom.'
`You are a fool, Rayner, though a good fellow. But Rachel
is beautiful and youngnot more than seventeenthe proper age
for you. You, I think you say, are twenty-eight. In this
climate
a man's wife should always be ten or twelve years younger
than himselfprovided he be a sober and healthy man, and if he be
not, he has no business with a wife, nor a wife with him. You
are both sober and healthy. You are a good fellowI see that. I
like you, Rayner, and for this reason I am willing to risk Rachel on
the cards, playing against you. My loss will probably be her gain,
and this makes me rather regardless how it ends. You shall be
my heir yet.'
`Thank you, old gentleman,' said I, beginning to feel a little
bold and saucy, for I now couldn't help thinking that the stranger
was no better than a good-natured madman who had got away
from his friends. `Thank you,' said I. `If Rachel's the girl you
make her out to be, you can't bring her along a day too soon.
But, may I ask, is she your daughter?'
`My daughter!' he answered sharply, and with something of
a frown on his face, `do I look like a man to have children?to
be favoured with such a blessing as a daughter?a daughter like
Rachel?'
`Now,' said I to myself, `his fit's coming on,' and I began to
look about me for a start.
`No, Rayner,' he continued, `she is no daughter of mine,
but she is the daughter of a good man and of honourable parents.
You shall have sufficient proof of that. Have you any more
questions?'
`No, sir.'
`And you will take Rachel as your wife? You have heard
my description of her. If she comes up to it, I ask you, will you
be willing to take her as your wife?'
I looked at him queerly enough, I reckon. He fixed his
keen black eyes upon me, so that I couldn't look on him without
shutting my own. I didn't know whether to laugh or to run.
But, thinking that he was flighty in the upper story, I concluded
it was best to make a short business of it, and to agree with any
thing that he wished; so I told him freely `yes,' and he reached
out his hand to mine, which he squeezed nervously for a minute,
and then took out his box of pills, swallowed a couple of them,
and began dealing out the cards. I had the strangest luckthe
same sort of luck that had kept with me from the start. I won
the diamonds and won Rachel!
`Well,' said he, `I'm glad, Rayner, that you are the
man-I've
been long looking for an heir to my diamonds. They are
yoursall is yours; and I shall have to be indebted to you for
the loan of the horse, in order to go and bring you your wife.'
`Ay,' said I, `stranger, the horse is at your service, and half
of the money too. I never thought to take them from you at the
first; I shouldn't have felt easy in my conscience to have used
the money that I got in this way.'
`Pshaw!' said he, gathering up the cards, and wrapping
them in the buckskin wallet from which he had taken them.
`Pshaw, you are a fool. I'll borrow your horse, and a few
pieces
to pay my way.'
`Help yourself to the rest,' said I, taking, as I spoke, fifteen
of the eagles to myself, and leaving the rest on the dead body of
the horse, where they had been growing from our first
commencing
to play.
`You are my heir,' he answered, `and behave yourself as
you should. Between persons so related there should be no
paltry
money scruples;' and, while he said these words, he stooped
to take the money. I turned away that he shouldn't suppose I
watched him, but I couldn't help laughing at the strange sort of
cunning which he showed in his conceit. Says I to myself, `You
will take precious good care, old fellow, I see that, that I carry
off no more than my own poor hundred and fifty.' But he was
too quick in mounting and riding off to give me much time to
think about it or to change in my disposition. It was only after
he was off, out of sight, and in a full gallop, that, looking round
upon the dead horse, I saw the eagles still there, nearly all of them,
just as I had heaped them up. He had only taken two of them,
just enough, as he said, to bear his necessary expenses.
I was a little surprised, and was now more sure than ever
that the stranger had lost his wits. I gathered up the money, and
walked home, mighty slowly, thinking all the way of what had
taken place. It seemed more like a strange dream than any thing
else. Was there any man? Had I played
old sledge
with a
9
stranger? I was almost inclined to doubt; but there was the
dead horse. I went back to look at it, and when I thrust my
hand down into my breeches pocket, I brought it up full of the
precious metal; but was it precious metal? I began to tremble
at this thought. It might be nothing better than brass or copper,
and my horse was gonegone off at a smart canter. My heart
grew chilled within me at this reflection. I felt wildscared
half out of my wits, and instead of regarding the old man as a
witless person escaped from his keepers, I now began to consider
him a cunning sharper, who had found one more witless than I
had fancied him.
CHAPTER VI.
But
such reflections, even if well founded, came too late for
remedy. The old man was gone beyond present reach, and
when I reflected that he had taken two of the gold pieces for his
own expenses, I began to feel a little reassured on the subject of
their value. When I got home, I told my father of the sale of
the horse, and the price, though I took precious good care to say
nothing of the gambling. The old man, though he himself had
taught me to play cards, was mighty strict against all play for
money. I showed him only the fifteen pieces that I got for
Rainbow
,
and the rest I put away quietly, meaning to spend them by
degrees upon the farm, as chances offered, so as to prevent him
from ever getting at the real truth. I felt myself pretty safe with
regard to the strange gentleman. I never counted on his coming
back to blow me, though, sometimes, when I wasn't thinking, an
odd sort of fear would come over me, and I would feel myself
trembling with the notion that, after all, he might return. I had
heard of rich people having strange ways of throwing away their
money, and taking a liking for poor people like myself; and then,
there was a serious earnest about the strange gentleman, in spite
of all his curiousnesses, that made me a little apprehensive,
whenever
the recollection of him came into my head.
But regular work, day after day, is the best physic for mind
and body; and, after three days had gone by, I almost ceased to
bother myself with the affair. I passed the time so actively that
I didn't think much about any thing. I took a trip down the
river, some eighteen miles, to a wheelwright's, and bought a prime
two-horse wagon, for ninety-five dollars, which made a
considerable
hole in the price of Rainbow; and, one thing with another,
the week went by almost without giving me time to count if the
right number of days was in it. Sunday followed, and then
Monday. That Monday I was precious busy. I was always an
industrious mandoing something or othermaking this, or
mending that. To be doing nothing was always the hardest work
for me. But that Monday I out-worked myself, and I was really
glad when I saw the sun sink suddenly down behind the woods.
I threw down the broad-axe, for I had been hewing out some
door-facings for a new corn-crib and fodder-house, and went
towards the gallery (piazza) where the old man was sitting, and
threw myself, at full-length, along the entrance, just at his feet.
I was mighty tired. My jacket was off, my sleeves rolled up,
my neck open, and the perspiration standing thick on my breast
and forehead. At that very moment, while I was lying in this
condition, who should I see ride into the opening, but the strange
old gentleman. I knew him at a glance, and my heart jumped
up into my mouth as if it was trying to get out of it. Behind
him came another person riding upon a pretty little bay filly.
Though it was darkening fast, I could make out that this other
person was a woman, and I never felt so scared in all my life. I
looked up at my father, and he at me. He saw that I was
frightened
,
but he hadn't time to ask me a question, and I shouldn't
have had the strength to answer if he had. Up rode the strange
old gentleman, and close behind him came the lady. Though I
was mightily frightened, I looked curiously at her. I could make
out that she was a small and delicate-framed person, but her face
was covered with a thick veil. I could see that she carried
herself well, sat her horse upright like a sort of queen, and when
the old man offered to take her off, yielded herself to him with a
slow but graceful stateliness, not unlike that of a young cedar
bending to the wind.
For my part, though I could see this, I was never more
confounded
in my life. I was completely horror-struck. To see the
old gentleman again was a shocking surprise; but that he should
really bring the lady that I had won, and that she should catch
me in that condition,my coat off, my breast open, my face
covered with dust and perspiration! If the work made me sweat
before, this surprise increased it. I got up, and made out to get
a few steps towards the strangers. I said something by way of
apology for being caught in that shabby fix; but the old
gentleman
stopped me.
`Never mind, no apologies, Mr. Rayner. The proofs of
labour are always honourable, and if the heart can show that it
works as well as the body, then the labourer is a gentleman.
How are you, andthis is your father?'
I introduced him to the old man as the person who had bought
Rainbow, and we conducted them into the house.
`My ward, Mr. Rayner,' said the stranger, when we had
entered, `this is the young friend of whom I spoke to you.'
At these words the young lady threw up her veil. I
staggered
back at the sight. I won't talk of her beauty, my friend,
for two reasons; one of which is, that I haven't got words to
say what I thought and feltwhat I think and feel now. The
otherbut I needn't speak of the other reason. This one is
sufficient. The old gentleman looked at me inquiringly, and
then he looked at my father. I could see that there was a little
doubt and anxiety upon his face, but they soon passed away as he
examined the face of my father. There was something so good,
so meek, so benevolent about the looks of the old man, that
nobody could mistrust that all was right in the bottom of his heart.
As for my heart, the strange gentleman seemed to see into it quite
as quickly as into that of my father. He was not so blunt and
abrupt now in his manner of speaking to me as he had been when
we first met. His manner was more dignified and reserved.
There was something very lofty and noble about it, and in
speaking
to the lady his voice sunk almost into a whisper.
`Mr. Rayner,' said he, looking to my father, `I trust that
you will give my ward a chamber for the night. I have heard
of you, sir, and have made bold to presume on your known
benevolence
of character in making this application.'
`Our home is a poor one, stranger,' said the old man; `but
such as it is, it is quite at the service of the young lady.'
`Good!' said the other; `you are the man after my own
heart. I am known,' he continued, `where men speak of me at
all, as Mr. Eckhardt. My ward is the daughter of a very near
and dear friend. Her name is HerderRachel Herder. So
much is necessary for convenience in conversation; and now, sir,
if you can tell Rachel where she is to find her chamber, so that
she may arrange her dress, and get rid of the dust of travel, she
will be very much obliged to you.'
All this was soon arranged and attended to, and while the
lady disappeared in our best chamber, Mr. Eckhardt proceeded
to disburthen the horses, on both of which were saddle-bags that
were stuffed almost to bursting. These were brought into the
house, and sent to the chamber after the lady. Then the
stranger
sat down with my father, the two old men chatting quite
briskly together, while I stripped the horses of their saddles, and
took them to the stable. When I returned to the house I found
them as free-spoken and good-humoured as if they had been
intimate
from the first day of clearing in that country.
CHAPTER VII.
You
may suppose what my confusion must have been, for I
can't describe it to you. I can only say that I felt pretty much
like a drunken man. Every thing swum around me. I was
certain of nothing; didn't know what to believe, and half the
time really doubted whether I was asleep or awake. But there
were the horsesthere was Rainbow. I couldn't mistake him,
and if I had, he didn't mistake me. When he heard my voice as
I led him to the stable, he whinnied with a sort of joy, and
pricked
up his ears, and showed his feeling as plainly as if he had a
human voice to speak it in words. And I reckon, too, it was a
more true feeling than many of those that are spoken in words.
I threw my arms round the good creature's neck, and if it hadn't
been for thinking of Rachel Herder, I reckon I should have kissed
him, too, it did me so much good to see him again. But I hadn't
much time for this sort of fondness, and when I remembered the
whole affair between the strange old gentleman, Mr. Eckhardt,
and myself, I was too much worried to think any more of Rainbow.
I couldn't bring myself to believe it true about the diamonds and
the wife; and when I remembered the sight that I had caught,
though a glimpse only, and for a single moment, of the great
beauty of the young lady, I couldn't help thinking that the
stranger
was only making merry with merunning his rigs upon a
poor, rough, backwoodsman. But this notion roused up my pride
and feeling. `Not so rough,' says I to myself; `poor it may be,
but not mean; not more rough than honest labour makes a man.
And poor as you please, and rough as you please, when the
heart's right, and the head's no fool's head, the man's man
enough for any woman, though she walks in satin!' With this I
considered that I ought, at least, to make myself rather decent
before I sat down to supper. My cheeks burned me when I
looked at myself and remembered how she had caught me. I
knew that good soft spring water, and my best suit, would turn
me into quite another sort of looking man; but here again was
difficulty. It was my chamber which my father had given up to
the young lady, and all my clothes were in it. My new coat
and blue pantaloons hung upon pegs behind the door; and all my
shirts were in an old chest of drawers on which the looking-glass
stood; and to get these things without her seeing was impossible.
But it had to be done; so I called up the old negro woman
servant
we had, and told her what to do, and sent her for the clothes,
while I waited for them at the back of the house. When she
brought them, I hurried down to the branch (brooklet) and made
a rapid and plentiful use of the waters. I then got in among the
bushes, and made a thorough change in my dress, taking care to
hide the old clothes in the hollow of a gum. I combed my hair
smoothly over the branch, which answered me at the same time
for a looking-glass, and had the effect of making me much more
satisfied with my personal appearance. I needn't blush, my
friend, at my time of life, to say that I thought myself then, and
was, a tolerable comely fellow; and I couldn't help feeling a
sneaking secret notion that the young lady would think so too.
Well, I got in time enough for supper. Mr. Eckhardt looked at
me, as I thought, with real satisfaction. He and my father had
been keeping company all the time I was gone, and I could see,
among other things, that they were mightily pleased with one
another
.
By and by, supper was brought in, and Rachel Herder
came out of her chamber. If I thought her beautiful before, I
thought her now ten times more so. Once I caught her eyes
fixed
upon me, but she turned them away without any flurry or
confusion, and I don't think that I saw her look at me in
particular
once again that night. This worried me, I confess. It
seemed
to show that she wasn't thinking of me; and, moreover, it
seemed to show that Mr. Eckhardt hadn't said a word to her
about the business; and this made me more ready to believe that
he had only been running his rigs upon me. Yet there was
something about his looks and in his words, whenever he spoke to
mesomething so real, serious, earnest, that I couldn't help
believing
,
after all, that the affair wasn't altogether over. Nor was
it, as you will see directly.
Supper went forward. You know what a country supper is,
out here in Mississippi, so it don't need to tell you that cornbread,
and a little eggs and bacon, and a smart bowl of milk, was pretty
much the amount of it. The young lady ate precious little;
took a little milk, I believe, and a corn biscuit. As for me,
I'm very sure I ate still less. My heart was too much in my
mouth to suffer me to put in any thing more; for, whichever
way I thought of the matter, I was worried half to death. If
the old gentleman was serious, it was still a mighty terrifying
thing to have a wife so suddenly forced upon a body,a wife
that you never saw before and didn't know any thing about; and
if he wasn't serious, it was very hard to lose so lovely a creature,
just too after your heart had been tantalized and tempted by
the promise that she was all for yourself. As I tell you, my
friend, whichever way I could think of it, I was still worried
half to death.
After supper, Mr. Eckhardt asked me to walk out with him;
so, leaving the young lady with my father,who, by the way, had
already grown mightily pleased with her,off we went into the
woods. We hadn't gone very far when the old gentleman spoke,
pretty abruptly:
`Well, Rayner, my lad, you've seen the lady whom I intend
as your wife. Does she suit you?'
`Why, sir, you're rather quick. I can answer for her
beauty
:
she's about the beautifullest creature I ever did see, but it's
not beauty altogether that makes a good wife, and I ha'n't had
time yet to judge whether she'll suit me.'
`How much time do you want?' said he shortly.
`Well, I can't say.'
`Will a week or ten days answer?'
`That's as it happens,' said I. `Some men you can
understand
in an hour, just as if you had been with 'em all your life.
I'm pretty much such a person myself,but with some you can't
get on so rapidly. You'll be with them a year, and know just
as little of their hearts at the end of it, as you did at the beginning.'
`Humph! and whose fault will that be but your own? There's
an eye to see, Rayner, as well as a thing to be seen. It depends
very much upon the seeker whether he shall ever find. But
enough. There's no need in this case for much philosophy.
You are easily read, and so is Rachel. A week will answer to
make you both acquainted, and I'll leave her with you for that
time.'
`But are you serious?' I asked.
`Serious! But your question is natural. I am a man of
few words, Rayner. You see something in my proceedings which
is extraordinary. As the world goes, and acts, and thinks,
perhaps
it is; but nothing was ever more deliberate or well advised,
on my part, than this proceeding. Hear me, lad! this lady is a
ward of mine; the daughter of a very dear friend, who gave her
to my trust. I swore to do by her as a father. I am anxious to
do so; but I am an old man, not long for this world,an erring
man, not always sure of doing right while I am in it. I wish to
find the child a protector,a good man,a kind man,a man
whom I can trust. This has been my desire for some time. I
fancy I have found in you the very person I seek. I am a man
to look keenly, judge quickly, and act in the same manner. As
you yourself have remarked, you are a person easily understood.
I understood you in a little time, and was pleased with what I saw
of you. I have chosen you out as the husband of Rachel. She
knows nothing yet of my purpose. You, I see, have kept your
father in partial ignorance of our adventure. Perhaps you were
right in this case, though, as a general rule, such secrecy between
two persons placed as you are would have been an error. Well,
Rachel shall stay with you a week. I know her so well that I
fancy you will in that time become intimate and remain pleased
with each othersufficiently pleased to make the rest easy.'
There was some more talk between us, as we went toward the
house, but this was the substantial part of what was said. Once
I made some remark on the strangeness of such a preference
shown to me, when in the great cities he might have found so
many young men better suited by education for a young lady
whom he represented to be so accomplished; but he had his
answer
for this also; and so quickly uttered, and with such a
commanding
manner, that, even if I had not been satisfied, I should
still have been silenced.
`Your remark is natural. Half the world, having such a
child to dispose of, would have gone to the great city, and have
preferred a fashionable husband. But I know her heart. It is
her heart, and not her accomplishments, that I wish to provide for.
I want a man, not a dandy,a frank, noble-hearted citizen,
however
plain, not a selfish, sophisticated calculator, who looks for a
wife through the stock market. Enough, my good fellow; no
more words.'
CHAPTER VIII.
That
very night Mr. Eckhardt contrived, after the young
lady had gone to bed, to let my father know that he would be
pleased if his ward could be suffered to remain in his family for a
few days, until he should cross the river, in order to look after a
man on the west of the
Misssisippi
, who owed him money. He
was unwilling to carry her with him into so very wild a region.
He made every thing appear so natural to the old man, that he
consented out of hand, just as if it had been the most reasonable
arrangement in the world; and it was only after Mr. Eckhardt
had set out,which he did by daylight the next morning,that
my father said to me:
`It's very strange, William, now I come to think of it, that
Mr. Eckhardt should leave the young lady in a family where
there's none but men.'
`But she's just as safe here, father,' said I, `as if she had fifty
of her own sex about her.'
`That's true enough, William,' said the old man, `and if the
child feels herself at home, why there's nothing amiss. I'm
thinking she's about the sweetest-looking creature I ever laid
eyes on.'
I thought so too, but I said nothing, and followed the old man
into the house, with my feelings getting more and more strange
and worrisome at every moment. I was in the greatest whirl of
expectationmy cheeks a-burning,my heart as cold as ice, and
leaping up and down, just as scarily as a rabbit's when he's
finding
his way through the paling into a garden patch. I felt as if
the business now upon my hands was about the most serious and
trying I had ever undertaken; and it took all my thinking, I tell
you, to bring my courage to the right pitch, so as to steady my
eyes while I spoke to the young lady as she came out to the
breakfast-table. My father had a message to her from Mr.
Eckhardt
,
telling her of his absence; and though she looked a little
anxious when she heard that he was already gone, she soon
seemed
to become quiet and at ease in her situation. Indeed, for that
matter, she was the most resigned and easy person I ever met in
my life. She seemed quite too gentle ever to complain, and I
may say now, with some certainty, that, whatever might be her
hurts of mind or body, she was the most patient to submit, and
the most easy to be pacified, of all human beings.
Now, if you know any thing of a man of my description, if
you're any thing of a judge of human nature, you'll readily
understand
that, if I was scary and bashful at first, in meeting with
a young and beautiful creature like her, and knowing what I did
know of what was before me, it didn't take very long for the fright
to wear off. The man whose feelings are very quick, gets
mightily
confused at first, but give him time, don't hurry him, and he'll
come to his senses pretty soon, and they'll come to him, and they'll
be the sharper and the more steady, from the scare they had at first
you can't scare them in the same manner a second time.
Before
that day was well out, I could sit down and talk with Rachel,
and hear her talk, without growing blind, dumb, and deaf in an
instant. Her mildness gave me encouragement, and when I got
used to the sound of my own voice, just after hers, I then found
out, not only that I had a good deal to say, but that she listened
very patiently, and I think was pleased to hear it. I found her
so mild, so kind, and encouraging, she seemed to take so much
interest in every thing she saw, that I was for showing her every
thing. Our cows, the little dairy, the new wagon, even to
the fields of corn, cotton, and potatoes, were all subjects of
examination
one after the other. Then, I could carry her along the
hill slopes, through as pretty a grove, too, as you would wish to
lay eyes on; and down along just such another, even to the river
banks; and we had odd things enough to show, here and there, to
keep up the spirits and have something to talk about. These
rambles we'd take either in the cool of the morning, or towards
sunset in the afternoon; and, sometimes the old man would go
along with usbut, as he couldn't go very far at one time, we
had pretty much the whole chance to ourselves; and what with
talking and walking with Rachel, and thinking about her when I
wasn't with her, I did precious little work that week. To
shorten
a long story, my friend, I now began to think that there was
nothing wrong in my gambling with Mr. Eckhardt, and to agree
in his notion that the loser was always bound to pay, and the
winner
to receive. Before he got back, which he did not until
ten days were fully over, I had pretty much concluded that I
should find it the most trying business in nature to have to give up
my winnings. I don't mean the diamonds; for them I had not
seen, and hadn't cared to see; but I mean the incumbrance that
came with them, which, by this time, was more than all the gold
or diamonds, in my sight, that the whole world could show.
CHAPTER IX.
I
was
now as anxious to see Mr. Eckhardt as I had before
been afraid of his coming. He overstayed his time a little, being
nearer two weeks gone than one. He was a keen-sighted man.
His first words, when we were again alone together, were, `Well,
all's right on your part, Rayner. You are a good fellowI see
that you will be my heir. You find that what I said of Rachel
is true; and nothing now remains but to see what she will say.
Have you been much together?'
`Pretty often. I reckon I've done little else than look after
her since you've been gone.'
`What! you hav'n't neglected your business, Rayner?'
said he, with a smile`the cows, the horses?'
`They've had a sort of liberty,' says I.
`Bad signs for farming, however good for loving. You must
change your habits when you are married.'
`Ah! that's not yet,' said I, with a sigh. `I'm dub'ous, Mr.
Eckhardt, that Miss Rachel won't fancy me so soon as I do her!'
He looked a little anxious, and didn't answer so quickly as
usual, and my heart felt as heavy then as if it was borne down
by a thousand pounds of lead. It wasn't much lightened when
he answered, with a sort of doubting,
`Rachel,' said he, `has always heeded my counsel. She
knows my love for hershe has every confidence in my
judgment
.
You, Rayner, have some of those advantages which
young women are apt to admire. You are well made, youthful,
manly, and with a masculine grace and beauty which you owe
to the hunter life. These are qualities to recommend the young
of one sex to the young of the other. You have something more.
You are a sensible youth, with a native delicacy of feeling which,
more than any thing beside, will be apt to strike Rachel. It
struck me. I will not presume to say that you have won either
her eye or her heartthe eye of a woman is easy won at all
times, the heart slowly. Perhaps it may be safe to say that hearts
are not often won till after marriage. But, at all events, with
your personal claims, which I think considerable, and the docility
of Rachel, I have hopes that I can bring about an arrangement
which, I confess to you, I regard as greatly important to my
future purposes. We shall see.'
At that moment I was quite too full of Rachel and my own
hopes, to consider the force of the remark which he last made.
I never troubled myself to ask what his purposes might be,
beyond
the single one which we both had in view. When Mr.
Eckhardt met with Rachel, and, indeed, while he spoke with me,
I could observe that there was a gravity, like sadness, in his voice
and manner, which was not usual with him, or at least had not
shown itself in our previous meetings. He hesitated more
frequently
in what he had to say. His eye was less settled, though
even brighter than before; and I noted the fact that he took his
pills three times as frequently as ever. Even when he spoke
with a show of jesting or playfulness, I noted that there was a
real sadness in what he looked, and even something of sadness
in what he said, or in his manner of saying it. Nothing but this
seriousness of look and manner kept me from thinking that he
was playing upon my backwoods ignorance, when he was
speaking
my own good name and good qualities to my teeth. But
when I doubted and began to suspicion that he was running rigs
upon me, I had only to look into his face and see that he was
talking in the way of downright, matter-of-fact business.
When he came, Rachel went to him and put her hand in his,
but she didn't speak. Nor did he at first. He only bent down
and kissed her forehead; and so he stood a while, holding her
hand in his, and talking to my father. It was a sight to see them
two. I couldn't stand it. There was something in it, I can't
tell you what, that looked so sadful. I went out and wiped the
water from my eyes. It seemed to me then, as if the old
gentleman
was meditating something very distressing, and as if poor
Rachel was half dub'ous of it herself. After a little while, my
father came out and joined me, and we walked off together to the
stable.
`William,' says the old man, `these are strange people.
They seem very sweet, good people; at least the girl seems very
good, and is a very sweet girl; but there's something very
strange and very sorrowful about them.'
I couldn't say any thing, for my heart was very full, and
the old man went forward.
`Now, what's more strange than for him to leave her here
with us? though, to be sure, we wouldn't see her harmed even
to the falling of a hair of her headand I can answer for you,
Bill, as I can for myself; but it's not every body that will say
for us what we might feel for ourselves, and precious few fathers
would leave an only daughter here, in strange woods, with such
perfect strangers.'
`But she's not his daughter,' said I.
`It don't matter. It's very clear that he loves her as if she
was his daughter, and I reckon she's never known any other
father. Poor girl!I'm sure I like her already so much that I
wish he'd leave her here altogether.'
These last words of my father seemed to untie my tongue,
and I up and told him every syllable of what had taken place
between me and Mr. Eckhardt, from my first meeting with him
the day when I went to the river landing, up to the very moment
when we were talking. I didn't hide any thing, but told the
whole story of the cards, the gold, and the diamonds; and ended
by letting him know that if he should be so sorry to lose Rachel,
now that we both knew so much about her, it would go a mighty
deal harder with me. I told him all that Mr. Eckhardt had said
since his return, and what hopes I had that all would go as he
wished it. But the old man shook his head. He didn't like what
he heard about Mr. Eckhardt's gambling, and was very tight
upon me for letting myself be tempted to deal with him in the
same business. He didn't think the worse of Rachel, of course,
but he looked upon it as a sort of misfortune to be in any way
connected with a gambler.
We hadn't much longer time for confabulating, for Mr.
Eckhardt now came from the house and joined us. He was a
man who always came jump to the business, whatever it was,
that he had in hand. But he wasn't a rough man, though a quick
one. He had a way of doing the bluntest things without
roughing
9
the feelings. When he drew nigh, he took my father's arm
to lead him aside, speaking to me at the same time`Rayner, go
to Rachel;I have prepared her to see you. I will explain
every thing to your father, if you have not already done it; and
if you have, I still have something to say.'
You may reckon I didn't stop to count the tracks after that.
I verily think that I made the door of the house in a
hop-skip-and-jump
from the stable. Yet, when I got to the threshold, I stuck
I stuck fast. I heard a low sweet sort of moaning from within,
and oh! how my heart smote me when I heard it. I thought to
myself, it's so cruel to force this poor girl's inclination. What
can she see in me? That was my question to myself, and it
made me mighty humble, I tell you, when I asked it. But that
very humbleness did me good, and gave me sort of strength. `If
she don't see any thing in me to favour,' was my thought, `at
least I'll show her that I'm not the mean-spirited creature to take
advantage of her necessity;' and when I thought in this manner, I
went forward with a bound, and stood before her. I took her
hand in mine, and said,but Lord bless me, it's no use to try
and tell you what I said, for I don't know myself. The words
poured from me free enough. My heart was very full. I meant
to speak kindly and humbly, and do the thing generously, and I
reckon that, when the heart means what is right, and has a
straight purpose before it, the tongue can't go very far out of the
way. Nor did mine, if I am to judge of the effects which
followed
it. It's enough for me to tell you, that, though the tears
wasn't altogether dried up in Rachel's eyes, her lips began to
smile; she let her hand rest in mine, and she said something, but
what it was, I can't tell you. It's enough to say that she let me
know that she thought that all that had been proposed by Mr.
Eckhardt was for her good and happiness, and she was willing to
consent to whatever he had said. He came in a little while
after
,
and seemed quite satisfied. He talked, as if he himself was
particularly pleased, but there was a very great earnestness in
his looks that awed and overpowered me. His eyes seemed very
much sunk, even in the short time he had been gone, the wrinkles
seemed to have doubled in number on his face; his form trembled
very much, and I could perceive that he took his pills from the little
box of silver twice as often as ever. He didn't give himself
or me much time to think over what was to happen, for he hadn't
been ten minutes returned to the house, after the matter was
understood
all round, before he said to me in a whisper:
`Rayner, my lad, you are a good fellow; suppose you ride
off at once for your parson. You have one, your father tells me,
within a few miles. A smart gallop will bring him back with
you before sunset, and I would see you married to-night. I shall
have to leave you in the morning.'
Ah! stranger, don't wonder if I made the dust fly after that!
That night we were married.
CHAPTER X.
The
next morning, just as breakfast was over, Mr. Eckhardt
rose and buttoned his coat.
`Rachel, my child,' said he, `I shall now leave you. It will
be perhaps some time before I see you again. For that matter, I
may never see you again. But I have fulfilled my promise to
your dear father. You are the wife of a good mana gentle
and kind-hearted man. He will make you a good husband, I
believe
and hope. You, I know, will make him a good wife. The
seeds of goodness and happiness are here in this cottagemay
they grow to fruits. Kiss me, my child! Kiss me! It may be
for the last time!'
`No!' said she; `oh, no!' and she caught and she clung to
him. It was a time to bring tears, stranger, not to talk. There
was a good many words said by all of us, but not much talking.
It was a cry and an exclamation like, with poor Rachel, and
then she sunk off in the arms of Mr. Eckhardt. I was monstrous
frightened; but he carried her into the room and laid her on the
bed. `She will soon get over it,' said he, `and in the mean time
I'll steal away. When she recovers follow me. You will find
me' He told me where to find himat the place where
we had played together on the dead horsebut the sentence he
finished in a whisper. Then he stooped and kissed her, gave her
one long look, and his lips moved as if he was speaking a
blessing
over her. After this he turned from me hurriedly, as if to
conceal the tear in his eye. But I saw it. It couldn't be
concealed
.
It was about the largest tear I ever did see in the eye of
a man, but I reckon there was only that one. He was gone
before
Rachel come to herself. Till that happened I was about the
most miserable creature on earth. When she opened her eyes
and found that he was already gone, her troubles somewhat
softened
;
and when I found that, I set off to follow Mr. Eckhardt,
as he had directed me. I found him at the place appointed, but
he had no horse and no cloak, and didn't appear to have made
any of the usual arrangements for travelling. I expressed my
surprise. `Where's your horse?' I demanded.`I shall need
none. Besides, I
have
none. You seem to forget, Rayner, that
the horse is yours.'`Mine!'`Yes! you won him!'`But
you can't mean, sir' I was beginning to expostulate,
when he put his hand on my mouth. `Say no more,
Rayner
.
You are a good fellow. The horse
is
yours, whether you
have him by your skill or my generosity. Did I not tell you that
I intended to make you my heir?'
I looked bewildered, and felt so, and said, `Well, you don't
intend to leave us then?'`Yes I do.'`How do you mean to
goby water?' Remember, the river was pretty near us, and
though I didn't myself expect any steamboat, yet I thought it
likely he might have heard of one. `Very possible,' he
answered
,
with something of a smile upon his countenance. He
continued, after a short pause, `It is difficult to say by what
conveyance
a man goes when he goes out of the world, Rayner.
The journey I propose to take is no other. Life is an uncertain
business, Rayner. Uncertain as it is, most people seem never to
have enough of it. I am of a different thinking. I have had
only too much. I am neither well in it, nor fit for it, and I shall
leave it. I have made all my arrangements, settled my concerns,
and, as I promised, you shall be my heir.' I began to speak and
expostulate with him, but he stopped me. `Rayner, you are a
good fellow, but you shouldn't interrupt me. As I have but
little
time for talking, you should let me enjoy it all. You can
say what you have to say when I am gone, and I promise you
I
shall never interrupt
you
then. You have heard me, you
understand
my words.'
`I think I do,' was my answer; `you mean to take your
own life!'
`True, Rayner! but you speak as if it was yours I were
about to take!'
I told him I felt almost as bad as if it was, and asked him
why he should think of such a deed.
`It's a long story, Rayner, and you would probably
understand
it as thoroughly in ten words as in ten thousand. Perhaps
I should say enough in telling you that I am sick of life, and
that life sickens me. Every moment that I live humbles and
degrades
me. I have been the master of three princely fortunes;
and now I have only the means to carry me on my last journey.
I have had the reputation of talents, wit, and wisdom in high
degree, but lack the strength to forbear the companionship of the
basest, and the wit to keep from being the victim of the vilest.
Had I been the only victim, Rayner! But that poor child, now
your wifethe child of a dear relative and friendentrusted to
my guardianship in the confidence of love, which, at dying,
demanded
of me no pledge, but that which it fancied was speaking
through my eyesthat child has been the victim also! Start
not! The child is pure as any angel. It was the robbery of
her fortune of which I speak. I squandered hers with my own.
I did not bring her to beggary, Rayner. No! But I have lived
in perpetual dread that I should do so! Now that she is yours,
I have no such fears. I know that she is safethat she will do
wellthat you will both do well. Do not fancy, my good fellow,
when I tell you this, that I have been seeking in vain for a
husband
for the child. The thing is otherwise. Husbands have
sought for her. Men of rank and substance, for whose attentions
the mothers of most daughters would have worked their wits and
fingers to the bone. But if I squandered Rachel's fortunemark
meI was resolved that
she
should not be sacrificed. I resolved
that I would do her justice, at least in that one respectthat she
should never be yielded, if I could help it, to the shallow witling,
the profligate, or the brutelet their social rank and worldly
possessions be what they might. I knew her, and fancied I
could tell what sort of person would suit her. I have found
that person in youso I believeand my work is ended. The
labourer knocks off when his work is done, and so will I. There
is one thing, Rayner'
He took from his pocket the buckskin roll which contained
his pack of cards.
`Do you see these? I will not say that they have been my
bane. I were a fool to say so. My own weakness was my
bane. They were only the unconscious instruments in my
hands, as innocent as the dirk or pistol in the hands of the
assassin
.
But they have their dangers, Rayner; and I would
protect you against them. Take them; I promised you should
be my heir. Take them, but not to play them. Keep them in
your eyes as an omen. Show them to your children as a warning.
Tell them what I have told you; and while you familiarize their
eyes with their forms, familiarize their hearts with their dangers.
There! do not lose sight of them. Leave me now. Farewell!
You see I am at the bottom of my box.'
He thrust the cards into my hands, and as he spoke, he drew
out his little silver box, and took from it the only pill which
remained
.
This he swallowed, and then handed me the box also.
I refused to take it. `Pshaw!' said he, `why not? your refusal
to take it can have no effect on my determination! Take it and
leave me!' But I still refused. He turned from me, saying:
`You're a foolish fellow, Rayner;' and walked down the road
leading to the river. I followed him closely. He turned half
round, once or twice, muttered and seemed discontented. I still
kept close with him, and began to expostulate. But he
interrupted
me fiercely, and I now perceived that his eyes began to
glisten and to glare very wildly. It had not escaped my
observation
,
that the last pill which he had taken was greatly larger
than any he had used before; and I then remembered, that
before
the marriage ceremony was performed, on the previous
night, he had opened the box more than once, in my presence,
and I noted that it contained a good many. By this time we
reached the banks of the river. He turned full upon me.
`Rayner,' said he, `you're a good fellow, but you must go home
to your wife.'`It's impossible,' said I, `to leave you.'`We'll,
see to that,' said he, and he turned towards the river. I took it for
certain he was going to plunge in, and I jumped forward to seize
him, but, just as my arms were extended to embrace him, he
wheeled about and clapped a pistol to my head. I started back,
quickly enough, as you may suppose; and he exclaimed`Ah!
Rayner, you are a good fellow, but you cannot prevent the
journey. Farewell!' With these words he flung me the pistol,
which I afterwards found was unloaded, and, before I could speak
or think, he sprang from the bluff into the stream. It appeared
to me as if I heard the splash before I saw the motion. I ran up
the bluff where he had stood, as soon as I could recover myself,
and saw where the water-rings were spreading in great circles
where he had gone down. I didn't give myself a moment after
that. I could swim like a duck and dive like a serpent, and had
no fear of the water for myself; so in I jumped, and fished about
as long as I could stand it underneath; but I could find nothing
of him. He had given himself up to the currents so entirely,
that they whirled him out of sight in a minute. When I rose and
got to the shore, I saw his hat floating among some bushes on
the other shore. But as for poor Mr. Eckhardt, he was gone,
sure enough, upon his last journey!
You see our little family. The boy is very much like him
in looks, and I reckon in understanding. He's very thoughtful
and smart. We are happy, stranger, and I don't believe that
Mr. Eckhardt was wrong in his notion that I would make Rachel
happy. She tells me she is, and it makes me happy to believe
her. It makes her sad to see the cards, and sad to hear of them,
but she thinks it best for our boy that he should hear the story
and learn it all by heart; and that makes her patient, and
patience
brings a sort of peace along with it that's pretty much like
happiness. I could tell you more, my friend, but it's not
needful
,
and your eyes look as if they had kept open long enough for
one sitting. So come with me, and let me show you where you
are to lie down!
These words roused me! I half suspect that I was drowsing
in my chair. I can hardly suppose, dear reader, that you could
be capable of an act of like forgetfulness.
THE ARM-CHAIR OF TUSTENUGGEE.
A TRADITION OF THE CATAWBA.
CHAPTER I.
The
windy month had set in, the leaves were falling, and the
light-footed
hunters of Catawba, set forth upon the chase. Little groups
went off in every direction, and before two weeks had elapsed
from the beginning of the campaign, the whole nation was broken
up into parties, each under the guidance of an individual warrior.
The course of the several hunting bands was taken according to
the tastes or habits of these leaders. Some of the Indians were
famous for their skill in hunting the otter, could swim as long
with head under water as himself, and be not far from his
haunches, when he emerged to breathe. These followed the
course of shallow waters and swamps, and thick, dense bays, in
which it was known that he found his favourite haunts. The bear
hunter pushed for the cane brakes and the bee trees; and woe
to the black bear whom he encountered with his paws full of
honeycomb, which he was unwilling to leave behind him. The
active warrior took his way towards the hills, seeking for the
brown wolf and the deer; and, if the truth were known, smiled
with wholesale contempt at the more timorous who desired less
adventurous triumphs. Many set forth in couples only, avoiding
with care all the clamorous of the tribe; and some few, the more
surly or successfulthe inveterate bachelors of the nationwere
content to make their forward progress alone. The old men
prepared
their traps and nets, the boys their blow guns, and followed
with the squaws slowly, according to the division made by the
hunters among themselves. They carried the blankets and bread
stuffs, and camped nightly in noted places, to which, according to
previous arrangement, the hunters might repair at evening and
bring their game. In this way, some of the tribes followed the
course of the Catawba, even to its source. Others darted off
towards the Pacolet and Broad rivers, and there were some, the
most daring and swift of foot, who made nothing of a journey to
the Tiger river, and the rolling mountains of Spartanburg.
There were two warriors who pursued this course. One of
them was named Conattee, and a braver man and more fortunate
hunter never lived. But he had a wife who was a greater scold
than Xantippe. She was the wonder and the terror of the tribe,
and quite as ugly as the one-eyed squaw of Tustenuggee, the
grey demon of Enoree. Her tongue was the signal for "
slinking
,"
among the bold hunters of Turkey-town; and when they
heard it, "now," said the young women, who sympathised, as all
proper young women will do, with the handsome husband of an
ugly wife, "now," said they, "we know that poor Conattee has
come home." The return of the husband, particularly if he
brought no game, was sure to be followed by a storm of that
"dry thunder," so well known, which never failed to be heard at
the farthest end of the village.
The companion of Conattee on the present expedition was named
Seloneeone of the handsomest lads in the whole nation. He
was tall and straight like a pine tree; had proved his skill and
courage in several expeditions against the Chowannee red sticks,
and had found no young warriors of the Cherokee, though he had
been on the war path against them and had stricken all their posts,
who could circumvent him in stratagem or conquer him in actual
blows. His renown as a hunter was not less great. He had put
to shame the best wolf-takers of the tribe, and the lodge of his
venerable father, Chifonti, was never without meat. There was
no good reason why Conattee, the married man, should be so
intimate
with Selonee, the singlethere was no particular
sympathy
between the two; but, thrown together in sundry expeditions,
they had formed an intimacy, which, strange to say, was neither
denounced nor discouraged by the virago wife of the former. She
who approved of but few of her husband's movements, and still
fewer of his friends and fellowships, forbore all her reproaches
when Selonee was his companion. She was the meekest, gentlest,
sweetest tempered of all wives whenever the young hunter came
home with her husband; and he, poor man, was consequently,
never so well satisfied as when he brought Selonee with him. It
was on such occasions, only, that the poor Conattee could persuade
himself to regard Macourah as a tolerable personage. How he
came to marry such a creaturesuch a termagant, and so
monstrous
uglywas a mystery which none of the damsels of Catawba
could elucidate, though the subject was one on which, when
mending the young hunter's mocasins, they expended no small
quantity of conjecture. Conattee, we may be permitted to say,
was still quite popular among them, in spite of his bad taste, and
manifest unavailableness; possibly, for the very reason that his
wife was universally detested; and it will, perhaps, speak
something
for their charity, if we pry no deeper into their motives, to
say that the wish was universal among them that the Opitchi
Manneyto
,
or Black Devil of their belief, would take the virago to
himself, and leave to the poor Conattee some reasonable hope of
being made happy by a more indulgent spouse.
CHAPTER II.
Well,
Conattee and Selonee were out of sight of the smoke of
Turkey-town, and, conscious of his freedom as he no longer
heard the accents of domestic authority, the henpecked husband
gave a loose to his spirits, and made ample amends to himself, by
the indulgence of joke and humour, for the sober constraints which
fettered him at home. Selonee joined with him in his merriment,
and the resolve was mutual that they should give the squaws the
slip and not linger in their progress till they had thrown the Tiger
river behind them. To trace their course till they came to the
famous hunting ground which bordered upon the Pacolet, will
scarcely be necessary, since, as they did not stop to hunt by the
way, there were necessarily but few incidents to give interest to
their movements. When they had reached the river, however,
they made for a cove, well known to them on previous seasons,
which lay between the parallel waters of the Pacolet, and a little
stream called the Thickettya feeder of the Eswawpuddenah, in
which they had confident hopes of finding the game which they
desired
.
In former years the spot had been famous as a sheltering place
for herds of wolves; and, with something like the impatience of a
warrior waiting for his foe, the hunters prepared their strongest
shafts and sharpest flints, and set their keen eyes upon the closest
places of the thicket, into which they plunged fearlessly. They
had not proceeded far, before a single boar-wolf, of amazing size,
started up in their path; and, being slightly wounded by the
arrow
of Selonee, which glanced first upon some twigs beneath
which he-lay, he darted off with a fearful howl in the direction of
Conattee, whose unobstructed shaft, penetrating the side beneath
the fore shoulders, inflicted a fearful, if not a fatal wound, upon
the now thoroughly enraged beast. He rushed upon Conattee in his
desperation, but the savage was too quick for him; leaping behind
a tree, he avoided the rashing stroke with which the white tusks
threatened him, and by this time was enabled to fit a second arrow
to his bow. His aim was true, and the stone blade of the shaft
went quivering into the shaggy monster's heart; who, under the
pang of the last convulsion, bounded into the muddy waters of the
Thicketty Creek, to the edge of which the chase had now brought
all the parties. Conattee beheld him plunge furiously forward
twicethricethen rest with his nostrils in the water, as the
current bore him from sight around a little elbow of the creek.
But it was not often that the Indian hunter of those days lost the
game which he had stricken. Conattee stripped to it, threw his
fringed hunting shirt of buckskin on the bank, with his bow and
arrows, his mocasins and leggins beside it, and reserving only his
knife, he called to Selonee, who was approaching him, to keep
them in sight, and plunged into the water in pursuit of his victim.
Selonee gave little heed to the movements of his companion, after
the first two or three vigorous strokes which he beheld him make.
Such a pursuit, as it promised no peril, called for little
consideration
from this hardy and fearless race, and Selonee amused
himself
by striking into a thick copse which they had not yet
traversed
,
in search of other sport. There he started the she-wolf,
and found sufficient employment on his own hands to call for all
his attention to himself. When Selonee first came in sight of her,
she was lying on a bed of rushes and leaves, which she had prepared
under the roots of a gigantic Spanish oak. Her cubs, to the
number of five, lay around her, keeping a perfect silence, which
she had no doubt enforced upon them after her own fashion, and
which was rigidly maintained until they saw him. It was then
that the instincts of the fierce beasts could no longer be
suppressed
,
and they joined at once in a short chopping bark, or cry, at
the stranger, while their little eyes flashed fire, and their red jaws,
thinly sprinkled with the first teeth, were gnashed together with a
show of that ferocious hatred of man, which marks their nature,
but which, fortunately for Selonee, was too feeble at that time to
make his approach to them dangerous. But the dam demanded
greater consideration. With one sweep of her fore-paw she drew
all the young ones behind her, and showing every preparedness
for flight, she began to move backward slowly beneath the
over-hanging
limbs of the tree, still keeping her keen, fiery eye fixed
upon the hunter. But Selonee was not disposed to suffer her to
get off so easily. The success of Conattee had just given him
sufficient provocation to make him silently resolve that the
she-wolf
who
is always more to be dreaded than the male, as, with
nearly all his strength, she has twice his swiftness, and, with her
young about her, more than twice his ferocityshould testify
more completely to his prowess than the victory just obtained by
his companion could possibly speak for his. His eye was fixed
upon
hers, and hers, never for a moment, taken from him. It was
his object to divert it, since he well knew, that with his first
movement
,
she would most probably spring upon him. Without lifting
his bow, which he nevertheless had in readiness, he whistled
shrilly as if to his dog; and answered himself by a correct
imitation
of the bark of the Indian cur, the known enemy of the wolf,
and commonly his victim. The keen eye of the angry beast
looked suddenly around as if fearing an assault upon her young
ones from behind. In that moment, the arrow of Selonee was
driven through her neck, and when she leaped forward to the
place where he stood, he was no longer to be seen.
From a tree which he had thrown between them, he watched
her movements and prepared a second shaft. Meanwhile she
made her way back slowly to her young, and before she could
again turn towards him a second arrow had given her another
and severer wound. Still, as Selonee well knew the singular
tenacity of life possessed by these fierce animals, he prudently
changed his position with every shaft, and took especial care to
place himself in the rear of some moderately sized tree,
sufficiently
large to shelter him from her claws, yet small enough to
enable him to take free aim around it. Still he did not, at any
time, withdraw more than twenty steps from his enemy. Divided
in her energies by the necessity of keeping near her young, he
was conscious of her inability to pursue him far. Carrying on
the war in this manner he had buried no less than five arrows in
her body, and it was not until his sixth had penetrated her eye,
that he deemed himself safe in the nearer approach which he now
meditated. She had left her cubs, on receiving his last shot, and
was writhing and leaping, blinded, no less than maddened, by the
wound, in a vain endeavour to approach her assailant. It was
now that Selonee determined on a closer conflict. It was the
great boast of the Catawba warriors to grapple with the wolf, and
while he yet struggled, to tear the quick quivering heart from his
bosom. He placed his bow and arrows behind the tree, and
taking in his left hand a chunk or fragment of a bough, while he
grasped his unsheathed knife in his right, he leapt in among the
cubs, and struck one of them a severe blow upon the head with
the chunk. Its scream, and the confusion among the rest, brought
back the angry dam, and though she could see only imperfectly,
yet, guided by their clamour, she rushed with open jaws upon the
hunter. With keen, quick eyes, and steady resolute nerves, he
waited for her approach, and when she turned her head aside, to
strike him with her sharp teeth, he thrust the pine fragment which
he carried in his left hand, into her extended jaws, and pressing
fast upon her, bore back her haunches to the earth. All this while
the young ones were impotently gnawing at the heels of the
warrior
,
which had been fearlessly planted in the very midst of them.
But these he did not heed. The larger and fiercer combatant
called for all his attention, and her exertions, quickened by the
spasms of her wounds, rendered necessary all his address and
strength to preserve the advantage he had gained. The fierce
beast had sunk her teeth by this into the wood, and, leaving
it in her jaws, he seized her with the hand, now freed, by the
throat, and, bearing her upward, so as to yield him a plain and
easy stroke at her belly, he drove the deep knife into it, and drew
the blade upwards, until resisted by the bone of the breast. It
was then, while she lay writhing and rolling upon the ground in
the agonies of death, that he tore the heart from the opening he
had made, and hurled it down to the cubs, who seized on it with
avidity. This done, he patted and caressed them, and while they
struggled about him for the meat, he cut a fork in the ears of
each, and putting the slips in his pouch, left the young ones
without further hurt, for the future sport of the hunter. The
dam he scalped, and with this trophy in possession, he pushed
back to the place where he had left the accoutrements of
Conattee
,
which he found undisturbed in the place where he had
laid them.
CHAPTER III.
But
where was Conattee himself during all this period? Some
hours had elapsed since he had taken the river after the tiger that
he had slain, and it was something surprising to Selonee that he
should have remained absent and without his clothes so long.
The weather was cold and unpleasant, and it could scarce be a
matter of choice with the hunter, however hardy, to suffer all its
biting bleaknesses when his garments were within his reach.
This reflection made Selonee apprehensive that some harm had
happened to his companion. He shouted to him, but received no
answer. Could he have been seized with the cramp while in the
stream, and drowned before he could extricate himself. This
was a danger to which the very best of swimmers is liable at
certain seasons of the year, and in certain conditions of the body.
Selonee reproached himself that he had not waited beside the
stream until the result of Conattee's experiment was known.
The mind of the young hunter was troubled with many fears and
doubts. He went down the bank of the river, and called aloud
with all his lungs, until the woods and waters re-echoed, again
and again, the name of Conattee. He received no other response.
With a mind filled with increasing fears, each more unpleasant
than the last, Selonee plunged into the creek, and struck off for
the opposite shore, at the very point at which the tiger had been
about to turn, under the influence of the current, when Conattee
went in after him. He was soon across, and soon found the
tracks of the hunter in the gray sands upon its margin. He
found, too, to his great delight, the traces made by the carcass of
the tigerthe track was distinct enough from the blood which
dropped from the reeking skin of the beast, and Selonee rejoiced
in the certainty that the traces which he followed would soon lead
him to his friend. But not so. He had scarcely gone fifty yards
into the wood when his tracks failed him at the foot of a crooked,
fallen tree, one of the most gnarled and complicated of all the
crooked trees of the forest; here all signs disappeared. Conattee
was not only not there, but had left no sort of clue by which to
follow him further. This was the strangest thing of all. The
footprints were distinct enough till he came to the spot where lay
the crooked tree, but there he lost them. He searched the forest
around him, in every direction. Not a copse escaped his search
not a baynot a thicketnot an islandand he came back to
the spot where the tiger had been skinned, faint and weary, and
more sorrowful than can well be spoken. At one time he fancied
his friend was drowned, at another, that he was taken prisoner
by the Cherokees. But there were his tracks from the river, and
there were no other tracks than his own. Besides, so far as the
latter supposition was concerned, it was scarcely possible that so
brave and cunning a warrior would suffer himself to be so
completely
entrapped and carried off by an enemy, without so much
as being able to give the alarm; and, even had that been the case,
would it be likely that the enemy would have suffered him to pass
without notice. But, here the suggestion naturally arose in
the mind of Selonee, may they not even now be on the track!
With the suggestion the gallant youth bounded to his feet. It
is not fat turkey that they seek! he exclaimed, drawing out an
arrow from the leash that hung upon his shoulders, and fitting it
to his bow, while his busy, glancing eye watched every shadow
in the wood, and his keen, quick ear noted every sound. But
there were no signs of an enemy, and a singular and mournful
stillness hung over the woods. Never was creature more
miserable than Selonee. He called aloud, until his voice grew
hoarse, and his throat sore, upon the name of Conattee. There
was no answer, but the gibing echoes of his own hoarse accents.
Once more he went back to the river, once more he plunged into
its bosom, and with lusty sinews struck out for a thick green island
that lay some quarter of a mile below, to which he thought it not
improbable that the hunter might have wandered in pursuit of
other game. It was a thickly wooded but small island, which he
traversed in an hour. Finding nothing, he made his weary way
back to the spot from which his friend had started on leaving him.
Here he found his clothes where he had hidden them. The
neighbourhood of this region he traversed in like manner with
10
the oppositegoing over ground, and into places, which it was
scarcely in the verge of physical possibility that his friend's
person
could have gone.
The day waned and night came on, and still the persevering
hunter gave not up his search. The midnight found him at the
foot of the tree, where they had parted, exhausted but sleepless,
and suffering bitterly in mind from those apprehensions which
every moment of hopeless search had necessarily helped to
accumulate and strengthen. Day dawned, and his labour was
renewed. The unhappy warrior went resolutely over all the
ground which he had traversed the night before. Once more he
crossed the river, and followed, step by step, the still legible foot
tracks of Conattee. These, he again noted, were all in the
opposite
direction to the stream, to which it was evident he had not
returned. But, after reaching the place where lay the fallen
tree, all signs failed. Selonee looked round the crooked tree,
crawled under its sprawling and twisted limbs, broke into the
hollow which was left by its uptorn roots, and again shouted, until
all the echoes gave back his voice, the name of Conattee,
imploring
him for an answer if he could hear him and reply. But the
echoes died away, leaving him in a silence that spoke more loudly
to his heart than before, that his quest was hopeless. Yet he
gave it not up until the day had again failed him. That night,
as before, he slept upon the ground. With the dawn, he again
went over it, and with equally bad success. This done, he
determined
to return to the camp. He no longer had any spirit to
pursue the sports for which alone he had set forth. His heart
was full of sorrow, his limbs were weary, and he felt none of that
vigorous elasticity which had given him such great renown as a
brave and a hunter, among his own and the neighbouring nations.
He tied the clothes of Conattee upon his shoulders, took his bow
and arrows, now sacred in his sight, along with him, and turned
his eyes homeward. The next day, at noon, he reached the
encampment.
CHAPTER IV.
The
hunters were all in the woods, and none but the squaws
and the papooses left in the encampment. Selonee came within
sight of their back settlements, and seated himself upon a log at
the edge of the forest with his back carefully turned towards the
smoke of the camp. Nobody ventured to approach him while in
this situation; but, at night, when the hunters came dropping in,
one by one, Selonee drew nigh to them. He called them apart
from the women, and then told them his story.
This is a strange tale which the wolf-chief tells us, said
one of the old men, with a smile of incredulity.
It is a true tale, father, was the reply.
Conattee was a brave chief!
Very brave, father, said Selonee.
Had he not eyes to see?
The great bird, that rises to the sun, had not better, was the
reply.
What painted jay was it that said Conattee was a fool?
The painted bird lied, that said so, my father, was the
response of Selonee.
And comes Selonee, the wolf-chief, to us, with a tale that
Conattee was blind, and could not see; a coward that could not
strike the she-wolf; a fool that knew not where to set down his
foot; and shall we not say Selonee lies upon his brother, even as
the painted bird that makes a noise in my ears. Selonee has
slain Conattee with his knife. See, it is the blood of Conattee
upon the war-shirt of Selonee.
It is the blood of the she-wolf, cried the young warrior,
with a natural indignation.
Let Selonee go to the woods behind the lodges, till the chiefs
say what shall be done to Selonee, because of Conattee, whom he
slew.
Selonee will go, as Emathla, the wise chief, has commanded,
13
replied the young warrior. He will wait behind the lodges, till
the chiefs have said what is good to be done to him, and if they
say that he must die because of Conattee, it is well. Selonee
laughs at death. But the blood of Conattee is not upon the
war-shirt
of Selonee. He has said it is the blood of the wolf's mother.
With these words the young chief drew forth the skin of the wolf
which he had slain, together with the tips of the ears taken from
the cubs, and leaving them in the place where he had sat,
withdrew
,
without further speech, from the assembly which was about
to sit in judgment upon his life.
CHAPTER V.
The
consultation that followed was close and earnest. There
was scarcely any doubt in the minds of the chiefs that Conattee
was slain by his companion. He had brought back with him the
arms and all the clothes of the hunter. He was covered with his
blood, as they thought; and the grief which filled his heart and
depressed his countenance, looked, in their eyes, rather like the
expression of guilt than suffering. For a long while did they
consult together. Selonee had friends who were disposed to save
him; but he had enemies also, as merit must have always, and
these were glad of the chance afforded them to put out of their
reach, a rival of whom they were jealous, and a warrior whom
they feared. Unfortunately for Selonee, the laws of the nation
but too well helped the malice of his foes. These laws, as
peremptory
as those of the Medes and Persians, held him liable in his
own life for that of the missing hunter; and the only indulgence
that could be accorded to Selonee, and which was obtained for
him, was, that he might be allowed a single moon in which to find
Conattee, and bring him home to his people.
Will Selonee go seek Conatteethe windy moon is for
Selonee
let
him bring Conattee home to his people. Thus said the
chiefs, when the young warrior was again brought before them.
Selonee would die to find Conattee, was the reply.
He will die if he finds him not! answered the chief
Emathla.
It is well! calmly spoke the young warrior. Is Selonee
free to go?
The windy moon is for Selonee. Will he return to the lodges
if he finds not Conattee? was the inquiry of Emathla.
Is Selonee a dog, to fly! indignantly demanded the warrior.
Let Emathla send a young warrior on the right and on the left
of Selonee, if he trusts not what is spoken by Selonee.
Selonee will go alone, and bring back Conattee.
CHAPTER VI.
The
confidence thus reposed in one generally esteemed a
murderer
,
and actually under sentence as such, is customary among
the Indians; nor is it often abused. The loss of caste which
would follow their flight from justice, is much more terrible
among them than any fear of deathwhich an Indian may avoid,
but not through fear. Their loss of caste among themselves,
apart from the outlawry which follows it, is, in fact, a loss of the
soul. The heaven of the great Manneyto is denied to one under
outlawry of the nation, and such a person is then the known and
chosen slave of the demon, Opitchi-Manneyto. It was held an
unnecessary
insult on the part of Emathla, to ask Selonee if he
would return to meet his fate. But Emathla was supposed to
favour
the enemies of Selonee.
With such a gloomy alternative before him in the event of his
proving unsuccessful, the young hunter retraced his steps to the
fatal waters where Conattee had disappeared. With a spirit no
less warmly devoted to his friend, than anxious to avoid the
disgraceful
doom to which he was destined, the youth spared no pains,
withheld no exertion, overlooked no single spot, and omitted no
art known to the hunter, to trace out the mystery which covered
the fate of Conattee. But days passed of fruitless labour, and the
last faint slender outlines of the moon which had been allotted
him for the search, gleamed forth a sorrowful light upon his path,
as he wearily traced it onward to the temporary lodges of the
tribe.
Once more he resumed his seat before the council and listened
to the doom which was in reserve for him. When the sentence
was pronounced, he untied his arrows, loosened the belt at his
waist, put a fillet around his head, made of the green bark of a
little sapling which he cut in the neighbouring woods, then rising
to his feet, he spoke thus, in language, and with a spirit, becoming
so great a warrior.
It is well. The chiefs have spoken, and the wolf-chief does
not tremble. He loves the chase, but he does not weep like a
woman, because it is forbidden that he go after the deerhe loves
to fright the young hares of the Cherokee, but he laments not that
ye say ye can conquer the Cherokee without his help. Fathers,
I have slain the deer and the wolfmy lodge is full of their ears.
I have slain the Cherokee, till the scalps are about my knees
when I walk in the cabin. I go not to the dark valley without
gloryI have had the victories of grey hairs, but there is no grey
hair in my own. I have no more to saythere is a deed for
every arrow that is here. Bid the young men get their bows
ready, let them put a broad stone upon their arrows that may go
soon into the lifeI will show my people how to die.
They led him forth as he commanded, to the place of execution
a little space behind the encampment, where a hole had been
already dug for his burial. While he went, he recited his
victories
to the youths who attended him. To each he gave an
arrow
which he was required to keep, and with this arrow, he
related
some incident in which he had proved his valour, either in
conflict with some other warrior, or with the wild beasts of the
woods. These deeds, each of them was required to remember and
relate, and show the arrow which was given with the narrative on
occasion of this great state solemnity. In this way, their traditions
are preserved. When he reached the grave, he took his station
before it, the executioners, with their arrows, being already
placed in readiness. The whole tribe had assembled to
witness
the execution, the warriors and boys in the foreground, the
squaws behind them. A solemn silence prevailed over the scene,
and a few moments only remained to the victim; when the wife
of Conattee darted forward from the crowd bearing in her hands
a peeled wand, with which, with every appearance of anger, she
struck Selonee over the shoulders, exclaiming as she did so:
Come, thou dog, thou shalt not diethou shalt lie in the
door-way
of Conattee, and bring venison for his wife. Shall there be
no one to bring meat to my lodge? Thou shalt do this, Selonee
thou shalt not die.
A murmur arose from the crowd at these words.
She hath claimed Selonee for her husband, in place of
Conattee
well,
she hath the right.
The enemies of Selonee could not object. The widow had, in
fact, exercised a privilege which is recognized by the Indian laws
almost universally; and the policy by which she was governed
in the present instance, was sufficiently apparent to all the
village
.
It was evident, now that Conattee was gone, that nobody
could provide for the woman who had no sons, and no male
relations
,
and who was too execrably ugly, and too notorious as a scold,
to leave it possible that she could ever procure another husband
so inexperienced or so flexible as the one she had lost. Smartly
striking Selonee on his shoulders, she repeated her command
that he should rise and follow her.
Thou wilt take this dog to thy lodge, that he may hunt thee
venison? demanded the old chief, Emathla.
Have I not said? shouted the scoldhear you not? The
dog is mineI bid him follow me.
Is there no friendly arrow to seek my heart? murmured the
young warrior, as, rising slowly from the grave into which he
had previously descended, he prepared to obey the laws of his
nation
,
in the commands of the woman who claimed him to replace
the husband who was supposed to have died by his hands. Even
the foes of Selonee looked on him with lessened hostility, and the
pity of his friends was greater now than when he stood on the
precipice of death. The young women of the tribe wept
bitterly
as they beheld so monstrous a sacrifice. Meanwhile, the
exulting
hag, as if conscious of her complete control over the
victim
,
goaded him forward with repeated strokes of her wand.
She knew that she was hated by all the young women, and she
was delighted to show them a conquest which would have been
a subject of pride to any among them. With this view she led
the captive through their ranks. As they parted mournfully, on
either hand, to suffer the two to pass, Selonee stopped short and
motioned one of the young women who stood at the greatest
distance
behind the rest, looking on with eyes which, if they had
no tears, yet gave forth an expression of desolateness more woful
than any tears could have done. With clasped hands, and
trembling
as she came, the gentle maiden drew nigh.
Was it a dream, said Selonee sorrowfully, that told me of
the love of a singing bird, and a green cabin by the trickling
waters? Did I hear a voice that said to me sweetly, wait but a
little, till the green corn breaks the hill, and Medoree will come
to thy cabin and lie by thy side? Tell me, is this thing true,
Medoree?
Thou sayest, Seloneethe thing is true, was the reply of
the maiden, uttered in broken accents that denoted a breaking
heart.
But they will make Selonee go to the lodge of another woman
they will put Macourah into the arms of Selonee.
Alas! Alas!
Wilt thou see this thing, Medoree? Can'st thou look upon
it, then turn away, and going back to thy own lodge, can'st thou
sing a gay song of forgetfulness as thou goest?
Forgetfulness!Ah, Selonee.
Thou art the beloved of Selonee, Medoreethou shalt not
lose him. It would vex thy heart that another should take him
to her lodge!
The tears of the damsel flowed freely down her cheeks, and
she sobbed bitterly, but said nothing.
Take the knife from my belt, Medoree, and put its sharp
tooth into my heart, ere thou sufferest this thing! Wilt thou
not?
The girl shrunk back with an expression of undisguised
horror
in her face.
I will bless thee, Medoree, was the continued speech of
the warrior. She turned from him, covering her face with her
hands.
I cannot do this thing, SeloneeI cannot strike thy heart
with the knife. Golet the woman have thee. Medoree cannot
kill theeshe will herself die.
It is well, cried the youth, in a voice of mournful
self-abandonment
,
as he resumed his progress towards the lodge of
Macourah
.
CHAPTER VI.
It
is now time to return to Conattee, and trace his progress
from the moment when, plunging into the waters, he left the side
of Selonee in pursuit of the wolf, whose dying struggles in the
stream he had beheld. We are already acquainted with his
success
in extricating the animal from the water, and possessing
himself
of its hide. He had not well done this when he heard a
rushing
noise in the woods above him, and fancying that there was a
prospect of other game at hand, and inflated with the hope of
adding
to his trophies, though without any weapon but his knife,
Conattee
hastened to the spot. When he reached it, however, he
beheld nothing. A gigantic and singularly deformed pine tree,
crooked and most irregular in shape, lay prostrate along the
ground, and formed such an intricate covering above it, that
Conattee
deemed it possible that some beast of prey might have
made its den among the recesses of its roots. With this thought,
he crawled under the spreading limbs, and searched all their
intricacies
.
Emerging from the search, which had been fruitless,
he took a seat upon the trunk of the tree, and spreading out the
wolf's hide before him, proceeded to pare away the particles of
flesh which, in the haste with which he had performed the task
of flaying him, had been suffered to adhere to the skin. But he
had scarcely commenced the operation, when two gigantic limbs
of the fallen tree upon which he sat, curled over his thighs and
bound him to the spot. Other limbs, to his great horror, while he
strove to move, clasped his arms and covered his shoulders. He
strove to cry aloud, but his jaws were grasped before he could
well open them, by other branches; and, with his eyes, which
were suffered to peer through little openings in the bark, he could
see his legs encrusted by like coverings with his other members.
Still seeing, his own person yet escaped his sight. Not a part of
it now remained visible to himself. A bed of green velvet-like
moss rested on his lap. His knees shot out a thorny excrescence;
and his hands, flattened to his thighs, were enveloped in as
complete
a casing of bark as covered the remainder of the tree around
him. Even his knife and wolf skin, to his great surprise, suffered
in like manner, the bark having contracted them into one of those
huge bulging knobs that so numerously deformed the tree. With
all his thoughts and consciousness remaining, Conattee had yet
lost every faculty of action. When he tried to scream aloud,
his jaws felt the contraction of a pressure upon them, which
resisted
all their efforts, while an oppressive thorn growing upon a
wild vine that hung before his face, was brought by every
movement
of himself or of the tree into his very mouth. The poor
hunter immediately conceived his situationhe was in the power
of Tustenuggee, the Grey Demon of Enoree. The tree upon
which he sat was one of those magic trees which the tradition of
his people entitled the Arm-chair of Tustenuggee. In these
traps for the unwary the wicked demon caught his victim, and
exulted in his miseries. Here he sometimes remained until death
released him; for it was not often that the power into whose
clutches he had fallen, suffered his prey to escape through a
sudden
feeling of lenity and good humour. The only hope of
Conattee
was that Selonee might suspect his condition; in which
event his rescue was simple and easy enough. It was only to
hew off the limbs, or pare away the bark, and the victim was
uncovered
in his primitive integrity. But how improbable that this
discovery should be made. He had no voice to declare his
bondage
.
He had no capacity for movement by which he might
reveal
the truth to his comrade's eyes; and unless some divine
instinct
should counsel his friend to an experiment which he would
scarcely think upon, of himself, the poor prisoner felt that he must
die in the miserable bondage into which he had fallen. While
these painful convictions were passing through his mind, he heard
the distant shoutings of Selonee. In a little while he beheld the
youth anxiously seeking him in every quarter, following his trail
at length to the very tree in which he was bound, crawling like
himself beneath its branches, but not sitting like himself to be
caught upon its trunk. Vainly did the poor fellow strive to utter
but a few words, however faintly, apprising the youth of his
condition
.
The effort died away in the most imperfect breathing,
sounding in his own ears like the faint sigh of some budding
flower. With equal ill success did he aim to struggle with his
limbs. He was too tightly grasped, in every part, to stir in the
slightest degree a single member. He saw the fond search,
meanwhile
,
which his comrade maintained, and his heart yearned the
more in fondness for the youth. But it was with consummate
horror that he saw him depart as night came on. Miserable,
indeed
,
were his feelings that night. The voice of the Grey Demon
alone kept him company, and he and his one-eyed wife made
merry with his condition, goading him the livelong night with
speeches of cruel gibe and mischievous reflection, such as the
following:
There is no hope for you, Conattee, till some one takes your
place. Some one must sit in your lap, whom you are willing to
leave behind you, before you can get out of mine, was the speech
of the Grey Demon, who, perched upon Conattee's shoulders, bent
his huge knotty head over him, while his red eyes looked into the
half-hidden ones of the environed hunter, and glared upon him
with the exultation of the tyrant at last secure of his prey. Night
passed away at length, and, with the dawn, how was the hopeless
heart of Conattee refreshed as he again saw Selonee appear. He
then remembered the words of Tustenuggee, which told him that
he could not escape until some one sat in his lap whom he was
willing to leave behind him. The fancy rose in his mind that
Selonee would do this; but could it be that he would consent to
leave his friend behind him. Life was sweet, and great was the
temptation. At one moment he almost wished that Selonee would
draw nigh and seat himself after his fatigue. As if the young
hunter knew his wish, he drew nigh at that instant; but the
better
feelings in Conattee's heart grew strong as he approached, and,
striving to twist and writhe in his bondage, and labouring at the
same time to call out in warning to his friend, he manifested the
noble resolution not to avail himself of his friend's position to
relieve
his own; and, as if the warning of Conattee had really
reached the understanding of Selonee, the youth retraced his
steps, and once more hurried away from the place of danger.
With his final departure the fond hopes of the prisoner sunk within
him; and when hour after hour had gone by without the
appearance
of any of his people, and without any sort of change in his
condition, he gave himself up utterly for lost. The mocks and
jeers of the Grey Demon and his one-eyed squaw filled his ears
all night, and the morning brought him nothing but flat despair.
He resigned himself to his fate with the resolution of one who,
however unwilling he might be to perish in such a manner, had
yet faced death too frequently not to yield him a ready defiance
now.
CHAPTER VII.
But
hope had not utterly departed from the bosom of Selonee.
Perhaps the destiny which had befallen himself had made him
resolve the more earnestly to seek farther into the mystery of that
which hung above the fate of his friend. The day which saw him
enter the cabin of Macourah saw him the most miserable man
alive. The hateful hag, hateful enough as the wife of his friend,
whose ill treatment was notorious, was now doubly hateful to him
as his own wife; and now, when, alone together, she threw aside
the harsh and termagant features which had before distinguished
her deportment, and, assuming others of a more amorous
complexion
,
threw her arms about the neck of the youth and solicited
his endearments, a loathing sensation of disgust was coupled with
the hate which had previously possessed his mind. Flinging
away from her embrace, he rushed out of the lodge with feelings
of the most unspeakable bitterness and grief, and bending his way
towards the forest, soon lost sight of the encampment of his people.
Selonee was resolved on making another effort for the recovery
of his friend. His resolve went even farther than this. He was
bent never to return to the doom which had been fastened upon
him, and to pursue his way into more distant and unknown forests
a self-doomed exileunless he could restore Conattee to the
nation. Steeled against all those ties of love or of country, which
at one time had prevailed in his bosom over all, he now
surrendered
himself to friendship or despair. In Catawba, unless he
restored Conattee, he could have no hope; and without Catawba
he had neither hope nor love. On either hand he saw nothing
but misery; but the worst form of misery lay behind him in the
lodge of Macourah. But Macourah was not the person to submit
to such a determination. She was too well satisfied with the
exchange
with which fortune had provided her, to suffer its gift to
be lost so easily; and when Selonee darted from the cabin in
such fearful haste, she readily conjectured his determination.
She hurried after him with all possible speed, little doubting that
those thunderscould she overtake himwith which she had so
frequently overawed the pliant Conattee, would possess an effect
not less influential upon his more youthful successor. Macourah
was gaunt as a greyhound, and scarcely less fleet of foot.
Besides
,
she was as tough as a grey-squirrel in his thirteenth year.
She did not despair of overtaking Selonee, provided she suffered
him not to know that she was upon his trail. Her first
movements
therefore were marked with caution. Having watched his
first direction, she divined his aim to return to the hunting grounds
where he had lost or slain his companion; and these hunting
grounds were almost as well known to herself as to him. With
a rapidity of movement, and a tenacity of purpose, which could
only be accounted for by a reference to that wild passion which
Selonee had unconsciously inspired in her bosom for himself, she
followed his departing footsteps; and when, the next day, he
heard her shouts behind him, he was absolutely confounded. But
it was with a feeling of surprise and not of dissatisfaction that he
heard her voice. Hegood youthregarding Conattee as one
of the very worthiest of the Catawba warriors, seemed to have
been impressed with an idea that such also was the opinion of his
wife. He little dreamed that she had any real design upon
himself
;
and believed that, to show her the evidences which were to
be seen, which led to the fate of her husband, might serve to
convince
her that not only he was not the murderer, but that
Conattee
might not, indeed, be murdered at all. He coolly waited her
approach, therefore, and proceeded to renew his statements,
accompanying
his narrative with the expression of the hope which
he entertained of again restoring her husband to herself and the
nation. But she answered his speech only with upbraidings and
entreaties; and when she failed, she proceeded to thump him
lustily with the wand by which she had compelled him to follow
her to the lodge the day before. But Selonee was in no humour
to obey the laws of the nation now. The feeling of degradation
which had followed in his mind, from the moment when he left
the spot where he had stood up for death, having neither fear nor
shame, was too fresh in his consciousness to suffer him to yield a
like acknowledgment to it now; and though sorely tempted to
pummel the Jezabel in return for the lusty thwacks which she
had already inflicted upon his shoulders, he forbore, in
consideration
of his friend, and contented himself with simply setting
forward
on his progress, determined to elude her pursuit by an
exercise
of all his vigour and elasticity. Selonee was hardy as the
grisly bear, and fleeter than the wild turkey; and Macourah,
virago as she was, soon discovered the difference in the chase
when Selonee put forth his strength and spirit. She followed
with all her pertinacity, quickened as it was by an increase of
fury at that presumption which had ventured to disobey her
commands
;
but Selonee fled faster than she pursued, and every
additional
moment served to increase the space botween them. The
hunter lost her from his heels at length, and deemed himself
fortunate
that she was no longer in sight and hearing, when he again
approached the spot where his friend had so mysteriously
disappeared
.
Here he renewed his search with a painful care and
minuteness, which the imprisoned Conattee all the while beheld.
Once more Selonee crawled beneath those sprawling limbs and
spreading arms that wrapped up in their solid and coarse rinds the
person of the warrior. Once more he emerged from the spot
disappointed and hopeless. This he had hardly done when, to
the great horror of the captive, and the annoyance of Selonee, the
shrill shrieks and screams of the too well-known voice of
Macourah
rang through the forests. Selonee dashed forward as he
heard the sounds, and when Macourah reached the spot, which
she did unerringly in following his trail, the youth was already
out of sight.
I can go no further, cried the womana curse on him and
a curse on Conattee, since in losing one I have lost both. I am
too faint to follow. As for Selonee, may the one-eyed witch of
Tustenuggee take him for her dog.
With this delicate imprecation, the virago seated herself in a
state of exhaustion upon the inviting bed of moss which formed
the lap of Conattee. This she had no sooner done, than the
branches relaxed their hold upon the limbs of her husband. The
moment was too precious for delay, and sliding from under her
with an adroitness and strength which were beyond her powers
of prevention, and, indeed, quite too sudden for any effort at
resistance
,
she had the consternation to behold her husband starting
up in full life before her, and, with the instinct of his former
condition
,
preparing to take to flight. She cried to him, but he fled
the fastershe strove to follow him, but the branches which had
relaxed their hold upon her husband had resumed their contracted
grasp upon her limbs. The brown bark was already forming
above her on every hand, and her tongue, allotted a brief term of
liberty, was alone free to assail him. But she had spoken but
few words when the bark encased her jaws, and the ugly thorn
of the vine which had so distressed Conattee, had taken its place
at their portals.
11
CHAPTER VIII.
The
husband looked back but once, when the voice ceased
then, with a shivering sort of joy that his own doom had
undergone
a termination, which he now felt to be doubly fortunate
he made a wide circuit that he might avoid the fatal
neighbourhood
,
and pushed on in pursuit of his friend, whom his eyes, even
when he was surrounded in the tree, had followed in his flight.
It was no easy task, however, to overtake Selonee, flying, as he
did, from the supposed pursuit of the termagant. Great however
was the joy of the young warriors when they did encounter, and
long and fervent was their mutual embrace. Conattee described
his misfortunes, and related the manner in which he was taken;
showed how the bark had encased his limbs, and how the intricate
magic had even engrossed his knife and the wolf skin which had
been the trophy of his victory. But Conattee said not a word of
his wife and her entrapment, and Selonee was left in the
conviction
that his companion owed his escape from the toils to some
hidden change in the tyrannical mood of Tustenuggee, or the
one-eyed woman, his wife.
But the skin and the knife, Conattee, let us not leave them,
said Selonee, let us go back and extricate them from the tree.
Conattee showed some reluctance. He soon said, in the words
of Macbeth, which he did not use however as a quotation, I'll
go no more. But Selonee, who ascribed this reluctance to very
natural apprehensions of the demon from whose clutches he had
just made his escape, declared his readiness to undertake the
adventure
if Conattee would only point out to his eyes the
particular
excrescence in which the articles were enclosed. When the
husband perceived that his friend was resolute, he made a merit
of necessity.
If the thing is to be done, said he, why should you have
the risk, I myself will do it. It would be a woman-fear were I
to shrink from the danger. Let us go.
The process of reasoning by which Conattee came to this
determination
was a very sudden one, and one, too, that will not be
hard to comprehend by every husband in his situation. It was
his fear that if Selonee undertook the business, an unlucky or
misdirected stroke of his knife might sever a limb, or remove some
portions of the bark which did not merit or need removal.
Conattee
trembled at the very idea of the revelations which might
follow such an unhappy result. Strengthening himself,
therefore
,
with all his energies, he went forward with Selonee to the
spot, and while the latter looked on and witnessed the operation,
he proceeded with a nicety and care which amused and
surprised
Selonee, to the excision of the swollen scab upon the tree
in which he had seen his wolf skin encompassed. While he
performed
the operation, which he did as cautiously as if it had been
the extraction of a mote from the eye of a virgin; the beldam in
the tree, conscious of all his movements, and at first flattered with
the hope that he was working for her extrication, maintained the
most ceaseless efforts of her tongue and limbs, but without avail.
Her slight breathing, which Conattee knew where to look for,
more like the sighs of an infant zephyr than the efforts of a
human
bosom, denoted to his ears an overpowering but fortunately
suppressed volcano within; and his heart leaped with a new joy,
which had been unknown to it for many years before, when he
thought that he was now safe, and, he trusted, for ever, from any
of the tortures which he had been fain to endure patiently so long.
When he had finished the operation by which he had re-obtained
his treasures, he ventured upon an impertinence which spoke
surprisingly for his sudden acquisition of confidence; and looking
up through the little aperture in the bark, from whence he had
seen every thing while in the same situation, and from whence
he concluded she was also suffered to see, he took a peepa
quick, quizzical and taunting peep, at those eyes which he had
not so dared to offend before. He drew back suddenly from the
contactso suddenly, indeed, that Selonee, who saw the
proceeding
,
but had no idea of the truth, thought he had been stung by
some insect, and questioned him accordingly.
Let us be off, Selonee, was the hurried answer, we have
nothing to wait for now.
Yes, replied Selonee, and I had forgotten to say to you
that your wife, Macourah, is on her way in search of you. I left
her but a little ways behind, and thought to find her here. I
suppose
she is tired, however, and is resting by the way.
Let her rest, said Conattee, which is an indulgence much
greater than any she ever accorded me. She will find me out
soon enough, without making it needful that I should go in search
of her. Come.
Selonee kindly suppressed the history of the transactions which
had taken place in the village during the time when the hunter
was supposed to be dead; but Conattee heard the facts from other
quarters, and loved Selonee the better for the sympathy he had
shown, not only in coming again to seek for him, but in not
loving
his wife better than he did himself. They returned to the
village, and every body was rejoiced to behold the return of the
hunters. As for the termagant Macourah, nobody but Conattee
knew her fate; and he, like a wise man, kept his secret until
there was no danger of its being made use of to rescue her from
her predicament. Years had passed, and Conattee had found
among the young squaws one that pleased him much better than
the old. He had several children by her, and years and honours
had alike fallen numerously upon his head, when, one day, one of
his own sons, while hunting in the same woods, knocked off one
of the limbs of the Chair of Tustenuggee, and to his great horror
discovered the human arm which they enveloped. This led him
to search farther, and limb after limb became detached under the
unscrupulous action of his hatchet, until the entire but
unconnected
members of the old squaw became visible. The lad
knocked about the fragments with little scruple, never dreaming
how near was his relation to the form which he treated with so
little veneration. When he came home to the lodge and told his
story, Selonee looked at Conattee, but said nothing. The whole
truth was at once apparent to his mind. Conattee, though he still
kept his secret, was seized with a sudden fit of piety, and taking
his sons with him, he proceeded to the spot which he well
remembered
,
and, gathering up the bleached remains, had them carefully
buried in the trenches of the tribe.
It may properly end this story, to say that Selonee wedded the
sweet girl who, though willing to die herself to prevent him from
marrying Macourah, yet positively refused to take his life to
defeat
the same event. It may be well to state, in addition, that
the only reason Conattee ever had for believing that Selonee had
not kept his secret from every body, was that Medoree, the young
wife of the latter, looked on him with a very decided coolness.
But, we will see, muttered Conattee as he felt this conviction.
Selonee will repent of this confidence, since now it will never be
possible for him to persuade her to take a seat in the Arm-chair
of Tustenuggee. Had he been a wise man he would have kept
his secret, and then there would have been no difficulty in getting
rid of a wicked wife.
THE SNAKE OF THE CABIN.
CHAPTER I.
They
talk, said the stranger somewhat abruptly, They
talk of the crimes of wealthy people, and in high life. No doubt
there are very great and many wrong doers among the rich.
People in possession of much wealth, and seeing how greatly it is
worshipped, will very naturally presume upon and abuse its
powers
;but
it is not among the rich only, and in the great city,
that these things happen. The same snake, or one very much like
it, winds his way into the wigwam and the cabinand the poor
silly country girl is as frequently the victim, as the dashing lady
of the city and city fashions. For that matter she is the more
easily liable to imposition, as are all persons who occupy
insulated
positions, and see little of the great struggles of busy life.
The planter and the farmer who dwell in the remote interior
find the face of the visitor too interesting, to scrutinize it very
closely. A pleasant deportment, a specious outside, a gentle and
attractive manner, will win their way in our forest world, without
rendering necessary those formal assurances, that rigid
introduction
,
and those guaranties of well known persons, which the
citizen
requires before you partake of his bread and salt. With us,
on the contrary, we confide readily; and the cunning stranger,
whom other communities have expelled with loathing, rendered
cautious and conciliatory by previous defeat, adopts the subtlety
of the snake, and winds his way as artfully as that reptile, when
he comes among us. We have too many sad stories of this sort.
Yours is one of them. This poor girl, Ellen Ramsay, was
abused thus, as I have shown you, by this scoundrel, Stanton.
But finish your narrative. She had a short time of it, and a sad
one, I do not doubt, with a creature so heartless and so vile.
But a poor eleven months; and the change was too rapid,
said young Atkins, not to let us see that she was any thing but
happy. To-day, the gayest of all God's creatures, as much like
a merry bird in spring-time, singing over its young;to-morrow
as gloomy and miserable as if there was neither song nor sunshine
in God's whole earth.
Poor thing! exclaimed Walter.
It was the shortest life, said the other, to begin so well, that
I ever saw, and the story which you have heard is pretty much
the truth.
But the funeral? said Walter.
Ah! that was not exactly as you heard it, was the reply of
Atkins. I was at the funeral of Ellen Ramsay, as indeed was
very nearly all the village, and I could refer you to twenty who
will tell you the matter just as it occurred. In the first place, it
is not true that any body expected Robert Anderson to be present.
He sent no message of any kind to Stanton. It was very well
known that he was sickactually in bed, and had been so for
more than a week before the death of Ellen. People almost
thought they might go off together. There was a sort of
sympathy
between them, though I don't think, from the hour of her
unlucky
marriage, that the eyes of the two ever met, till they met
in the world of spiritsunless it were, indeed, in their dreams.
But they seemed to pine away, both of them, about the same time,
and though he stood it longest, he did not outlast her much.
When she died, as I tell you, he was very feeble and in bed.
Nobody ever expected him to leave it alive, and least of all that
he should leave it then, to stand among the people at her grave.
The circumstances of her marriage with Stanton, were too
notorious
,
and too much calculated to embitter his feelings and his
peace, to make it likely that he would be present at such a scene.
She had cast him off, slightingly, to give a preference to the more
showy stranger, and she had spoken to him in a manner not soon
to be forgiven by a man of sensibility. But he did forgivethat
I knowand his love for Ellen was unimpaired to the last. She
did not doubt this, when she married Stanton, though she expressed
herself so. That was only to find some excuses to him, if not to
her own conscience, for her conduct. I'm sure she bitterly
repented
of all before very long. She was just the girl to do wrong
in a hurry, and be sorry for it the next minute.
But the funeral? said Walter.
Ah! truethe funeral. Well, as I was telling you, when
the coffin was brought round to the burial placeyou know the
spot, among a thick grove of stunted oaks, and the undergrowth
is always kept down by old Ramsaywho should come out from
behind one of the largest old trees, but Robert Anderson. He
was pale as a ghost, and his limbs trembled and tottered as he
walked, but he came forward as resolutely as if he felt no pain
or weakness. Stanton started when he saw him. He never
expected
his presence, I assure you. Every eye saw his agitation
as Robert came forward; and I tell you, there was not a person
present who did not see, as well as myself, that the husband of
the poor girl looked much paler at that moment than her sick
lover. Robert did not seem to see Stanton, or to mind him as he
came forward; indeed, he did not seem to see any body. His
eyes were fixed only on the coffin, which was carried by me,
Ralph Mason, Dick Rawlins, and I think Hiram Barker. He
did not shed a tear, which we all wondered at, for all of us
expected
to see him crying like any child, because we knew how
soft-hearted he always was, and how fond he had been of Ellen.
At first, we thought his not crying was because of his anger at
being so ill-treated, which was natural enough; but what he said
afterwards soon did away with that notion. He came close to my
side, and put his hand on the lid of the coffin near the name, and
though he said not a single word to us, we seemed to understand
that he meant we should stop till he read it. We did stop, and
he then read the plate aloud, something in this manner`Ellen'
and then he stopped a little as he came to the word `Stanton'
and you could see a deep red flush grow out upon his cheek and
forehead, and then he grew pale as deathand held upon the
coffin as if to keep himself from fallingthen he seemed to
muster
up strength, and he read on, in very deliberate and full
accents
,
as if he had thrown all his resolution into the effort`
Ellen
Stanton!' These words he repeated twice, and then he passed
on to the rest`
Wife of George Stanton, born April
7, 1817.
Died
,'Here he stopped again, poor fellow! as if to catch his
breath. He only gasped when he tried to go on with the reading.
He could only say`Died. Died!' and there he stopped like a
man choking. By this time, Stanton came up close to him and
looked at us, as if to say `Why don't you go forwardwhy do
you suffer him to stop you'but he said nothing. Robert did not
seem to mind or to notice him, but, with another effort, recovering
his strength and voice, he read on to the end`
Died March
27,
1836AGED EIGHTEEN YEARS, ELEVEN MONTHS AND NINETEEN
DAYS.' Old John Ramsay by this time came up, and stood
between
him and Stanton. He looked up from the coffin, first at
one and then at the otherand said quietlywithout any
appearance
of anger or passion:
This, Mr. Ramsay, is your daughter, Ellenshe was to have
been my wifeshe was engaged to me by her own promise, and
you gave your consent to our marriage. Is not this true, Mr.
Ramsay?
True, said the old man very mildly, but with a deep sigh
that seemed to come from the bottom of his soul;but you know,
Robert,
Then it was that Robert seemed to lose himself for a moment.
His eye brightened with indignation and his speech came quick.
I know that she is
here!
he exclaimedhere, in her coffin,
dead to you, your daughterdead to me, my wifeyour Ellen!
my Ellen!My Ellenmy poor Ellen! And then he sobbed
bitterly upon the coffin. I believe that most of the persons present
and all had crowded round ussobbed too. But I could not
see them, for my own heart was overflowing. The interruption
did not continue long. Robert was the first to recover himself.
He had always a right idea of what was proper; and no doubt,
just then, he felt, that, according to the world's way of thinking,
he was doing wrong in stopping the dead in its last progress to the
place of rest. He raised up his head from the coffin plate, and
said to us, speaking very slowly, for his breath seemed only to
come in sobs, and then after great efforts
Do not think, my friends, when I speak of the pledges Ellen
Ramsay made to me, that I am come here to utter any reproaches
of the dead, or to breathe a single syllable of complaint against the
blessed creature, who was always a sweet angel, now looking up
in heaven. God forbid that I should speak, or that you should
hear, any harm of a woman that I have always looked upon as
the purest and truest-hearted creature under the sun. No!
in telling you of this pledge, I come here only to acquit her of
any wrong, or evil thought, or action, when she ceased to think it
binding upon her. It is to say to you at her grave, for you all
knew that we were to be married, that, as I never gave her any
reason for believing me to be false, or more unworthy of her heart
than when she promised it to me, so, also, I believe that nothing
but some such persuasion could have made her deprive me of it.
While I acquit her, therefore, of having done me any intentional
injustice, I tell you, in the presence of her heavenly spirit, which
knows the truth of what I declare, that she has been abused by
some false slanderer, to do me wrong, and herself wrong, and
to
By this time Stanton put in, and stopped whatever more
Robert
had to say. He had been getting more and more angry as
Robert went on, and when he came to that solemn part about the
slanderer, and lifted his hands to heaven and looked upward with
the tears just beginning to come into his eyes, as if he did really
see the spirit of Ellen at the moment above him, then Stanton got
quite furious. Those words clinched him in the sore part of his
soul; and he made round the coffin towards where Robert stood,
and doubled his fists, and spoke hoarsely, as if he was about to
choke.
And who do you mean slandered you to her? he cried to
Robert, who! who!
His face was as black as night, and his features, usually so
soft and pleasing to the eyes of the young women, now looked
rather like those of a devil than of a mortal man. We thought he
would have torn the poor young man to pieces, but Robert did not
seem at all daunted. I suppose if we had not been there, and
had not interfered so quickly, there would have been violence;
and violence upon a frail, dying creature like Robert, would have
been the most shocking cruelty. But Maxcy jumped in between
them, and John Ramsay, Ellen's youngest brother, stepped
forward
also, and we all cried shame, and this drove Stanton back,
but he still looked furious and threatening, and seemed to wish
for nothing more than to take Robert by the throat. Nobody
seemed to mind him less than the poor fellow who had most
reason
to fear. Robert had a bold and fearless spirit, and there was a
time, before he grew sickly and religious, when he would have
grappled with him for death and life before the altar itself. But
he was now subdued. He did not seem to mind his enemy, or
indeed, any thing, but the coffin on which he hung. He did not,
I really think, hear Stanton speaking at all, though, for a few
moments, the fellow bullied pretty loud, and not a syllable that he
said escaped any body else. His soul seemed to be in the coffin.
His eyes seemed to try to pierce the heavy lid of pine, and the
dark crape, and the shroud; and one would think, from the eager
and satisfied gaze, that he had succeeded in doing so. No doubt
his mind deluded him, and he thought sofor you could hear him
whisperingEllen! dear Ellen! Then he gave way to us,
and reading the plate, he saidBut eighteenbut eighteen.
Butit is all well now! all well! He suffered us then to go
forward, and followed close, and made no objection, and said no
more words. While we let the coffin down, he stood so nigh, that
the earth shelved with him, and he would have gone in with it,
for he made no resistance, if we had not caught him in our arms
and dragged him from the brink. But we could not soon get him
from the spot. When all was done, he did not seem to mind that
the rest were going, but stood looking down as earnestly as if he
could still read the writing through six feet of earth. Stanton,
too, did not seem willing to go, but we very well knew it was for
no love he had for the poor girl that he wished to remain; and
Maxcy whispered to me that he would bring him off before he
left the ground, for fear he might do some harm to Robert, who
was no fighter, and was too feeble to stand one so strong. This
he did, and after he was gone I tried to get Robert away also. It
was some time before I did so, and then it seemed he went with
me only to get rid of my presence, for he was back at the grave
as soon as night set in, and there he might be found every
evening
at the same hour, just about sunset, for several months
afterwards
for
he lingered strangelyuntil they brought him to sleep
besied her. Though sick, and pining away fast, the poor fellow
never let an evening go by, whatever weather it might be,
without
paying the grave a visit; and, one day, perhaps two weeks
after the funeral, old Mrs. Anderson called me into her cottage as
I was riding by, and said she would show me something. She
took me up into her son's room, a little chamber in the loft, and
what should it be but a head-board, that the dying lad had sawed
out with his own hands, from a thick plank, and had smoothed,
and planed, and painted, all in secret, so that he could print on it
an inscription for the poor girl's grave; and you would be
surprised
to see how neatly he had worked it all. The poor old
woman
cried bitterly all the time, but you could still see how proud
she was of her son. She showed me his bookshe had more than
a hundredand she sighed from the bottom of her heart when she
told me it was the books that has made him sickly.
But he will read, she said, say all I can; though he knows
it's a-doing him no good. `Ah, mother,' he says, when I tell
him about it, `though it may shorten my life to read, it will
shorten my happiness not to read, and I have too little happiness
now left me to be willing to lose any of it.' And when he speaks
so, said the old woman, I can't blame him, for I know it's all
true. But I blame myself, Mr. Atkins, for you see it was all of
my doing that he got so many books, and is so fond of them. I
loved to see him learning, and made him read to me so constantly
of an evening, and it did my heart so much good to think that
one day my Robert might be a great lawyer, or a parson, for I
could see how much smarter he was than all the other boys of
the villageand so I never looked at his pale cheeks, and had no
guess how poorly he was getting, till, all of a sudden, he was
laid up, on my hands, and pining away every hour, as you now
see him. Things looked better for a while when he got fond of
Ellen Ramsay, and she of him. But that Stanton, ever since he
came among us, Robert has gone backward, and I shan't wonder
if it's not very long before he wants his own tombstone!
Poor old woman! I saw in a corner, half hidden behind an
old trunk in the youth's chamber, what it was evident she had
not seen, a head board, the very fellow to that which he had been
making for Ellen!but I said nothing to her at the time. When
they were found after his deathfor he said nothing of them
while he livedthey were both neatly finished, with a simple but
proper inscription. On his own was but one line above his name.
It was this
Mine
was
wo, but mine
is
hope.
Robert Anderson
.
You tell me of a remarkable young man, said Walter
and he was but twenty when he died?
No more!
We will go and look upon his grave.
You will see the head board there, but that for Ellen was
never put upStanton would not allow it.
Ah! but we shall mend that. I will pluck that scoundrel's
comb. Is the head-board preserved?
It is: his mother keeps it in his chamber, standing up beside
his little book-case; but see, yonder is Stanton now. He is on
his way to Ramsay's house. They do not live together. He
boards at a little farm-yard about a mile from the village. They
say that there has been a quarrel between him and his
brother-in-law
,
young John Ramsay, something about his sister's
property
.
There are eleven negroes which were owned by young
John and herself, in their own right, from the grand-mother's gift,
which they have suffered the old man to work until now.
Stanton
wants a division, and young John tried to persuade him not
to touch them till his death, which must happen before long, he
sharing as before from the crop. But Stanton persists, and the
young fellow did not stop to tell him that he thought him a cruelly
base fellow. This is the report. It is very certain that they are
separate now, and there is a difference between them.
Very likely on the score of the negroes. But we will save
them to the old man, and drive him from a spot which he had
made wretched.
Can you do this? Are your proofs sufficient?
Ample.
You are yourself a lawyer?
Yes! But I shall have the assistance, if necessary, of Col.
Dawson, whom probably you know.
A first rate gentleman, and one of our best lawyers.
I bring letters to himhave already seen him on the subject,
and he concurs with me as to the conclusiveness of my proofs.
Would I had been with you a year ago. Could I have traced
him, this poor girl had not been his victim. I should at least
have driven the snake from this one cabin.
Yes, if you had come a year ago, poor Ellen would have
been saved. But nothing could have saved the poor young man.
The rot was in the heart of the tree.
Yet! said the other, putting his hand upon the arm of Atkins
though the tree perished, it might have been kept green to
the last. Some hurts might have been spared it. The man
who died in hope, might not have found it necessary to declare, at
the last moment, that he had utterly lived in wo. Yesa little
year ago, we might have done much for both parties.
You will do great good by your coming now. The poor old
man loves his negroes as he does his children. They say he
looks upon the giving up the eleven to be sold, like a breaking up
of the establishment. His son says it will hurry him to the grave.
This was what he said to Stanton, which led to the quarrel.
Stanton sneered at the young man, and he, being pretty
passionate
,
blazed out at him in a way that pretty soon silenced the
fellow
.
This class of reptiles are all, more or less, cowards. We must
not burn daylight, as, if they consent to a division, the scoundrel
may make off with his share. Let us go forward, continued
the speaker, with a show of feeling for which Atkins could not
well accountI long to tread upon the viperto bruise his
head, and above all to tear the fangs from his jaws. You
will, if Stanton be there, draw the old man aside and
introduce
me to him, with some quiet hint of what I may be able
to do.
You say you have the papers with you?
Ay, ay,here,striking his bosomI have here that
which shall confound him! Fear not! I do not deceive you. At
least I cannot deceive myself. I too have wrongs that need
avengingI and mine! I and mine! Remember, I am Mr.
Jones from TennesseeI must surprise and confound the fellow,
and would see how the land lies before I declare myself.
CHAPTER II.
Young
John Ramsay was in the front piazza as they entered
the little farm-yard. He was alone, and pacing the floor in
evident
agitation. His brow was dark and discontented, and he met
the salutations of his visitors with the manner of a person who
is ill pleased with any witnesses of his disquiet. But he was
civil, and when Atkins asked after his father, he led the way into
the house, and there they discovered the old man and George
Stanton in close and earnest conversation. Several papers were
before them, and Stanton held the pen in his hand. The tears
stood in old Ramsay's eyes. His thin white hairs, which fell,
glossy and long, upon his shoulders, gave a benign and
patriarchal
expression to a face that was otherwise marked with the
characters of benevolence and sensibility. He rose at the
appearance
of the visitors. Stanton did not, but looked up with
the air of one vexed at interruption in the most interesting
moment
.
Young Ramsay, to whom the stranger had been introduced
by Atkins, introduced him in turn to his father, but to his father
only. He gave no look to the spot where Stanton was seated.
Atkins took the old man into another room, leaving the three
remaining
in the apartment. Stanton appeared to busy himself
over his papers. Young Ramsay requested the stranger to be
seated, and drew a chair for himself beside him. There was no
conversation. The youth looked down upon the floor, in abstract
contemplation, while the stranger, unobserved by either, employed
himself in a most intense watch of the guilty man. The latter
looked up and met this survey seemingly with indifference. He
too was thinking of matters which led him somewhat from the
present company. He resumed his study of the papers before
him, and scarcely noticed the return of old Ramsay to the room.
His appearance was the signal to the son to go out, and resume
his solitary promenade in the piazza. The old man promptly
approached the stranger, whose hand he took with a cordial
pressure
that proved how well Atkins had conveyed his suggestion.
There was a bright hopefulness in his old eyes, which, had it
been seen by Stanton, might have surprised him, particularly as,
just before, they had been overflowing with tears and clouded
with despondency. He was, however, still too busy in his
calculations
,
and possibly, in his own hopes, to note any peculiar
change in the aspect or manner of his father-in-law. But when
some minutes had passed, consumed by the old man and the
stranger, in the most common-place conversationwhen he heard
the former institute long inquiries into the condition of crops in
Tennesseethe value of grain, the modes of cultivation, the
price of lands and negroes;the impatient son-in-law began to
show his restiveness. He took up and threw down his papers,
turned from them to the company, from the company to the
papers
again, renewed his calculations, again dismissed them, and
still without prompting the visitor to bring to a close a visit
seemingly
totally deficient in object and interest, but which, to his
great annoyance, all parties besides himself seemed desirous to
prolong. At length, as with a desperate determination, he turned
to the old man and said
SirMr. Ramsay, you are aware of my desire to bring this
business to a close at once.
The words reached the ears of young Ramsay, who now
appeared
at the door.
Father, pray let it be as this person desires. Give him all
which the law will allowgive him more, if need be, and let
him depart. Make any arrangement about the negroes that you
please, without considering meonly let him leave us in our
homes at peace!
I am sorry to disturb the peace of any home, said Stanton,
but am yet to know that to claim my rights is doing so. I ask
nothing but what is fair and proper. My wife, if I understand
it, had an equal right with Mr. John Ramsay, the younger, to
certain negroes, eleven in number, namely, Zekiel, Abram, Ben,
Bess, Maria, Susannah, Bob, Harry, Milly, Bainbridge and Nell,
with their increase. This increase makes the number seventeen.
But you have never denied the facts, and I repeat to you the
proposition which I have already made to you, to divide the
property
into two equal parts, thus:
Here he read from the strips of paper before him, enumerating
the negroes in two lotsthis done, he proceeded:
I am willing that your son should have the first choice of
these lots. I will take the other. I am prepared to listen to
any other arrangement for a division, rather than be subject
to any delay by a reference to the law. I have no wish to
compel the sale of the property, as that might distress you.
Distress! exclaimed the young manspare your
sympathy
if you please. I consent to your first arrangement. Nay,
sir, you shall choose, first, of the lots as divided by yourself. My
simple wish now, sir, is to leave you wholly without complaint.
But, my sonbegan the old man.
Pray, my father, let it be as I have said. We shall never
have an end of it otherwise. The division is a tolerably equal
one, and if there be any loss it is mine.
The old man folded his hands upon his lap and looked to the
stranger. He, meanwhile, maintained a keen and eager watch
upon the features of Stanton. It could be seen that his lip
quivered
and there was in his eye an expression of exultation and
scorn which, perhaps, none perceived but young Atkins.
Stanton
,
meanwhile, was again busy with his papers.
It is admitted also, the latter continued, that I have a right
to one half of a tract of uncleared land, lying on the Tombeckbe,
containing six hundred and thirty acres, more or less; to one
half of a small dwelling house in Linden, and to certain
household
stuff, crockery, plate and kitchen ware. Upon these I am
prepared to place a low estimate, so that the family may still
retain
them, and the value may be given me in negro property. I
value the land, which I am told is quite as good as any in the
country
,
at $5 an acrethe house and lot at $500and the plate,
crockery, kitchen ware, etc., at $250 more. I make the total of
my share, at these estimates, to be $2075we will say $2000
and I am willing to take in payment of this amount, the four
fellows
,
Zekiel, Bob, Henry and Bennamed in one lot, or the two
fellows, Abram and Bainbridge, and the two women, Milly and
Maria, with their three children, named in the other parcel.
12
You are extremely accommodating, said young Ramsay
bitterly
,
but I prefer that we should sell the land on the Tombeckbe,
the lot in Linden, and the crockery, plate and kitchen stuffunless
you prefer that these last should be divided. This arrangement will
occasion you some delay in getting your money, but it will save
me much less loss than I should suffer by your estimates. Permit
me to say that of the negroes in the lot which you may leave me,
you shall not have a hair, and I would to God it were in my
power to keep the rest, by any sacrifice, from your possession.
No doubt you do, sirbut your wishes are not the law. I
demand nothing from you but what is justice, and justice I will
have. My rights are clear and ample. You do not, I trust,
propose
to go to law to keep me out of my wife's property.
To law! exclaimed the young man with indignation. He
then strode fiercely across the floor and confronted Stanton, who
had now risen. The strife in his soul was showing itself in
storm upon his countenance, when the stranger from Tennessee
rose, and placed himself between them.
Stay, my friendlet me speak a moment. I have a question
to ask of Mr. Stanton.
You, sirsaid Stantonby what right do you interfere?
By the right which every honest man possesses to see that
there is no wrong done to his neighbour, if he can prevent it.
You are making a demand upon Mr. Ramsay, for certain
property
which you claim in right of your wife. Now, sir, let me
ask which of your wives it is, on whose account you claim.
The person thus addressed recoiled as if he had been struck
by an adder. A deep flush passed over his face, succeeded by an
ashen paleness. He tried to speak, stammered, and sunk
paralyzed
back into his chair.
What, sir, can you say nothing? Your rights by your wives
ought to be numerous. You should have some in every State in
the Union.
You are a liar and a slanderer, exclaimed the criminal,
rising from his seat, and, with a desperate effort, confronting his
accuserShaking his fist at him, he criedYou shall prove
what you say! You shall prove what you say!
The other coldly replied, while a smile of scorn passed over
his lipsI am here for that very purpose.
You!and who are you? demanded the accused, once
again stammering and showing trepidation.
A man! one who has his hand upon your throat, and will stifle
you in the very first struggle that you propose to make. Sit down,
sirsit down allthis business is opened before us, and we will
go to it as to a matter of business. You, sirto Stanton, will
please school your moods and temper, lest it be worse for you.
It is only by behaving with proper modesty under a proper sense
of your position and danger, that you can hope to escape from the
sharpest clutches of the law.
You shall not bully meI am not the man to submit
You are; said the other, sternly interrupting himI tell
you, William Ragin,
alias
Richard Weston,
alias
Thomas
Stukely
,
alias
Edward Stantonyou are the man to submit to all that
I shall say to you, to all that I shall exact from you, in virtue of
what I know of you, and in virtue of what you are.
The sweat poured in thick streams from the brow of the
criminal
.
The other proceeded.
I am not a bully. It is not by swagger that I hope to put you
down, or to punish you. On the contrary, I come here prepared
to prove all that I assert, satisfactorily before a court of justice.
It is for you to determine whether, by your insolence and
madness
,
you will incur the danger of a trial, or whether you will
submit quietly to what we ask, and leave the country. I take
for granted that you are no fool, though, in a moral point of view,
your career would show you to be an enormous one, since vice
like yours is almost conclusive against all human policy, and
might reasonably be set down by a liberal judgment, as in some
degree a wretched insanity. If I prove to you that I can prove to
others what I now assert, will you be ready, without more ado, to
yield your claims here, and every where, and fly the country?
You can prove nothing: you know nothing. I defy you.
Beware! I am no trifler, and, by the God of heaven, I tell you,
that, were I to trust my own feelings, you should swing upon the
gallows, or be shut in from life, by a worse death, in the
penitentiary
,
all your days. I can bring you to either, if I will it, but
there are considerations, due to the feelings of others, which
prompt me to the gentler course I have indicated. It is enough
for me that you have been connected by the most solemn ties with
Maria Lacy. Her wishes and her memory are sacred in my
sight, and these move me to spare the villain whom my own
personal
wrongs would prompt me to drag to the gallows. You see
how the matter stands! Speak!
You thenyou are
Henry Lamar, of Georgia, the cousin, and once the betrothed
of Maria Lacy.
There was a slight tremour in the speaker's voice, as he made
this answer;but his soul was very firm. He continued: I
complain not of your wrong to me. It is enough that I am
prepared
to avenge it, and I frankly tell you, I am half indifferent
whether you accede to my proposition or not. Your audacity here
has aroused a feeling in me, which leaves it scarcely within my
power to offer you the chances of escape. I renew the offer, while
I am yet firm to do it. Leave the countryleave all the bounds,
all the territories of the United Statesand keep aloof from them;
for, as surely as I have power to pursue, and hear of your
presence
in any of them, so surely shall I hunt you out with shot and
halter, as I would the reptile that lurks beside the pathway, or
the savage beast that harbours in the thicket.
The speaker paused, resumed his seat, and, by a strong effort
of will, maintained a calm silence, looking sternly upon the
criminal
.
Violent passions were contending in the breast of the latter.
His fears were evidently aroused, but his cupidity was active. It
was clear that he apprehended the dangerit was equally clear
that he was loth to forego his grasp upon the property of his last
victim. He was bewildered, and, more in his confusion than
because
of any thought or couragehe once more desperately
denied
the charges made against him.
You are a bold man, said he to the stranger, affecting
coolness
considering
you deal in slander. You may impose upon
these, but it is only because they would believe any thing against
me now. But you have no proofs. I defy you to produce any
thing to substantiate one of your charges.
Fool! said the other coolly, I have but to call in the slaves
to have you stripped to the buff, and to discover and display to
the world the marks upon your body, to which your wife swore
in open court in New York State, on the trial of Reuben Moore,
confounded in identity with yourself as William Ragin. Here is
the report of the trial. Moore was only saved, so close was the
general resemblance between you, as the scar of the scythe was
not apparent upon his legto which all parties swore as
certainly
on yours. Are you willing that we should now examine your
left leg and foot?
My foot is as free from scar as yours; but I will not suffer
myself to be examined.
Did it need, we should not ask you. But it does not need.
We have the affidavit of Samuel Fisher, to show that he detected
the scar of the scythe upon your leg, while bathing with you at
Crookstone's mill pond, that he asked you how you got such a
dreadful cut, and that you were confused, but said that it was a
scythe cut. This he alleged of you under your present name of
Stanton. Here, sir, is a copy of the affidavit. Here also is the
testimony of James Greene, of Liberty county, Geo., who knew
you there as the husband of Maria Lacy. He slept with you one
night at Berry's house on the way to the county court house.
You played
poker
with a party of five consisting of the said Greene,
of Jennings, Folker and Stillmantheir signatures are all here.
You got drunk, quarrelled with Folker and Stillman, whom you
accused of cheating you, were beaten by them severely, and so
bruised that it was necessary you should be put to bed, and
bathed
with spirits. When stripped for this purpose, while you lay
unconscious, the scythe cut on your leg, and a large scar from a
burn upon your right arm, to both of which your wife, Elizabeth
Ragin, swore in New York, with great particularityas appears
in that reported casewere discovered, and attracted the
attention
of all present.
Man or devil! exclaimed the criminal in desparation,By
what means have you contrived to gather these damnable proofs!
You admit them then?
I admit nothing. I defy them, and you, and the devil. Let
me go. I will hear nothing moresee nothing farther. As for
you, John Ramsay, let me ask, am I to have any of my wife's
property? Let me have it, and I leave the cursed country
forever
.
John Ramsay, the younger, was about to reply, when the
stranger silenced him.
Stay! You leave not this spot, unless with my consent, or
in the hands of the sheriff. He is here in readiness. Are you
willing that I should call him in? I am serious! There must
be no trifling. Here are proofs of your identity with William
Ragin, who married Elizabeth Simpson, of Minden, Connecticut;
with Richard Weston, who married Sarah Gooch, of Raleigh,
N. C.;with Thomas Stukely, who married with Maria Lacy,
of Liberty county, Geo.;with Edward Stanton, now before us,
who married with Ellen Ramsay, of Montgomery county,
Alabama
.
Of these wretched wives whom you have wronged and
dishonoured, two of them are still living. I do not stipulate for
your return to either. They are sufficiently fortunate to be rid
of you forever. But this I insist upon, that you leave the
country
.
As for taking the property of this wife or that, you must
consider yourself particularly fortunate that you escape the
halter
.
You can take nothing. Your fate lies in these papers.
In an instant the desperate hands of the criminal had clutched
the documents where the other laid them down. He clutched
them, and sprang towards the door, but a single blow from the
powerful fist of young John Ramsay brought him to the floor. The
stranger quietly repossessed himself of the papers.
You are insane, William Ragin, he remarked coolly
these are all copies of the originals, and even were they
originals
,
their loss would be of little value while all the witnesses are
living. They are brought for your informationto show you on
what a perilous point you standand have been used only to base
the warrant upon which has been already issued for your arrest.
That warrant is even now in this village in the hands of the
sheriff
of the county. I have but to say that you are the man whom
he must arrest under it, and he does his duty. You are at my
mercy. I see that you feel that. Rise and sign this paper and
take your departure. If, after forty-eight hours, you are found
east of the Tombeckbe, you forfeit all the chances which it affords
you of escape. Rise, sir, and sign. I have no more words for you.
The criminal did as he was commandedpassively, as one in
a stupor. The stranger then waved him to the door, and he took
his departure without any more being spoken on either side.
When he was gone
These papers, said Lamar, to old John Ramsay, are yours.
I leave them for your protection from this scoundrel. The proofs
are all conclusive, and, with his re-appearance, you have but to
seek the sheriff and renew the warrant.
The old man clasped the hands of the stranger and bedewed
them with tears.
You will stay with us while you are here. We owe you too
much to suffer it otherwise. We have no other way of thanking
you.
I have another day's business here, said Lamar, and will
cheerfully partake your hospitality for that time. For the
present
I must leave you. I have an engagement with Mr. Atkins.
The engagement with Atkins, led the stranger to the grave of
poor Ellen Ramsay and to that of Robert Anderson. They next
visited the cottage of the widow Anderson, and obtained her
consent
to the use of the head board which the devoted youth had
framed and inscribed, while himself dying, for the grave of his
beloved. The next day was employed, with the consent of old
Ramsay, in putting it upan occasion which brought the
villagers
together as numerously as the burial of the poor girl had
done. The events of the day had taken windthe complete
exposure
of the wretch who had brought ruin and misery into the
little settlement, was known to all, and deep were the
imprecations
of all upon his crime, and warm the congratulations at a
development, which saved the venerable father from being spoiled
and left in poverty in his declining years. But there is yet a
finish to our storyanother event, perhaps necessary to its finish,
which, as it was the offspring of another day, we must reserve
for another chapter.
CHAPTER III.
That
night, while the little family at Ramsay's were sitting
over their evening meal, Abram, one of the plantation negroes,
appeared at the door of the apartment, and abruptly addressed
young Ramsay after the following fashion:
Look ya, Mass Jack, I want for see you out ya a minute.
Abram was the
driver
of the plantationa sort of
superintendant
of details. He was a faithful negro, such as is to be
found on every long established plantation at the Southshrewd,
cool, sensibleperhaps forty years of agehonest, attentive to
his business, and, from habit, assuming the interest which he
managed to be entirely his own. His position gave him
consequence
,
which he felt and asserted, but never abused. A trick
of speaking very much what was uppermost in his mind, was the
fruit of a just consciousness of duties well performed, leaving him
in no fear of any proper authority. Young Ramsay rose instantly
and obeyed the summons. With some little mystery in his
manner
,
Abram conducted the youth from the piazza into the yard,
and thence into the shadow of one of the gigantic shade trees by
which the house was literally embowered. Here, looking around
him with the air of one anxious neither to be seen nor overheard,
he thrust a paper into the hands of John Ramsay with this
inquiry
Dis ya money, Mass Jack,good money?
I will tell you when I look at it by the candle. Why?
where did you get it?
You look at 'em firstI tell you all 'bout 'em arterward.
John did as was required, returned and reported the bank note
for it was such, and for twenty dollarsto be utterly worthless
that, in short, of a broken bank.
I bin tink so, said the negro.
Where did you get it, Abram?
Who you speck gib me, Mass Jack?
I don't know!
Who but Mass Ned Stanton.
Ha!whywhen did he give you this money?
To-daywhen you bin all busy wid de tomb stone of young
Missis. He come by de old creek field, call me out, say I must
come to em in de wood, and den he say to me dat he sorry for
see me ya working for Mossa. Him will help me git off workI
shall be free man, if I will only go wid him, and bring off many
of the brack people as I kin. He promise me heap of tings, git
me 'nuff tobacco for las' a mont', gib me knifesee dis yaand
dis money which you say no good money. I bin speck 'em for
bad when he tell me its twenty dollars. Twenty dollars is heap
money, I say to myself. Wha' for he gib me twenty dollars now.
Wha' for he consider my freedom, jes' now, and he nebber bin
tink 'pon 'em before. Someting's wrong, I say to myself, and
Mossa for knowbut I neber let on to 'em I 'spec 'em. I say
`da's all right. I will come, Mass Ned. I will see you in de
bush to-night.' Den he shake my handsay he always bin lub
mewill take me to country whay brack man is gentleman and
hab white wife, and is lawyer, and schoolmosser, and preacher,
and hab white man for dribe he carriage. I yerry em berry
well, but I never le' him see I laugh. But I hab my tongue ya
(thrust to one side of his jaws) and the white ob my eye grow
large as I look 'pon 'em. I know 'em of ole. I bin speck 'em
when he first come ya courting poor Miss Nelly. I no like 'em
denI no like 'em now. But I mak' blieb I lub 'em too much.
Das for you now to fix 'em. He's for see me to-night by ole
Robin tree in de swamp. Wha' mus dowha' mus sayhow
you gwine fix 'em?
You have done right, 'Bram. Before I say any thing, I will
consult my father, and a stranger who is with us.
I yerry bout 'em. He's a man, I ya. Flora bin tell me
how he fix Ned Stanton.
Well, I'll consult him and my father. Do you remain here
in the meantime. Do not let yourself be seen. Stanton
is
a
villain
,
but we have found him out. Stanton is not his real name,
but Ragin.
Ragin, eh? Well, we must Ragin 'em. I'll wait 'pon you
ya. But mak' hastede time is pretty close, and he'll 'spec'
somet'ing ef I aint by de tree when he come.
John Ramsay re-entered the house, and, in few words,
repeated
the substance of the negro's story.
The scoundrel's bent on being hung, was the exclamation
of Lamar, with something like a look of exultation. Let
'Bram encourage him, and give him a meeting for to-morrow
night, promising to bring all the negroes that he can. We shall
be at the meeting. 'Bram shall carry us, though we go as his
comrades, not as his superiors.
The scheme of Lamar was soon laid. Young Ramsay and
himself were to smut their faces, and, in negro habiliments, were
to impose upon the villain. Lamar promised that the sheriff
should take his hand at the game.
Our mercy is thrown away upon such a thrice-dyed
scoundrel
.
His destiny forces the task of vengeance upon us. Go to
Abram, and give him his cue.
CHAPTER IV.
There
is a fatality about the wicked that, sooner or later,
whatever
may be their precautions and their adroitnesses, invariably
brings about their confusion and defeat. The criminal in the
present instance, was one who had enjoyed a long swing of good
fortuneusing these words only to mean that he had been able
to gratify his wishes, of whatever sort, without yet having been
made to pay the usual penalties. This very success is most
commonly the source of final disaster. The fortunate man is apt
to presume upon his good fortuneto hold himself, like Sylla, a
sort of favourite with the capricious goddess, until he loses
himself
irrevocably in the blind presumption which his confidence
provokes. Edward Stanton, for so we shall continue to call
him, had been too often in straits like the present, and had too
often emerged from them with profit, to fancy that he had much
at hazard in the new game that he had determined to pursue.
He had been temporarily daunted by the complete exposure of his
career which had been made by Lamar, and felt, from all he
saw and all he heard, that the chances were entirely up with
him where he then stood. But he had not long gone from sight of
his enemy, before his mind began once more to recover, and to
unravel
new schemes and contrivances for the satisfaction of his
selfish
passions. He was a person soon to cast aside his
apprehensions
,
and to rise with new energies after defeat. It is a very
great misfortune that this admirable quality of character should
be equally shared, upon occasion, by the rogue and the ruffian,
with the honest man and the noble citizen. Stanton was resolved
to make the most of the forty-eight hours which were allowed
him. He took for granted that, having attained his object, Lamar
would be satisfied;he may have discovered, indeed, that the
latter would return in another day to Georgia. We have seen,
from the revelations of Abram, what direction his scheming mind
was disposed to pursue. His plans were laid in a few minutes,
and, while the family of Ramsay, its guest, and the people of the
village generally, were raising the simple head board over the
grave of his injured wife, the miserable wretch, totally
insensible
to all honourable or human feeling, was urging the
ignorant
negro to a desertion of the ancient homestead, in the vain
hope of attaining that freedom with which, when acquired, he
knew not well what to do. Of course, this was all a pretext of
the swindler, by which to get the property within his grasp. He
had but to cross the Tombeckbe with his unsuspecting
companions
,
and they would have been sold, by public outcry, at the
first popular gathering. His plans laid, his artifices all complete,
he waited with anxiety the meeting with the negro. He had
already
taken his leave of the family with which he lodged, had
mounted his horse, and turned his head towards the west, using
particular care that his departure should be seen by several. He
little fancied that his return to the neighbourhood by another
route, and after night had set in, had also been perceived. But
the vigilance of Lamar had arranged for this. Young Atkins
had volunteered to observe the movements of Stanton, and, born
a hunter, and familiar with all the woods for twenty miles round,
he was able to report on the return of the fugitive, within half
an hour of the moment when it took place. Concealing his
horse in a neighbourng
bay,
ready for use in the first emergency,
Stanton proceeded, at the appointed time, to the place of
rendezvous
.
Meanwhile, the preparations of Lamar were also in progress.
The sheriff had been brought, after night-fall, to the house of old
Ramsay. The coarse garments of the negro had been provided
for himself and his deputyfor Lamar and the younger Ramsay.
Young Atkins also insisted on going as a volunteer, and old
Ramsay
could with difficulty be persuaded to forbear accompanying
the party. The blood of the veteran blazed up as fiercely as it
had done twenty years before, when he heard the call for
volunteers
,
from the lips of Andrew Jackson, to avenge the butcheries
of Indian warfare. The good sense of Lamar succeeded in
persuading him to leave the affair to younger men. Abram was
of the party, and, with his assistance, a greasy preparation was
procured, in which soot and oil were the chief ingredients, by
which our free citizens were made to assume, in a very few
moments
,
the dark and glossy outside of the African. Prime stout
fellows were theyable field handssuch as would delight the
unsuspecting eye of the kidnapper as soon as he beheld them.
They were all armed with pistolsall but Abram, who carried
however the knifea formidable
couteau de chasse,
which had
been one of the bribes of Stanton, presented to him with the
bank note and tobacco, at their first interview. Abram
undertook
the conduct of the party. They were led forth secretly, in
profoundest silence, by a circuitous path, to the swamp thicket, in
the neighbourhood of which the meeting was to take place. It
is needless to describe the route. Suffice it that they were there
in season, snugly quartered, and waiting with due impatience for
the signal. It was heard at last;a shrill whistle, thrice
repeated
,
followed by the barking of a hound. To this Abram
answered
,
going forth as he did so, and leaving the party in the
close covert to which he had conducted them. The night was a
bright star-light. The gleams, however, came but imperfectly
through the thick foliage; and our conspirators could distinguish
each other only by the sound of their voices. Their faces shone
as glossily as the leaves, when suddenly touched by the far light
of the stars. Gradually, they heard approaching footsteps. It
was then that Lamar said, seizing the hand of young Ramsay,
No haste, now,no rashness,we must let the fellow hobble
himself fairly.
Deep silence followed, broken only by the voice of the negro
and his companion.
You have brought them? said Stanton.
Da's ya! replied the black.
How many?
Some tree or four, 'side myself.
Could you bring no more? asked the eager kidnapper.
Hab no chanceyou no gib me time 'nuff. Ef you leff 'em
tell Saturday night now, and Sunday, I get 'em all.
No!no! that's impossible. I dare not. These must do.
Where are they?
In de bush! jes' ya! But look ya, Mass Ned, you sure you
gwine do wha' you promise?
On my honour, 'Bram.
You will take you Bible oat', Mass Ned?
I swear it.
Dis ya nigger I bring you is no common nigger, I tell you.
Mossa hab heaby loss for lose 'em. Wha' you 'spose he gwine
say,wha' he tink, when he get up to-morrow mornin', and can't
find 'Bram and de rest ob 'em. Wha' he gwine do?
What can he do? We will have the start of him by
twenty-five
miles, and in one day more you will be free, 'Bram,
your own master, and able to put him at defiance. I will see
to that.
He will push arter us, Mass Ned,and dese ya nigger in de
bushlook ya, Mass Ned, dese all prime nigger. Da's one on
'em, a gal ya, most purty nuff for white man wife. You
'member
little Suzy, Mass Ned?
Don't I, 'Bram? Little Suzy is a pretty girlpretty enough
to be the wife of any man. Bring her out, bring them all out,
and let us be off. We understand each other.
Suzy is good gal, Mass Ned. I want for see 'em doing prime
when he git he freedom. You will marry 'em yourself, wid
parson?
If she wishes it.
He will wish 'em for true! But wha' dis I yer 'em say
'bout you habing tree wife a'ready?
No more of that, 'Bram.
Wha'! he aint true, den?
A lie, 'Bram! a black, a bloody lie!
What for den you let dat Georgy man run you out ob de
country?
Ha! who told you this?
I yer dem house sarbant talk ob 'em.
They do not understand it. I am not driven. I choose to
go.
Well! you know bes', but dat's wha' I yer dem say.
No more, 'Bram! Where are the people?
Let de dog bark tree time, and dey come. You kin bark
like dog, Mass Ned. Try for 'em.
The imitation was a good one. Sounds were heard in the
bushes, and one by one the supposed negroes appeared in the
star-light
.
They looked natural enough, and the kidnapper
approached
them with some interest.
These are all men, are they not? Are there no women?
Where's Little Suzy?
Ha! Mass Ned,I speck its true wha' dem people say. You
lub gal too much. I call little Suzy now, him take you 'bout de
neck. Come ya, my people. Mass Ned hab make 'greement
wid me to carry us all to fine country. He swear Bible 'oat to
make we all free, and gib we plenty whiskey and tobacco. I tell
'em you's ready to go. You ready, eh?
There was a general grunt of assent.
'Bram was disposed to be satirical. His dry chuckle
accompanied
every syllable.
Gib um you hand den on de bargain. Shake hand like
brudderin. Ha! ha! I nebber bin speck to be brudder ob my
young mossa. Shake hands, niggers, on de bargain.
You have heard what 'Bram has said, my boys. I promise
the same things to you. You shall go with me to a country where
you shall be free. I will give you plenty of whiskey and tobacco.
Here is my hand. Who is thisZeke?
The hand was clutched by Lamar, with a grasp that somewhat
startled the criminal. The voice of the supposed negro in the
next moment, terribly informed him of his danger.
Villain! exclaimed the Georgian, I have you! You are
sworn for the gallows! You shall not escape us now.
A short struggle followedthe doubtful light, and their rapid
movements, not suffering the other persons around so to
distinguish
between them as to know where to take hold. The
criminal
put forth all his strength, which was far from inconsiderable.
The combatants were nearly equally matched, but in the struggle
they traversed a fallen tree, over which Lamar stumbled and fell,
partly dragging his enemy with him to the ground. To save
himself
only did he relax his hold. Of this Stanton nimbly availed
himself. He recovered his feet, and, before the rest of the party
could interfere, had gained a dozen paces on his way to the thicket.
Once within its shadows, he might, with good heart and good
fortune
,
have baffled their pursuit. But this was not destined. He
was intercepted by no less a person than Abram, who rolled
himself
suddenly like a huge ball in the path of the fugitive, and
thus broke the fall which yet precipitated him to the ground.
In the next moment, the negro had caught him by the leg, yelling
at the same time to the rest of the party to come to his succour.
Ah! dog it is you then to whom I owe all this.
Such was the speech, muttered through his closed teeth, with
which Stanton declared his recognition of the assailant. His
words were followed by a pistol shot. Abram gave a cry,
released
his hold, and leapt to his feet. Stanton had only half risen
when the whole weight of the negro was again upon him.
You shoot, eh! You shoot! were the words of the black,
shrieked rather than spoken. The party interfered. The whole
affair had passed in a moment, quick as thought, and in far less
time than has been occupied with the recital.
Where is he, 'Bram? demanded Lamar.
I hab em ya, Mossahe safe, responded the other with a groan.
You are hurt? said young Ramsay, inquiringly.
One arm smash wid he pistol, Mass Jack.
His young master helped the fellow up, while Lamar and the
sheriff, with young Atkins, prepared to secure the criminal.
What is this! He is lifeless! said the former, as he touched
the body. What have you done, 'Bram?
I don't know, Mossa. I hab my knife in my han', and when
he shoot me, I so bex and I so scare, I don't know wha' I do wid
em. I gib um he knife, I speck. It's he own knife.
Sure enough! the weapon was still sticking in the side of the
criminal. The one blow was fatal, and his dying groan, if any
was uttered, was drowned in the furious exclamation with which
the negro accompanied the blow.
It is a loss to the gallows, said Lamar, with an expression
of chagrin.
Better so! replied young Ramsay.
It saves me a very dirty job! muttered the sheriff. We
may add that he took care to pay the usual fees to Abram, who
was otherwise well provided for by the Ramsay family, and still
lives to relate the events of that night of conflict with the Snake
of the Cabin.
OAKATIBBE,
OR THE CHOCTAW SAMPSON.
CHAPTER I.
It
was in the year 182, that I first travelled in the vallies of
the great south-west. Circumstances, influenced in no slight
degree
by an errant disposition, beguiled me to the Choctaw
nation
,
which, at that time, occupied the greater part of the space
below the Tennessee line, lying between the rivers Tombeckbe
and Mississippi, as low, nearly, as the town of Jackson, then, as
now, the capital of the State of Mississippi. I loitered for several
weeks in and about this region, without feeling the loss or the
weight of time. Yet, the reader is not to suppose that travelling
at that day was so simple a matter, or possessed many, if any of
the pleasant facilities of the present.
Au contraire:
It was then
a serious business. It meant
travail
rather than
travel
. The
roads were few and very hard to find. Indian foot-pathswith
the single exception of the great military traces laid out by
General
Jackson, and extending from Tennessee to Lake
Ponchar-train
formed
almost the only arteries known to the Nation;
and the portions of settled country in the neighbourhood,
nominally
civilized only, were nearly in the same condition. Some
of the Indian paths, as I experienced, seemed only to be made for
the perplexity of the stranger. Like Gray's passages which
led to nothing, they constantly brought me to a stand.
Sometimes
they were swallowed up in swamps, and, in such cases,
your future route upon the earth was to be discovered only by a
deliberate and careful survey of the skies above. The openings
in the trees over head alone instructed you in the course you
13
were to pursue. You may readily imagine that this sort of
progress was as little pleasant as edifying, yet, in some respects,
it was not wanting in its attractions, also. To the young and
ardent mind, obstacles of this nature tend rather to excite than to
depress. They contain the picturesque in themselves, at times,
and always bring out the moral in the man. To learn to rough
it, is an educational phrase, in the dialect of the new countries,
which would be of great service, adopted as a rule of government
for the young in all. To coon a loga mysterious process
to the uninitiatedswim a riverexperiment, at a guess, upon
the properties of one, and the proprieties of another routeparley
with an Indian after his own fashionnot to speak of a hundred
other incidents which the civilized world does not often present
will reconcile a lad of sanguine temperament to a number of
annoyances
much more serious than will attend him on an expedition
through our frontier countries.
It was at the close of a cloudy day in November, that I came
within hail of the new but rude plantation settlements of Colonel
Harris. He had but lately transferred his interests to Mississippi,
from one of the maternal thirteenhad bought largely in the
immediate neighbourhood of the Choctaw nation, and had also
acquired, by purchase from the natives, certain reserves within
it, to which he chiefly owes that large wealth, which, at this day,
he has the reputation of possessing. In place of the stately
residence
which now adorns his homestead, there was then but a
miserable log-house, one of the most ordinary of the country, in
which, unaccompanied by his family, he held his temporary
abiding place. His plantation was barely rescued from the
dominions
of nature. The trees were girdled only the previous
winter, for his first crop, which was then upon the ground, and
an excellent crop it was for that immature condition of his fields.
There is no describing the melancholy aspect of such a settlement,
seen in winter, on a cloudy day, and in the heart of an immense
forest, through which you have travelled for miles, without glimpse
of human form or habitation. The worm-fence is itself a gloomy
spectacle, and the girdled trees, erect but dead, the perishing
skeletons of recent life, impress you with sensations not entirely
unlike those which you would experience in going over some
battle-field, from which the decaying forms of man and horse
have not yet been removed. The fences of Col. Harris were low
in height, though of great extent. They were simply sufficient
to protect the fields from the random assaults of cattle. Of his
out-houses, the most respectable in size, solidity and security, was
the corn crib. His negro-houses, like the log-house in which he
himself dwelt, were only so many temporary shanties, covered
with poles and thatched with bark and pine-straw. In short,
every thing that met my eye only tended the more to frown upon
my anticipations of a cheerful fireside and a pleasant
arrangement
of the creature-comforts. But my doubts and
apprehensions
all vanished at the moment of my reception. I was met by
the proprietor with that ease and warmth of manner which does
not seem to be conscious of any deficiencies of preparation, and
is resolved that there shall be none which sincere hospitality can
remedy. I was soon prepared to forget that there were
deficiencies
.
I felt myself very soon at home. I had letters to Col.
Harris
,
which made me particularly welcome, and in ten minutes we
were both in full sail amongst all the shallows and deeps of
ordinary
conversation.
Not that we confined ourselves to these. Our discourse, after
a little while, turned upon a circumstance which I had witnessed
on riding through his fields and while approaching his dwelling,
which struck me with considerable surprise, and disturbed, in
some degree, certain pre-conceived opinions in my mind. I had
seen, interspersed with his negro labourers, a goodly number of
Indians of both sexes, but chiefly young persons, all equally and
busily employed in cotton picking. The season had been a
protracted
one, and favourable, accordingly, to the maturing of great
numbers of the bolls which an early and severe winter must have
otherwise destroyed. The crop, in consequence, had been so
great as to be beyond the ability, to gather in and harvest, of the
force by which it was made. This, in the new and fertile
vallies of the south-west, is an usual event. In ordinary cases,
when this happens, it is the custom to buy other negroes from less
productive regions, to consummate and secure the avails of labour
of the original force. The whole of these, united, are then
addressed to the task of opening additional lands, which, should
they yield as before, necessarily demand a second purchase of an
extra number to secure and harvest, in season, the surplus fruits
of their industry. The planter is very readily persuaded to make
this purchase so long as the seeming necessity shall re-occur;
and in this manner has he continued expanding his interests,
increasing
the volume of his lands, and incurring debt for these and
for his slaves, at exorbitant prices, in order to the production of a
commodity, every additional bag of which, disparages its own
value, and depreciates the productive power, in an estimate of
profit, of the industry by which it is produced. It will not be
difficult, keeping this fact in mind as a sample of the profligacy
of western adventureto account, in part, for the insolvency and
desperate condition of a people in possession of a country naturally
the most fertile of any in the world.
The crop of Col. Harris was one of this description. It far
exceeded the ability of his force to pick it in; but instead of
buying additional slaves for the purpose, he conceived the idea
of turning to account the lazy Choctaws by whom he was
surrounded
.
He proposed to hire them at a moderate compensation,
which was to be paid them weekly. The temptation of gain was
greedily caught at by these hungering outcasts, and, for a few
dollars, or an equivalent in goods, groceries, and so forth, some
forty-five of them were soon to be seen, as busy as might be, in
the prosecution of their unusual labours. The work was light
and easynone could be more soand though not such adepts
as the negro, the Indian women soon contrived to fill their bags
and baskets, in the course of the day. At dark, you might
behold
them trudging forward under their burdens to the log-house,
where the proprietor stood ready to receive them. Here he
weighed their burdens, and gave them credit, nightly, for the
number of pounds which they each brought in. The night of my
arrival was Saturday, and the value of the whole week's labour
was then to be summed up and accounted for. This necessarily
made them all punctual in attendance, and nothing could be
more amusing than the interest which they severally displayed as
Col. Harris took out his memorandum book, and proceeded to
make his entries. Every eye was fixed upon him, and an old
Indian
,
who, though he did not work himself, represented the interests
of a wife and two able-bodied daughters, planted himself directly
behind this gentleman, and watched, with looks of growing
sagacity
,
every stroke that was made in thisto himvolume of
more than Egyptian mystery and hieroglyphics. Meanwhile, the
squaws stood about their baskets with looks expressive of similar
interest, but at the same time of laudable patience. The negroes in
the rear, were scarcely less moved by curiosity, though a
contemptuous
grin might be seen on nearly all their countenances,
as they felt their superiority in nearly every physical and
intellectual
respect, over the untutored savages. Many Indians were
present who neither had nor sought employment. Of those
employed
,
few or none were of middle age. But these were not
wanting to the assemblage. They might be seen prowling about
the restwatchful of the concerns of their wives, sons and
daughters, with just that sort and degree of interest, which the
eagle may be supposed to feel, who, from his perch on the
tree-top
or the rock, beholds the fish-hawk dart into the water in
pursuit
of that prey which he meditates to rend from his jaws as soon
as he shall re-ascend into the air. Their interest was decidedly
greater than that of the poor labourer. It was in this manner that
these vultures appropriated the fruits of his industry, and there
was no remedy. They commonly interfered, the moment it was
declared what was due to the
employe,
to resolve the pay into a
certain number of gallons of whiskey; so many pounds of
tobacco
;
so much gunpowder and lead. If the employer, as was
the case with Col. Harris, refused to furnish them with whiskey,
they required him to pay in money. With this, they soon made
their way to one of those moral sinks, called a grog-shop, which
English civilization is always ready to plant, as its first, most
familiar
,
and most imposing standard, among the hills and forests
of the savage.
It may be supposed that this experiment upon the inflexibility
of Indian character and habitfor it was an experiment which
had been in trial only a single weekwas a subject of no little
curiosity to me, as it would most probably be to almost every
person at all impressed with the humiliating moral and social
deterioration
which has marked this fast decaying people. Could it
possibly be successful? Could a race, proud, sullen,
incommunicative
,
wandering, be persuaded, even by gradual steps, and with
the hope of certain compensation, to renounce the wild satisfaction
afforded by their desultory and unconstrained modes of life?
Could they be beguiled for a season into employments which,
though they did not demand any severe labours, at least required
pains-taking, regular industry, and that habitual attention to daily
recurring tasks, which, to their roving nature, would make life
a most monotonous and unattractive possession? How far the
lightness of the labour and the simplicity of the employment, with
the corresponding recompense, would reconcile them to its tasks,
was the natural subject of my inquiry. On this head, my friend,
Col. Harris, could only conjecture and speculate like myself. His
experiment had been in progress but a few days. But our
speculations
led us to very different conclusions. He was a person of
very ardent character, and sanguine, to the last degree, of the
success of his project. He had no question but that the Indian,
even at his present stage, might be brought under the influence
of a judicious civilization. We both agreed that the first process
was in procuring their labourthat this was the preliminary step,
without taking which, no other could be made; but how to bring
them to this was the question.
They can be persuaded to this, was his conclusion.
Money
,
the popular god, is as potent with them as with our own
people
.
They will do any thing for money. You see these now in
the field. They have been there, and just as busy, and in the
same number, from Monday last.
How long will they continue?
As long as I can employ and pay them.
Impossible! They will soon be dissatisfied. The men will
consume and squander all the earnings of the females and the
feeble. The very motive of their industry, money, to which you
refer, will be lost to them after the first payment. I am
convinced
that a savage people, not as yet familiar with the elements of
moral prudence, can only be brought to habitual labour, by the
one process of coercion.
We shall see. There is no coercion upon them now, yet they
work with wonderful regularity.
This week will end it. Savages are children in all but
physical
respects. To do any thing with them, you must place them
in that position of responsibility, and teach them that law, without
the due employment of which, any attempt to educate a child,
must be an absurdityyou must teach them obedience. They
must he made to know, at the outset, that they know nothing
that they must implicitly defer to the superior. This lesson they
will never learn, so long as they possess the power, at any
moment
,
to withdraw from his control.
Yet, even were this to be allowed, there must be a limit.
There must come a time when you will be required to
emancipate
them. In what circumstances will you find that time? You
cannot keep them under this coercion always; when will you set
them free?
When they are fit for freedom.
How is that to be determined? Who shall decide their fitness?
Themselves; as in the case of the children of Israel. The
children of Israel went out from bondage as soon as their own
intellectual advancement had been such as to enable them to
produce from their own ranks a leader like Moses:one whose
genius was equal to that of the people by whom they had been
educated, and sufficient for their own proper government
thereafter
.
But has not an experiment of this sort already been tried in
our country?
Nay, I think notI know of none.
Yes: an Indian boy was taken in infancy from his parents,
carried to one of the Northern States, trained in all the learning
and habits of a Northern college and society, associated only with
whites, beheld no manners, and heard no morals, but those which
are known to Christian communities. His progress was
satisfactory
he
learned rapidlywas considered something of a prodigy,
and graduated with eclt. He was then left, with the same
option
as the rest enjoyed, to the choice of a profession. And what
was his choice? Do you not remember the beautiful little poem
of Freneau on this subject? He chose the buck-skin leggins, the
moccasins, bow and arrows, and the wide, wild forests, where his
people dwelt.
Freneau's poem tells the story somewhat differently. The
facts upon which it is founded, however, are, I believe, very much
as you tell them. But what an experiment it was! How very
silly! They take a copper-coloured boy from his people, and
carry
him, while yet an infant, to a remote region. Suppose, in
order
that the experiment may be fairly tried, that they withhold
from him all knowledge of his origin. He is brought up
precisely
as the other lads around him. But what is the first discovery
which he makes? That he is a copper-coloured boythat he is,
alone, the only copper-coloured boythat wherever he turns he
sees no likeness to himself. This begets his wonder, then his
curiosity
,
and finally his suspicion. He soon understandsfor his
suspicion sharpens every faculty of observationthat he is an
object of experiment. Nay, the most cautious policy in the world
could never entirely keep this from a keen-thoughted urchin.
His fellow pupils teach him this. He sees that, to them, he is an
object of curiosity and study. They regard him, and he soon
regards himself, as a creature set apart, and separated, for some
peculiar purposes, from all the rest. A stern and singular sense
of individuality and isolation is thus forced upon him. He asks
Am I, indeed, alone?Who am I?What am I?These
inquiries
naturally occasion others. Does he read? Books give
him the history of his race. Nay, his own story probably meets
his eye in the newspapers. He learns that he is descended from
a nation dwelling among the secret sources of the Susquehannah.
He pries in all corners for information. The more secret his
search, the more keenly does he pursue it. It becomes the great
passion of his mind. He learns that his people are fierce
warriors
and famous hunters. He hears of their strifes with the
white mantheir successful strifes, when the nation could send
forth its thousand bow-men, and the whites were few and feeble.
Perhaps, the young pale faces around him, speak of his people,
even now, as enemies; at least, as objects of suspicion, and
perhaps
antipathy. All these things tend to elevate and idealize, in
his mind, the history of his people. He cherishes a sympathy, even
beyond the natural desires of the heart, for the perishing race
from which he feels himself, like a limb, cast bleeding and
torn. The curiosity to see his ancestrythe people of his tribe
and countrywould be the most natural feeling of the white boy,
under similar circumstancesshall we wonder that it is the
predominant
passion in the bosom of the Indian, whose very
complexion
forces him away from any connection with the rest! My
idea of the experimentif such a proceeding may be called an
experimentis soon spoken. As a statement of facts, I see
nothing
to provoke wonder. The result was the most natural thing
in the world, and a man of ordinary powers of reflection might
easily have predicted it, precisely as it happened. The only
wonder is, that there should be found, among persons of common
education and sagacity, men who should have undertaken such
an experiment, and fancied that they were busy in a moral and
philosophical problem.
Why, how would you have the experiment tried?
As it was tried upon the Hebrews, upon the Saxonsupon
every savage people who ever became civilized. It cannot be
tried upon an individual: it must be tried upon a nationat least
upon a community, sustained by no succour from withouthaving
no forests or foreign shores upon which to turn their eyes for
sympathyhaving no mode or hope of escapeunder the full
control of an already civilized peopleand sufficiently numerous
among themselves, to find sympathy, against those necessary
rigours which at first will seem oppressive, but which will be the
only hopeful process by which to enforce the work of
improvement
.
They must find this sympathy from beholding others, like
themselves in aspect, form, feature and condition, subject to the
same unusual restraints. In this contemplation they will be
content to pursue their labours under a restraint which they
cannot displace. But the natural law must be satisfied. There
must be opportunities yielded for the indulgence of the legitimate
passions. The young of both sexes among the subjected people,
must commune and form ties in obedience to the requisitions of
nature and according to their national customs. What, if the
Indian student, on whom the experiment was tried, had paid
his addresses to a white maiden! What a revulsion of the moral
and social sense would have followed his proposition in the mind
of the Saxon damsel;and, were she to consent, what a
commotion
in the community in which she lived. And this revulsion
and commotion would have been perfectly natural, and,
accordingly
,
perfectly proper. God has made an obvious distinction
between certain races of men, setting them apart, and requiring
them to be kept so, by subjecting them to the resistance and
rebuke of one of the most jealous sentinels of sense which we
possessthe eye. The prejudices of this sense, require that the
natural barriers should be maintained, and hence it becomes
necessary that the race in subjection, should be sufficiently
numerous
to enable it to carry out the great object of every distinct
community, though, perchance, it may happen to be an inferior one.
In process of time, the beneficial and blessing effects of labour
would be felt and understood by the most ignorant and savage of
the race. Perhaps, not in one generation, or in two, but after the
fifth and seventh, as it is written, of those who keep my
commandments
.
They would soon discover that, though compelled
to toil, their toils neither enfeebled their strength nor impaired
their happinessthat, on the contrary, they still resulted in their
increasing strength, health, and comfort;that their food, which
before was precarious, depending on the caprices of the seasons,
or the uncertainties of the chase, was now equally plentiful,
wholesome and certain. They would also perceive that, instead
of the sterility which is usually the destiny of all wandering
tribes, and one of the processes by which they perishthe
fecundity
of their people was wonderfully increased. These
discoveries
if
time be allowed to make themwould tacitly reconcile
them to that inferior position of their race, which is proper and
inevitable, so long as their intellectual inferiority shall continue.
And what would have been the effect upon our Indiansdecidedly
the noblest race of aborigines that the world has ever knownif,
instead of buying their scalps at prices varying from five to fifty
pounds each, we had conquered and subjected them? Will any
one pretend to say that they would not have increased with the
restraints and enforced toils of our superior genius?that they
would not, by this time, have formed a highly valuable and noble
integral in the formation of our national strength and character?
Perhaps their civilization would have been comparatively easy
the Hebrews required four hundred yearsthe Britons and
Saxons, possibly,. half that time after the Norman Conquest.
Differing in colour from their conquerors, though I suspect, with a
natural genius superior to that of the ancient Britons, at the time
of the Roman invasion under Julius Csar, the struggle between
the two races must have continued for some longer time, but the
union would have been finally effected, and then, as in the case
of the Englishman, we should have possessed a race, in their
progeny, which, in moral and physical structure, might have
challenged competition with the world.
Ay, but the difficulty would have been in the conquest.
True, that would have been the difficulty. The American
colonists were few in number and feeble in resource. The
nations
from which they emerged put forth none of their strength in
sending them forth. Never were colonies so inadequately
provided
so
completely left to themselves; and hence the peculiar
injustice and insolence of the subsequent exactions of the British,
by which they required their colonies to support their schemes of
aggrandizement and expenditure by submitting to extreme
taxation
.
Do you suppose, if the early colonists had been powerful,
that they would have ever deigned to treat for lands with the
roving
hordes of savages whom they found on the continent? Never!
Their purchases and treaties were not for lands, but tolerance.
They bought permission to remain without molestation. The
amount professedly given for land, was simply a tribute paid to
the superior strength of the Indian, precisely as we paid it to
Algiers
and the Musselmens, until we grew strong enough to whip
them into respect. If, instead of a few ships and a few hundred
men, timidly making their approaches along the shores of
Manhattan
,
Penobscot and Ocracocke, some famous leader, like
neas, had brought his entire peoplesuppose them to be the
persecuted Irishwhat a wondrous difference would have taken
place. The Indians would have been subjectedwould have
sunk into their proper position of humility and dependence; and,
by this time, might have united with their conquerors, producing,
perhaps, along the great ridge of the Alleghany, the very noblest
specimens of humanity, in mental and bodily stature, that the
world has ever witnessed. The Indians were taught to be
insolent
by the fears and feebleness of the whites. They were
flattered
by fine words, by rich presents, and abundance of
deference
,
until the ignorant savage, but a single degree above the
brutewho, until then, had never been sure of his porridge for
more than a day aheadtook airs upon himself, and became one
of the most conceited and arrogant lords in creation. The
colonists
grew wiser as they grew stronger; but the evil was already
done, and we are reaping some of the bitter fruits, at this day, of
seed unwisely sown in that. It may be that we shall yet see the
experiment tried fairly.
Ah, indeedwhere?
In Mexicoby the Texians. Let the vain, capricious,
ignorant
,
and dastardly wretches who now occupy and spoil the
face and fortunes of the former country, persevere in pressing
war upon those sturdy adventurers, and their doom is written. I
fear
it may be the swordI
hope
it may be the milder fate of
bondage and subjection. Such a fate would save, and raise them
finally to a far higher condition than they have ever before
enjoyed
.
Thirty thousand Texians, each with his horse and rifle,
would soon make themselves masters of the city of Montezuma,
and then may you see the experiment tried upon a scale
sufficiently
extensive to make it a fair one. But your Indian student,
drawn from
Susquehannah's farthest springs,
and sent to Cambridge, would present you with some such moral
picture as that of the prisoner described by Sterne. His chief
employment, day by day, would consist in notching upon his stick,
the undeviating record of his daily suffering. It would be to him
an experiment almost as full of torture, as that of the Scottish
Boot, the Spanish Thumb-screwor any of those happy devices
of ancient days, for impressing pleasant principles upon the mind,
by impressing unpleasant feelings upon the thews, joints and sinews.
I wish that some one of our writers, familiar with mental analysis,
would make this poem of Freneau, the subject of a story. I think
it would yield admirable material. To develope the thoughts and
feelings of an Indian boy, taken from his people, ere yet he has
formed such a knowledge of them, or of others, as to have begun
to discuss or to compare their differencesfollow him to a college
such as that of Princeton or Cambridgewatch him within its
wallsamid the crowd, but not of itlooking only within
himself
,
while all others are looking into him, or trying to do so
surrounded
by active, sharp-witted lads of the Anglo-Norman race;
undergoing an hourly repeated series of moral spasms, as he hears
them wantonly or thoughtlessly dwell upon the wild and
ignorant
people from whom he is chosen;listening, though without
seeming to listen, to their crude speculations upon the great
problem
which is to be solved only by seeing how well he can
endure
his spasms, and what use he will make of his philosophy if
he survives itthen, when the toils of study and the tedious
restraints
and troubles of prayer and recitation are got over, to
behold
and describe the joy with which the happy wretch flings by
his fetters, when he is dismissed from those walls which have
witnessed
his tortureseven supposing him to remain (which is very
unlikely,) until his course of study is pronounced to be complete!
With what curious pleasure will he stop in the shadow of the first
deep forest, to tear from his limbs those garments which make
him seem unlike his people! How quick will be the beating at
his heart as he endeavours to dispose about his shoulders the
blanket robe in the manner in which it is worn by the chief
warrior
of his tribe! With what keen effortshould he have had
any previous knowledge of his kindredwill he seek to compel
his memory to restore every, the slightest, custom or peculiarity
which distinguished them when his eyes were first withdrawn
from the parental tribe; and how closely will he imitate their
indomitable
pride and lofty, cold, superiority of look and gesture,
as, at evening, he enters the native hamlet, and takes his seat in
silence at the door of the Council House, waiting, without a word,
for the summons of the Elders!
Quite a picture. I think with you, that, in good hands, such
a subject would prove a very noble one.
But the story would not finish here. Supposing all this to
have taken place, just as we are told it didsupposing the boy to
have graduated at college, and to have flung away the distinction
to have returned, as has been described, to his savage costume
to the homes and habits of his people;it is not so clear that he
will fling away all the lessons of wisdom, all the knowledge of facts,
which he will have acquired from the tuition of the superior race.
A natural instinct, which is above all lessons, must be complied
with; but this doneand when the first tumults of his blood
have subsided, which led him to defeat the more immediate
object
of his social trainingthere will be a gradual resumption
of the educational influence in his mind, and his intellectual
habits will begin to exercise themselves anew. They will be
provoked necessarily to this exercise by what he beholds around
him. He will begin to perceive, in its true aspects, the
wretchedness
of that hunter-state, which, surveyed at a distance, appeared
only the embodiment of stoical heroism and the most elevated
pride. He will see and lament the squalid poverty of his people;
which, his first lessons in civilization must have shown him, is
due only to the mode of life and pursuits in which they are
engaged
.
Their beastly intoxication will offend his tastestheir
superstition and ignorancethe circumscribed limits of their
capacity
for judging of things and relations beyond the life of the
bird or beast of preywill awaken in him a sense of shame
when he feels that they are his kindred. The insecurity of their
liberties will awaken his fears, for he will instantly see that the
great body of the people in every aboriginal nation are the veriest
slaves in the world; and the degrading exhibitions which they
make in their filth and drunkenness, which reduce the man to a
loathesomeness of aspect which is never reached by the vilest
beast which he hunts or scourges, will be beheld by the Indian
student in very lively contrast with all that has met his eyes
during that novitiate among the white sages, the processes
of which have been to him so humiliating and painful. His
memory reverts to that period with feelings of reconciliation.
The torture is over, and the remembrance of former pain, endured
with manly fortitude, is comparatively a pleasure. A necessary
reaction in his mind takes place; and, agreeably to the laws of
nature, what will, and what should follow, but that he will seek
to become the tutor and the reformer of his people? They
themselves
will tacitly raise him to this position, for the man of the
forest will defer even to the negro who has been educated by the
white man. He will try to teach them habits of greater method
and industryhe will overthrow the altars of their false gods
he will seek to bind the wandering tribes together under one head
and in one nationhe will prescribe uniform laws of government.
He will succeed in some thingshe will fail in others; he will
offend the pride of the self-conceited and the mulishthe
priesthood
will be the first to declare against himand he will be
murdered
most probably, as was Romulus, and afterwards deified.
If he escapes this fate, he will yet, most likely, perish from
mortification
under failure, or, in consequence of those mental strifes
which spring from that divided allegiance between the feelings
belonging to his savage, and those which have had their origin in
his christian schoolsthose natural strifes between the
acquisitions
of civilization on the one hand, and those instinct tendencies
of the blood which distinguish his connection with the inferior
race. In this conflict, he will, at length, when the enthusiasm
of his youthful zeal has become chilled by frequent and
unexpected
defeat, falter, and finally fail. But will there be nothing
done for his people? Who can say? I believe that no seed
falls without profit by the wayside. Even if the truth produces
no immediate fruits, it forms a moral manure which fertilizes the
otherwise barren heart, in preparation for the more favourable
season. The Indian student may fail, as his teachers did, in
realizing the object for which he has striven; and this sort of
failure, is, by the way, one of the most ordinary of human
allotment
.
The desires of man's heart, by an especial Providence,
that always wills him to act for the future, generally aim at
something far beyond his own powers of performance. But the
labour has not been taken in vain, in the progress of successive
ages, which has achieved even a small part of its legitimate
purposes
.
The Indian student has done for his people much more
than the white man achieves ordinarily for his generation, if he
has only secured to their use a single truth which they knew not
beforeif he has overthrown only one of their false godsif he
has smitten off the snaky head of only one of their superstitious
prejudices. If he has added to their fields of corn a field of
millet
,
he has induced one farther physical step towards moral
improvement
.
Nay, if there be no other result, the very deference
which they will have paid him, as the
elv
of the white man,
will be a something gained of no little importance, towards
inducing
their more ready, though still tardy, adoption of the laws
and guidance of the superior race.
CHAPTER II.
I am
afraid that my reader will suffer quite as much under
this long discussion, as did my excellent companion, Col. Harris.
But he is not to suppose that all the views here expressed, were
uttered consecutively, as they are above set down. I have
simply
condensed, for more easy comprehension, the amount of a
conversation which lasted some two hours. I may add, that, at the
close, we discovered, as is very often the case among disputants,
there was very little substantial difference between us. Our
dispute
,
if any, was rather verbal than philosophical. On the
subject
of his experiment, however, Col. Harris fancied, that, in
employing
some forty or fifty of the Indians, of both sexes, he had
brought together a community sufficiently large for the purposes
of a fair experiment. Still, I thought that the argument remained
untouched. They were not subordinate; they were not subdued;
they could still exercise a free and absolute will, in despite of
authority and reason. He could resort to no method for
compelling
their obedience; and we know pretty well what will result
even among white menfrom the option of vagrancy.
But, I urged, even if the objections which I have stated,
fail of defeating your scheme, there is yet another agent of
defeat
working against it, in the presence of these elderly Indians,
who do not join in the labour, and yet, according to your own
showing, still prowl in waiting to snatch from the hands of the
industrious all the fruits of their toil. The natural effect of this
will be to discourage the industry of those who work; for, unless
the labourer is permitted to enjoy a fair proportion of the fruits of
his labour, it is morally impossible that he should long continue it.
Our conference was interrupted by the appearance of the
labourers
,
Indians and Negroes, who now began to come in, bringing
with them the cotton which they had severally gathered during the
day. This was accumulated in the court-yard, before the
dwelling
;
each Indian, man or woman, standing beside the bag or
basket
which contained the proofs of his industry. You may readily
suppose, that, after the dialogue and discussion which is partially
reported above, I felt no little interest in observing the
proceedings
.
The parties present were quite numerous. I put the
negroes
out of the question, though they were still to be seen,
lingering
in the background, grinning spectators of the scene. The
number of Indians, men and women, who had
that day
been
engaged
in picking, was thirty-nine. Of these, twenty-six were
females; three, only, might be accounted men, and ten were boys
none over sixteen. Of the females the number of elderly and
young women was nearly equal. Of the men, one was very old
and infirm; a second of middle age, who appeared to be something
of an idiot; while the third, whom I regarded for this reason with
more consideration and interest than all the party beside, was
one of the most noble specimens of physical manhood that my
eyes had ever beheld. He was fully six feet three inches in
height, slender but muscular in the extreme. He possessed a
clear, upright, open, generous cast of countenance, as utterly
unlike that sullen, suspicious expression of the ordinary Indian
face, as you can possibly imagine. Good nature and good sense
were the predominant characteristics of his features, andwhich
is quite as unusual with Indians when in the presence of strangers
he laughed and jested with all the merry, unrestrainable
vivacity
of a youth of Anglo-Saxon breed. How was it that so
noble a specimen of manhood consented to herd with the women
and the weak of his tribe, in descending to the mean labours
which the warriors were accustomed to despise?
He must either be a fellow of great sense, or he must be a
coward. He is degraded.
Such was my conclusion. The answer of Col. Harris was
immediate.
He is a fellow of good sense, and very far from being a
coward
.
He is one of the best Choctaws that I know.
A man, then, to be a leader of his people. It is a singular
proof of good sense and great mental flexibility, to find an Indian,
who is courageous, voluntarily assuming tasks which are held to
be degrading among the hunters. I should like to talk with this
fellow when you are done. What is his name?
14
His proper name is Oakatibb; but that by which he is
generally
known among ushis English nameis Slim Sampson, a
name which he gets on the score of his superior strength and
great slenderness. The latter name, in ordinary use, has
completely
superseded the former, even among his own people. It
may be remarked, by the way, as another proof of the tacit
deference
of the inferior to the superior people, that most Indians
prefer to use the names given by the whites to those of their own
language. There are very few among them who will not
contrive
,
after a short intimacy with white men, to get some epithet
which is not always a complimentary onebut which they
cling to as tenaciously as they would to some far more valuable
possession.
This little dialogue was whispered during the stir which
followed
the first arrival of the labourers. We had no opportunity
for more.
The rest of the Indians were in no respect remarkable. There
were some eight or ten women, and perhaps as many men, who
did not engage in the toils of their companions, though they did
not seem the less interested in the result. These, I noted, were
all, in greater or less degree, elderly persons. One was full
eighty years old, and a strange fact for one so venerable, was the
most confirmed drunkard of the tribe. When the cotton pickers
advanced with their baskets, the hangers-on drew nigh also, deeply
engrossed with the prospect of reaping the gains from that
industry
which they had no mood to emulate. These, however, were
very moderate, in most cases. Where a negro woman picked
from one to two hundred weight of cotton,
per diem,
the Indian
woman, at the utmost, gathered sixty-five; and the general
average
among them, did not much exceed forty-five. Slim
Sampson's
basket weighed eighty-six poundsan amount considerably
greater than any of the restand Col. Harris assured me, that
his average during the week had been, at no time, much below
this quantity.
The proceedings had gone on without interruption or
annoyance
for the space of half an hour. Col. Harris had himself
weighed every basket, with scrupulous nicety, and recorded the
several weights opposite to the name of the picker, in a little
memorandum
book which he kept exclusively for this purpose; and it
was amusing to see with what pleasurable curiosity, the Indians,
men and women, watched the record which stated their several
accounts. The whole labour of the week was to be settled for
that night (Saturday), and hence the unusual gathering of those
whose only purpose in being present, was to grasp at the spoils.
Among these hawks was one middle-aged Indiana stern,
sulky fellow, of considerable size and strengthwhose skin was
even then full of liquor, which contributing to the usual insolence
of his character, made him at times very troublesome. He had
more than once, during the proceedings, interfered between Col.
Harris and his
employes,
in such a manner as to provoke, in the
mind of that gentleman, no small degree of irritation. The
English
name of this Indian, was Loblolly Jack. Loblolly Jack had
a treble motive for being present and conspicuous. He had
among the labourers, a wife and two daughters. When the
baskets
of these were brought forward to be weighed, he could no
longer be kept in the background, but, resolutely thrusting
himself
before the rest, he handled basket, book and steelyards in
turn, uttered his suspicions of foul play, and insisted upon a close
examination of every movement which was made by the
proprietor
.
In this manner, he made it very difficult for him to proceed
in his duties; and his conduct, to do the Indians justice, seemed
quite as annoying to them as to Col. Harris. The wife frequently
expostulated with him, in rather bolder language than an Indian
squaw is apt to use to her liege lord; while Slim Sampson, after
a few words of reproach, expressed in Choctaw, concluded by
telling him in plain English, that he was a rascal dog. He
seemed the only one among them who had no fear of the intruder.
Loblolly Jack answered in similar terms, and Slim Sampson,
clearing the baskets at a single bound, confronted him with a
show of fight, and a direct challenge to it, on the spot where they
stood. The other seemed no ways loth. He recoiled a pace,
drew his knifea sufficient signal for Slim Sampson to get his
own in readinessand, thus opposed, they stood, glaring upon
each other with eyes of the most determined expression of
malignity
.
A moment morean additional word of provocation from
eitherand blows must have taken place. But Col. Harris, a
man of great firmness, put himself between them, and calling to
one of his negroes, bade him bring out from the house his
double-barreled
gun.
Now, said he, my good fellows, the first man of you that
lifts his hand to strike, I'll shoot him down; so look to it. Slim
Sampson, go back to your basket, and don't meddle in this
business
.
Don't you suppose that I'm man enough to keep Loblolly
Jack in order? You shall see.
It is not difficult for a determined white man to keep an Indian
in subordination, so long as both of them are sober. A few
words more convinced Loblolly Jack, who had not yet reached
the reckless stage in drunkenness, that his wiser course was to
give back and keep quiet, which he did. The storm subsided
almost as suddenly as it had been raised, and Col. Harris resumed
his occupation. Still, the Indian who had proved so troublesome
before, continued his annoyances, though in a manner somewhat
less audacious. His last proceeding was to get as nigh as he
could to the basket which was about to be weighedhis wife's
basketand, with the end of a stick, adroitly introduced into some
little hole, he contrived to press the basket downwards, and thus
to add so much to the weight of the cotton, that his squaw
promised
to bear off the palm of victory in that day's picking. Nobody
saw the use to which the stick was put, and for a few moments no
one suspected it. Had the cunning fellow been more moderate,
he might have succeeded in his attempt upon the steelyards; but
his pressure increased with every approach which was made to a
determination of the weight, and while all were wondering that so
small a basket should be so heavy, Slim Sampson discovered and
pointed out the trick to Col. Harris, who suddenly snatching the stick
from the grasp of the Indian, was about to lay it over his head.
But this my expostulation prevented; and, after some delay, the
proceedings were finally ended; but in such a manner as to make
my friend somewhat more doubtful than he had been before, on
the subject of his experiment. He paid off their accounts, some
in cloths and calicoes, of which he had provided a small supply
for this purpose; but the greater number, under the evil influence
of the idle and the elder, demanded and received their pay in
money.
CHAPTER III.
It
was probably about ten o'clock that evening. We had
finished
supper, and Col. H. and myself had resumed the subject
upon which we had been previously engaged. But the
discussion
was languid, and both of us were unquestionably lapsing into
that state, when each readily receives an apology for retiring for
the night, when we were startled from our drowsy tendencies by
a wild and terrible cry, such as made me thrill instinctively with
the conviction that something terrible had taken place. We
started
instantly to our feet, and threw open the door. The cry was
more distinct and piercing, and its painful character could not be
mistaken. It was a cry of deathof sudden terror, and great
and angry excitement. Many voices were mingled togethersome
expressive of fury, some of fear, and many of lamentation. The
tones which finally prevailed over, and continued long after all
others had subsided, were those of women.
These sounds come from the shop of that trader. Those
rascally
Choctaws are drunk and fighting, and ten to one but
somebody
is killed among them! was the exclamation of Col. H.
These sounds are familiar to me. I have heard them once
before
.
They signify murder. It is a peculiar whoop which the
Indians have, to denote the shedding of bloodto show that a crime
has been committed.
The words had scarcely been uttered, before Slim Sampson
came suddenly out into the road, and joined us at the door. Col.
H. instantly asked him to enter, which he did. When he came
fully into the light, we discovered that he had been drinking.
His eyes bore sufficient testimony to the fact, though his
drunkenness
seemed to have subsided into something like stupor. His
looks were heavy, rather than calm. He said nothing, but drew
nigh to the fireplace, and seated himself upon one corner of the
hearth. I now discovered that his hands and hunting shirt were
stained with blood. His eyes beheld the bloody tokens at the same
time, and he turned his hand curiously over, and examined it by
the fire-light.
Kurnel, said he, in broken English, me is one dog fool!
How, Sampson?
Me drunkme fightme kill Loblolly Jack! Look ya!
Dis blood 'pon my hands. 'Tis Loblolly Jack blood! He dead!
I stick him wid de knife!
Impossible! What made you do it?
Me drunk! Me dog fool!Drink whiskey at liquor shop
hab moneybuy whiskeydrunk come, and Loblolly Jack
dead!
This was the substance of the story, which was confirmed a
few moments after, by the appearance of several other Indians,
the friends of the two parties. From these it appeared that all of
them had been drinking, at the shop of Ligon, the white man;
that, when heated with liquor, both Loblolly Jack and Slim
Sampson
had, as with one accord, resumed the strife which had been
arrested by the prompt interference of Col. H.; that, from words
they had got to blows, and the former had fallen, fatally hurt, by
a single stroke from the other's hand and knife.
The Indian law, like that of the Hebrews, is eye for eye, tooth
for tooth, life for life. The fate of Slim Sampson was ordained.
He was to die on the morrow. This was well understood by
himself
as by all the rest. The wound of Loblolly Jack had proved
mortal. He was already dead; and it was arranged among the
parties that Slim Sampson was to remain that night, if permitted,
at the house of Col. H., and to come forth at early sunrise to
execution
.
Col. H. declared his willingness that the criminal should
remain in his house; but, at the same time, disclaimed all
responsibility
in the business; and assured the old chief, whose name
was Rising Smoke, that he would not be answerable for his
appearance.
He won't run, said the other, indifferently.
But you will not put a watch over himI will not suffer
more than the one to sleep in my house.
The old chief repeated his assurance that Slim Sampson would
not seek to fly. No guard was to be placed over him. He was
expected to remain quiet, and come forth to execution at the hour
appointed.
He got for dead, continued Rising Smokehe know the
law. He will come and dead like a man. Oakatibb got big
heart. Every word which the old fellow uttered went to mine.
What an eulogy was this upon Indian inflexibility! What
confidence
in the passive obedience of the warrior! After a little
farther dialogue, they departed,friends and enemiesand the
unfortunate criminal was left with us alone. He still maintained
his seat upon the hearth. His muscles were composed and calm
not rigid. His thoughts, however, were evidently busy; and,
once or twice, I could see that his head was moved slowly from
side to side, with an expression of mournful self-abandonment. I
watched every movement and look with the deepest interest, while
Col. H. with a concern necessarily deeper than my own, spoke with
him freely, on the subject of his crime. It was, in fact, because
of the affair of Col. H. that the unlucky deed was committed. It
was true, that, for this, the latter gentleman was in no wise
responsible
;
but that did not lessen, materially, the pain which he felt
at having, however unwittingly, occasioned it. He spoke with
the Indian in such terms of condolence as conventional usage
among us has determined to be the most proper. He proffered to
buy off the friends and relatives of the deceased, if the offence
could be commuted for money. The poor fellow was very
grateful
,
but, at the same time, told him that the attempt was useless.
The tribe had never been known to permit such a thing, and
the friends of Loblolly Jack were too much his enemies, to
consent
to any commutation of the penalty.
Col. H., however, was unsatisfied, and determined to try the
experiment. The notion had only suggested itself to him after
the departure of the Indians. He readily conjectured where he
should find them, and we immediately set off for the grogshop of
Ligon. This was little more than a quarter of a mile from the
plantation. When we reached it, we found the Indians,
generally
,
in the worst possible condition to be treated with. They
were, most of them, in the last stages of intoxication. The dead
body of the murdered man was stretched out in the piazza, or
gallery, half covered with a bear-skin. The breast was bare
a broad, bold, manly bosomand the wound, a deep narrow gash,
around which the blood stood, clotted, in thick, frothy masses.
The nearer relations of the deceased, were perhaps the most
drunk of the assembly. Their grief necessarily entitled them to
the greatest share of consolation, and this took the form of
whiskey
.
Their love of excess, and the means of indulgence,
encouraged us with the hope that their vengeance might be bought
off without much difficulty, but we soon found ourselves very
much deceived. Every effort, every offer, proved fruitless; and
after vainly exhausting every art and argument, old Rising
Smoke drew us aside to tell us that the thing was impossible.
Oakatibb hab for die, and no use for talk. De law is make
for Oakatibb, and Loblolly Jack, and me, Rising Smoke, and all,
just the same. Oakatibb will dead to-morrow.
With sad hearts, we left the maudlin and miserable assembly.
When we returned, we found Slim Sampson employed in carving
with his knife upon the handle of his tomahawk. In the space
thus made, he introduced a small bit of flattened silver, which
seemed to have been used for a like purpose on some previous
occasion. It was rudely shaped like a bird, and was probably
one of those trifling ornaments which usually decorate the stocks
of rifle and shot-gun. I looked with increasing concern upon
his countenance. What could a spectatorone unacquainted
with the circumstanceshave met with there? Nothing, surely,
of that awful event which had just taken place, and of that doom
which now seemed so certainly to await him. He betrayed no
sort of interest in our mission. His look and manner denoted his
own perfect conviction of its inutility; and when we told him
what had taken place, he neither answered nor looked up.
It would be difficult to describe my feelings and those of my
companion. The more we reflected upon the affair, the more
painful and oppressive did our thoughts become. A pain, little
short of horror, coupled itself with every emotion. We left the
Indian still beside the fire. He had begun a low chanting song
just before we retired, in his own language, which was meant as a
narrative of the chief events of his life. The death songfor such
it wasis neither more nor less than a recital of those deeds
which it will be creditable to a son or a relative to remember.
In this way the valor of their great men, and the leading events
in their history, are transmitted through successive ages. He
was evidently refreshing his own memory in preparation for the
morrow. He was arranging the narrative of the past, in proper
form for the acceptance of the future.
We did not choose to disturb him in this vocation, and retired.
When we had got to our chamber, H. who already had one boot
off, exclaimed suddenly Look you, S., this fellow ought not
to perish in this manner. We should make an effort to save him.
We must save him!
What will you do?
Comelet us go back and try and urge him to flight. He
can escape easily while all these fellows are drunk. He shall
have my best horse for the purpose.
We returned to the apartment.
Slim Sampson.
Kurnel! was the calm reply.
There's no sense in your staying here to be shot.
Ugh! was the only answer, but in an assenting tone.
You're not a bad fellowyou didn't mean to kill Loblolly
Jackit's very hard that you should die for what you didn't wish
to do. You're too young to die. You've got a great many years
to live. You ought to live to be an old man and have sons like
yourself; and there's a great deal of happiness in this world, if
a man only knows where to look for it. But a man that's dead
is of no use to himself, or to his friends, or his enemies. Why
should you diewhy should you be shot?
Eh?
Hear me; your people are all drunk at Ligon'sblind drunk
deaf drunkthey can neither see nor hear. They won't get
sober till morningperhaps not then. You've been across the
Mississippi, hav'nt you? You know the way?
The reply was affirmative.
Many Choctaws live over the Mississippi nowon the Red
River, and far beyond, to the Red Hills. Go to themthey will
take you by the handthey will give you one of their daughters
to wifethey will love youthey will make you a chief. Fly,
Sampson, fly to themyou shall have one of my horses, and
before
daylight you will be down the country, among the white
people
,
and far from your enemiesGo, my good fellow, it would be
a great pity that so brave a man should die.
This was the substance of my friend's exhortation. It was put
into every shape, and addressed to every fear, hope, or passion
which might possibly have influence over the human bosom. A
strong conflict took place in the mind of the Indian, the outward
signs of which were not wholly suppressible. He started to his
feet, trod the floor hurriedly, and there was a tremulous quickness
in the movement of his eyes, and a dilation of their orbs, which
amply denoted the extent of his emotion. He turned suddenly
upon us, when H. had finished speaking, and replied in language
very nearly like the following.
I love the whitesI was always a friend to the whites. I
believe I love their laws better than my own. Loblolly Jack
laughed at me because I loved the whites, and wanted our people
to live like them. But I am of no use now. I can love them no
more. My people say that I must die. How can I live?
Such was the purport of his answer. The meaning of it was
simple. He was not unwilling to avail himself of the suggestions
of my friendto flyto livebut he could not divest himself of
that habitual deference to those laws to which he had given
implicit
reverence from the beginning. Custom is the superior
tyrant
of all savage nations.
To embolden him on this subject, was now the joint object of
Col. H. and myself. We spared no argument to convince him
that he ought to fly. It was something in favour of our object, that
the Indian regards the white man as so infinitely his superior;
and, in the case of Slim Sampson, we were assisted by his own
inclinations in favour of those customs of the whites, which he had
already in part begun to adopt. We discussed for his benefit
that which may be considered one of the leading elements in
civilizationthe duty of saving and keeping life as long as we
caninsisted upon the morality of flying from any punishment
which would deprive us of it; and at length had the satisfaction
of seeing him convinced. He yielded to our arguments and
solicitations
,
accepted the horse, which he promised voluntarily to find
some early means to return, and, with a sighperhaps one of the
first proofs of that change of feeling and of principle which he
had just shown, he declared his intention to take the road
instantly
.
Go to bed, Kurnel. Your horse will come back. We
retired
,
and a few moments after heard him leave the house. I
am sure that both of us felt a degree of light-heartedness which
scarcely any other event could have produced. We could not
sleep, however. For myself I answerit was almost dawn
before
I fell into an uncertain slumber, filled with visions of scuffling
Indiansthe stark corse of Loblolly Jack, being the conspicuous
object, and Slim Sampson standing up for execution.
CHAPTER IV.
Neither
Col. H. nor myself arose at a very early hour. Our
first thoughts and feelings at waking were those of exultation.
We rejoiced that we had been instrumental in saving from an
ignominious
death, a fellow creature, and one who seemed so worthy,
in so many respects. Our exultation was not a little increased,
as we reflected on the disappointment of his enemies; and we
enjoyed a hearty laugh together, as we talked over the matter
while putting on our clothes. When we looked from the window
the area in front of the house was covered with Indians. They
sat, or stood, or walked, all around the dwelling. The hour
appointed
for the delivery of Slim Sampson had passed, yet they
betrayed no emotion. We fancied, however, that we could
discern
in the countenances of most among them, the sentiment of
friendship or hostility for the criminal, by which they were
severally
governed. A dark, fiery look of exultationa grim
anticipation
of delightwas evident in the faces of his enemies;
while, among his friends, men and women, a subdued concern and
humbling sadness, were the prevailing traits of expression.
But when we went below to meet themwhen it became
known that the murderer had fled, taking with him the best horse
of the proprietor, the outbreak was tremendous. A terrible yell
went up from the party devoted to Loblolly Jack; while the
friends and relatives of Slim Sampson at once sprang to their
weapons, and put themselves in an attitude of defence. We had
not foreseen the effects of our interposition and advice. We did
not know, or recollect, that the nearest connection of the criminal,
among the Indian tribes, in the event of his escape, would be
required
to suffer in his place; and this, by the way, is the grand
source of that security which they felt the night before, that flight
would not be attempted by the destined victim. The aspect of
affairs looked squally. Already was the bow bent and the
tomahawk
lifted. Already had the parties separated, each going to
his own side, and ranging himself in front of some one opponent.
The women sunk rapidly into the rear, and provided themselves
with billets or fence-rails, as they occurred to their hands; while
little brats of boys, ten and twelve years old, kept up a continual
shrill clamour, brandishing aloft their tiny bows and
blow-guns,
which were only powerful against the lapwing and the sparrow.
In political phrase, a great crisis was at hand. The stealthier
chiefs and leaders of both sides, had sunk from sight, behind the
trees or houses, in order to avail themselves of all the arts of
Indian
strategy. Every thing promised a sudden and stern conflict.
At the first show of commotion, Col. H. had armed himself. I
had been well provided with pistols and bowie knife, before
leaving
home; and, apprehending the worst, we yet took our places
as peace-makers, between the contending parties.
It is highly probable that all our interposition would have been
fruitless to prevent their collision; and, though our position
certainly
delayed the progress of the quarrel, yet all we could have
hoped to effect by our interference would have been the removal
of the combatants to a more remote battle ground. But a
circumstance
that surprised and disappointed us all, took place, to settle
the strife forever, and to reconcile the parties without any resort to
blows. While the turmoil was at the highest, and we had
despaired
of doing any thing to prevent bloodshed, the tramp of a
fast galloping horse was heard in the woods, and the next moment
the steed of Col. H. made his appearance, covered with foam,
Slim Sampson on his back, and still driven by the lash of his rider
at the top of his speed. He leaped the enclosure, and was drawn
up still quivering in every limb, in the area between the opposing
Indians. The countenance of the noble fellow told his story. His
heart had smitten him by continual reproaches, at the adoption of
a conduct unknown in his nation; and which all its
hereditary
opinions had made cowardly and infamous. Besides, he
remembered the penalties which, in consequence of his flight, must
fall heavily upon his people. Life was sweet to himvery sweet!
He had the promise of many bright years before him. His mind
was full of honourable andspeaking in comparative phrase
lofty purposes, for the improvement of himself and nation. We
have already sought to show that, by his conduct, he had taken
one large step in resistance to the tyrannous usages of custom, in
order to introduce the elements of civilization among his people.
But he could not withstand the reproaches of a conscience formed
upon principles which his own genius was not equal to overthrow.
His thoughts, during his flight, must have been of a very humbling
character; but his features now denoted only pride, exultation
and a spirit strengthened by resignation against the worst. By
his flight and subsequent return, he had, in fact, exhibited a more
lively spectacle of moral firmness, than would have been
displayed
by his simple submission in remaining. He seemed to feel
this. It looked out from his soul in every movement of his body.
He leaped from his horse, exclaiming, while he slapped his breast
with his open palm:
Oakatibb heard the voice of a chief, that said he must die.
Let the chief look hereOakatibb is come!
A shout went up from both parties. The signs of strife
disappeared
.
The language of the crowd was no longer that of
threatening
and violence. It was understood that there would be no
resistance
in behalf of the condemned. Col. H. and myself, were
both mortified and disappointed. Though the return of Slim
Sampson, had obviously prevented a combat
outrance,
in which
a dozen or more might have been slain, still we could not but
regret
the event. The life of such a fellow seemed to both of us, to
be worth the lives of any hundred of his people.
Never did man carry with himself more simple nobleness. He
was at once surrounded by his friends and relatives. The hostile
party, from whom the executioners were to be drawn, stood
looking
on at some little distance, the very pictures of patience. There
was no sort of disposition manifested among them, to hurry the
proceedings. Though exulting in the prospect of soon shedding
the blood of one whom they esteemed an enemy, yet all was
dignified
composure and forbearance. The signs of exultation were
no where to be seen. Meanwhile, a conversation was carried on
in low, soft accents, unmarked by physical action of any kind,
between the condemned and two other Indians. One of these was
the unhappy mother of the criminalthe other was his uncle.
They rather listened to his remarks, than made any of their own.
The dialogue was conducted in their own language. After a
while this ceased, and he made a signal which seemed to be felt,
rather than understood, by all the Indians, friends and enemies.
All of them started into instant intelligence. It was a sign that he
was ready for the final proceedings. He rose to his feet and they
surrounded him. The groans of the old woman, his mother, were
now distinctly audible, and she was led away by the uncle, who,
placing her among the other women, returned to the condemned,
beside whom he now took his place. Col. H. and myself, also
drew nigh. Seeing us, Oakatibb simply said, with a smile:
Ah, kurnel, you see, Injun man ain't strong like white man!
Col. H. answered with emotion.
I would have saved you, Sampson.
Oakatibb hab for dead! said the worthy fellow, with
another
,
but a very wretched smile.
His firmness was unabated. A procession was formed, which
was headed by three sturdy fellows, carrying their rifles
conspicuously
upon their shoulders. These were the appointed
executioners
,
and were all near relatives of the man who had been slain.
There was no mercy in their looks. Oakatibb followed
immediately
after these. He seemed pleased that we should
accompany
him to the place of execution. Our way lay through a long
avenue of stunted pines, which conducted us to a spot where an
elevated ridge on either hand produced a broad and very prettily
defined valley. My eyes, in all this progress, were scarcely ever
drawn off from the person of him who was to be the principal actor
in the approaching scene. Never, on any occasion, did I behold
a man with a step more firma head so unbenta countenance
so sweetly calm, though graveand of such quiet unconcern, at
the obvious fate in view. Yet there was nothing in his
deportment
of that effort which would be the case with most white men
on a similar occasion, who seek to wear the aspect of heroism.
He walked as to a victory, but he walked with a staid, even dignity,
calmly, and without the flush of any excitement on his cheek.
In his eye there was none of that feverish curiosity, which seeks
for the presence of his executioner, and cannot be averted from
the contemplation of the mournful paraphernalia of death. His
look was like that of the strong man, conscious of his inevitable
doom, and prepared, as it is inevitable, to meet it with
corresponding
indifference.
The grave was now before us. It must have been prepared at
the first dawn of the morning. The executioners paused, when
they had reached a spot within thirty steps of it. But the
condemned
passed on, and stopped only on the edge of its open jaws.
The last trial was at hand with all its terrors. The curtain was
about to drop, and the scene of life, with all its hopes and
promises
and golden joyseven to an Indian goldenwas to be shut
forever. I felt a painful and numbing chill pass through my
frame, but I could behold no sign of change in him. He now
beckoned his friends around him. His enemies drew nigh also,
but in a remoter circle. He was about to commence his song of
deaththe narrative of his performances, his purposes, all his
living experience. He began a low chant, slow, measured and
composed, the words seeming to consist of monosyllables only.
As he proceeded, his eyes kindled, and his arms were extended.
His action became impassioned, his utterance more rapid, and the
tones were distinguished by increasing warmth. I could not
understand
a single word which he uttered, but the cadences were
true and full of significance. The rise and fall of his voice,
truly
proportioned to the links of sound by which they were
connected
,
would have yielded a fine lesson to the European teacher
of school eloquence. His action was as graceful as that of a
mighty tree yielding to and gradually rising from the pressure
of a sudden gust. I felt the eloquence which I could not
understand
.
I fancied, from his tones and gestures, the play of the
muscles of his mouth, and the dilation of his eyes, that I could
detect the instances of daring valour, or good conduct, which his
narrative comprised. One portion of it, as he approached the
close, I certainly could not fail to comprehend. He evidently
spoke of his last unhappy affray with the man whom he had
slain. His head was bowedthe light passed from his eyes, his
hands were folded upon his heart, and his voice grew thick and
husky. Then came the narrative of his flight. His glance was
turned upon Col. H. and myself, and, at the close, he extended his
hand to us both. We grasped it earnestly, and with a degree of
emotion which I would not now seek to describe. He paused.
The catastrophe was at hand. I saw him step back, so as to
place himself at the very verge of the gravehe then threw open
his breasta broad, manly, muscular bosom, that would have
sufficed for a Herculesone hand he struck upon the spot above
the heart, where it remainedthe other was raised above his
head. This was the signal. I turned away with a strange
sickness
.
I could look no longer. In the next instant I heard the
simultaneous report, as one, of the three rifles, and when I again
looked, they were shoveling in the fresh mould, upon the noble
form of one, who, under other more favouring circumstances,
might have been a father to his nation.
PART I. 15
JOCASSE.
A CHEROKEE LEGEND.
CHAPTER I.
Keowee
Old Fort, as the people in that quarter style it, is a
fine antique ruin and relic of the revolution, in the district of
Pendleton, South Carolina. The region of country in which we
find it is, of itself, highly picturesque and interesting. The
broad river of Keowee, which runs through it, though
comparatively
small as a stream in America, would put to shame, by its
size not less than its beauty, one half of the far-famed and
boasted rivers of Europe;and then the mountains, through and
among which it winds its way, embody more of beautiful
situation
and romantic prospect, than art can well figure to the eye,
or language convey to the imagination. To understand, you
must see it. Words are of little avail when the ideas overcrowd
utterance; and even vanity itself is content to be dumb in the
awe inspired by a thousand prospects, like Niagara, the ideals of
a god, and altogether beyond the standards common to humanity.
It is not long since I wandered through this interesting region,
under the guidance of my friend, Col. G, who does the
honours
of society, in that quarter, with a degree of ease and
unostentatious
simplicity, which readily makes the visiter at home.
My friend was one of those citizens to whom one's own country
is always of paramount interest, and whose mind and memory,
accordingly, have been always most happily employed when
storing away and digesting into pleasing narrative those thousand
little traditions of the local genius, which give life to rocks and
valleys, and people earth with the beautiful colours and creatures
of the imagination. These, for the gratification of the spiritual
seeker, he had forever in readiness; and, with him to illustrate
them, it is not surprising if the grove had a moral existence in
my thoughts, and all the waters around breathed and were
instinct
with poetry. To all his narratives I listened with a
satisfaction
which book-stories do not often afford me. The more he
told, the more he had to tell; for nothing staled
His infinite variety.
There may have been something in the style of telling his
stories
;
there was much, certainly, that was highly attractive in
his manner of doing every thing, and this may have contributed
not a little to the success of his narratives. Perhaps, too, my
presence, upon the very scene of each legend, may have given
them a life and a
vraisemblance
they had wanted otherwise.
In this manner, rambling about from spot to spot, I passed five
weeks, without being, at any moment, conscious of time's
progress
.
Day after day, we wandered forth in some new direction,
contriving always to secure, and without effort, that pleasurable
excitement of novelty, for which the great city labours in vain,
spite of her varying fashions, and crowding, and not always
innocent
indulgences. From forest to river, from hill to valley, still
on horseback,for the mountainous character of the country
forbade
any more luxurious form of travel,we kept on our way,
always changing our ground with the night, and our prospect
with the morning. In this manner we travelled over or round
the Six Mile, and the Glassy, and a dozen other mountains; and
sometimes, with a yet greater scope of adventure, pushed off on
a much longer ramble,such as took us to the falls of the White
Water, and gave us a glimpse of the beautiful river of Jocasse,
named sweetly after the Cherokee maiden, who threw herself
into its bosom on beholding the scalp of her lover dangling from
the neck of his conqueror. The story is almost a parallel to that
of the sister of Horatius, with this difference, that the Cherokee
girl did not wait for the vengeance of her brother, and altogether
spared her reproaches. I tell the story, which is pleasant and
curious, in the language of my friend, from whom I first heard it.
The Occonies and the Little Estatoees, or, rather, the Brown
Vipers and the Green Birds, were both minor tribes of the
Cherokee
nation, between whom, as was not unfrequently the case,
there sprung up a deadly enmity. The Estatoees had their town
on each side of the two creeks, which, to this day, keep their
name, and on the eastern side of the Keowee river. The
Occonies
occupied a much larger extent of territory, but it lay on the
opposite, or west side of the same stream. Their differences were
supposed to have arisen from the defeat of Chatuga, a favourite
leader of the Occonies, who aimed to be made a chief of the
nation
at large. The Estatoee warrior, Toxaway, was successful;
and as the influence of Chatuga was considerable with his tribe,
he laboured successfully to engender in their bosoms a bitter
dislike
of the Estatoees. This feeling was made to exhibit itself on
every possible occasion. The Occonies had no word too foul by
which to describe the Estatoees. They likened them, in familiar
speech, to every thing which, in the Indian imagination, is
accounted
low and contemptible. In reference to war, they were
reputed women,in all other respects, they were compared to
dogs and vermin; and, with something of a Christian taste and
temper, they did not scruple, now and then, to invoke the devil
of their more barbarous creed, for the eternal disquiet of their
successful neighbours, the Little Estatoees, and their great chief,
Toxaway.
In this condition of things there could not be much harmony;
and, accordingly, as if by mutual consent, there was but little
intercourse between the two people. When they met, it was
either to regard one another with a cold, repulsive distance, or
else, as enemies, actively to foment quarrel and engage in strife.
But seldom, save on national concerns, did the Estatoees cross the
Keowee to the side held by the Occonies; and the latter, more
numerous, and therefore less reluctant for strife than their rivals,
were yet not often found on the opposite bank of the same river.
Sometimes, however, small parties of hunters from both tribes,
rambling in one direction or another, would pass into the enemy's
territory; but this was not frequent, and when they met, quarrel
and bloodshed were sure to mark the adventure.
But there was one young warrior of the Estatoees, who did
not give much heed to this condition of parties, and who, moved
by an errant spirit, and wholly insensible to fear, would not
hesitate
,
when the humour seized him, to cross the river, making
quite as free, when he did so, with the hunting-grounds of the
Occonies as they did themselves. This sort of conduct did not
please the latter very greatly, but Nagoochie was always so gentle,
and at the same time so brave, that the young warriors of Occony
either liked or feared him too much to throw themselves often in
his path, or labour, at any time, to arrest his progress.
In one of these excursions, Nagoochie made the acquaintance
of Jocasse, one of the sweetest of the dusky daughters of
Occony. He was rambling, with bow and quiver, in pursuit of
game, as was his custom, along that beautiful enclosure which
the whites have named after her, the Jocasse valley. The
circumstances
under which they met were all strange and exciting,
and well calculated to give her a power over the young hunter,
to which the pride of the Indian does not often suffer him to
submit. It was towards evening when Nagoochie sprung a fine
buck from a hollow of the wood beside him, and just before
you reach the ridge of rocks which hem in and form this
beautiful
valley. With the first glimpse of his prey flew the keen
shaft of Nagoochie; but, strange to say, though renowned as a
hunter, not less than as a warrior, the arrow failed entirely and flew
wide of the victim. Off he bounded headlong after the fortunate
buck; but though, every now and then getting him within range,
for the buck took the pursuit coolly,the hunter still most
unaccountably
failed to strike him. Shaft after shaft had fallen
seemingly hurtless from his sides; and though, at frequent
intervals
,
suffered to approach so nigh to the animal that he could not but
hope still for better fortune, to his great surprise, the wary buck
would dash off when he least expected it, bounding away in some
new direction, with as much life and vigour as ever. What to
think of this, the hunter knew not; but such repeated
disappointments
at length impressed it strongly upon his mind, that the
object he pursued was neither more nor less than an Occony
wizard, seeking to entrap him; so, with a due feeling of
superstition
,
and a small touch of sectional venom aroused into action
within his heart, Nagoochie, after the manner of his people,
promised a green birdthe emblem of his tribein sacrifice to
the tutelar divinity of Estato, if he could only be permitted to
overcome the potent enchanter, who had thus dazzled his aim and
blunted his arrows. He had hardly uttered this vow, when he
beheld the insolent deer mincingly grazing upon a beautiful tuft
of long grass in the valley, just below the ledge of rock upon
which he stood. Without more ado, he pressed onward to bring
him within fair range of his arrows, little doubting at the
moment
that the Good Spirit had heard his prayer, and had granted
his desire. But, in his hurry, leaping too hastily forward, and
with eyes fixed only upon his proposed victim, his foot was caught
by the smallest stump in the world, and the very next moment
found him precipitated directly over the rock and into the valley,
within a few paces of the deer, who made off with the utmost
composure, gazing back, as he did so, in the eyes of the wounded
hunter, for all the world, as if he enjoyed the sport mightily.
Nagoochie, as he saw this, gravely concluded that he had fallen
a victim to the wiles of the Occony wizard, and looked confidently
to see half a score of Occonies upon him, taking him at a
vantage
.
Like a brave warrior, however, he did not despond, but
determining to gather up his loins for battle and the torture, he
sought to rise and put himself in a state of preparation. What,
however, was his horror, to find himself utterly unable to move;
his leg had been broken in the fall, and he was covered with
bruises from head to foot.
Nagoochie gave himself up for lost; but he had scarcely
done so, when he heard a voice,the sweetest, he thought, he had
ever heard in his life,singing a wild, pleasant song, such as the
Occonies love, which, ingeniously enough, summed up the sundry
reasons why the mouth, and not the eyes, had been endowed with
the faculty of eating. These reasons were many, but the last
is quite enough for us. According to the song, had the eyes,
and not the mouth, been employed for this purpose, there would
soon be a famine in the land, for of all gluttons, the eyes are the
greatest. Nagoochie groaned aloud as he heard the song, the
latter portion of which completely indicated the cause of his
present misfortune. It was, indeed, the gluttony of the eyes which
had broken his leg. This sort of allegory the Indians are fond
of, and Jocasse knew all their legends. Certainly, thought
Nagoochie, though his leg pained him wofully at the time, `
certainly
I never heard such sweet music, and such a voice.' The
singer advanced as she sung, and almost stumbled over him.
`Who are you?' she asked timidly, neither retreating nor
advancing; and, as the wounded man looked into her face, he
blessed the Occony wizard, by whose management he deemed
his leg to have been broken.
`Look!' was the reply of the young warrior, throwing
aside the bearskin which covered his bosom,`look, girl of
Occony
!
'tis the
totem
of a chief;' and the green bird stamped
upon his left breast, as the badge of his tribe, showed him a
warrior of Estato, and something of an enemy. But his eyes
had no enmity, and then the broken leg! Jocasse was a gentle
maiden, and her heart melted with the condition of the warrior.
She made him a sweet promise, in very pretty language, and with
the very same voice the music of which was so delicious; and
then, with the fleetness of a young doe, she went off to bring him
succour.
CHAPTER II.
Night,
in the meanwhile, came on; and the long howl of
the wolf, as he looked down from the crag, and waited for the
thick darkness in which to descend the valley, came freezingly
to the ear of Nagoochie. `Surely,' he said to himself, `the girl
of Occony will come back. She has too sweet a voice not to
keep her word. She will certainly come back.' While he
doubted, he believed. Indeed, though still a very young maiden,
the eyes of Jocasse had in them a great deal that was good for
little beside, than to persuade and force conviction; and the
belief
in them was pretty extensive in the circle of her rustic
acquaintance
.
All people love to believe in fine eyes, and nothing
is more natural than for lovers to swear by them. Nagoochie did
not swear by those of Jocasse, but he did most religiously
believe
in them; and though the night gathered fast, and the long
howl of the wolf came close from his crag, down into the valley,
the young hunter of the green bird did not despair of the return
of the maiden.
She did return, and the warrior was insensible. But the
motion stirred him; the lights gleamed upon him from many
torches; he opened his eyes, and when they rested upon Jocasse,
they forgot to close again. She had brought aid enough, for her
voice was powerful as well as musical; and, taking due care
that the totem of the green bird should be carefully concealed by
the bearskin, with which her own hands covered his bosom, she
had him lifted upon a litter, constructed of several young
saplings
,
which, interlaced with withes, binding it closely together,
and strewn thickly with leaves, made a couch as soft as the
wounded man could desire. In a few hours, and the form of
Nagoochie rested beneath the roof of Attakulla, the sire of
Jocass
e.
She sat beside the young hunter, and it was her hand
that placed the fever balm upon his lips, and poured into his
wounds and bruises the strong and efficacious balsams of Indian
pharmacy.
Never was nurse more careful of her charge. Day and
night she watched by him, and few were the hours which she
then required for her own pleasure or repose. Yet why was
Jocass
e
so devoted to the stranger? She never asked herself so
unnecessary a question; but as she was never so well satisfied,
seemingly, as when near him, the probability is she found
pleasure
in her tendance. It was fortunate for him and for her, that
her father was not rancorous towards the people of the Green
Bird, like the rest of the Occonies. It might have fared hard
with Nagoochie otherwise. But Attakulla was a wise old man,
and a good; and when they brought the wounded stranger to his
lodge, he freely yielded him shelter, and went forth himself to
Chinabee, the wise medicine of the Occonies. The eyes of
Nagoochie
were turned upon the old chief, and when he heard his
name, and began to consider where he was, he was unwilling to
task the hospitality of one who might be disposed to regard him,
when known, in an unfavourable or hostile light. Throwing
aside, therefore, the habit of circumspection, which usually
distinguishes
the Indian warrior, he uncovered his bosom, and bade
the old man look upon the totem of his people, precisely as he had
done when his eye first met that of Jocasse.
`Thy name? What do the people of the Green Bird call
the young hunter?' asked Attakulla.
`They name Nagoochie among the braves of the Estato:
they will call him a chief of the Cherokee, like Toxaway,' was
the proud reply.
This reference was to a sore subject with the Occonies, and
perhaps it was quite as imprudent as it certainly was in improper
taste for him to make it. But, knowing where he was, excited by
fever, and havingto say much in littlebut an unfavourable
opinion of Occony magnanimity, he was more rash than
reasonable
.
At that moment, too, Jocasse had made her appearance,
and the spirit of the young warrior, desiring to look big in her
eyes, had prompted him to a fierce speech not altogether
necessary
.
He knew not the generous nature of Attakulla; and when
the old man took him by the hand, spoke well of the Green Bird,
and called him his `son,' the pride of Nagoochie was something
humbled, while his heart grew gentler than ever. His `son!'
that was the pleasant part; and as the thoughts grew more and
more active in his fevered brain, he looked to Jocasse with such
a passionate admiration that she sunk back with a happy smile
from the flame-glance which he set upon her. And, day after
day she tended him until the fever passed off, and the broken
limb was set and had reknitted, and the bruises were all healed
upon him. Yet he lingered. He did not think himself quite
well, and she always agreed with him in opinion. Once and
again did he set off, determined not to return, but his limb pained
him, and he felt the fever come back whenever he thought of
Jocasse; and so the evening found him again at the lodge, while
the fever-balm, carefully bruised in milk, was in as great demand
as ever for the invalid. But the spirit of the warrior at length
grew ashamed of these weaknesses; and, with a desperate effort,
for which he gave himself no little credit, he completed his
determination
to depart with the coming of the new moon. But even
this decision was only effected by compromise. Love settled the
affair with conscience, after his own fashion; and, under his
direction
,
following the dusky maiden into the little grove that stood
beside the cottage, Nagoochie claimed her to fill the lodge of a
young warrior of the Green Bird. She broke the wand which
he presented her, and seizing upon the torch which she carried,
he buried it in the bosom of a neighbouring brook; and thus, after
their simple forest ceremonial, Jocasse became the betrothed of
Nagoochie.
CHAPTER III.
But
we must keep this secret to ourselves, for as yet it
remained
unknown to Attakulla, and the time could not come for
its revealment until the young warrior had gone home to his
people
.
Jocasse was not so sure that all parties would be so ready
as herself to sanction her proceeding. Of her father's willingness,
she had no question, for she knew his good nature and good sense;
but she had a brother of whom she had many fears and misgivings.
He was away, on a great hunt of the young men, up at
Charashilactay
,
or the falls of the White Water, as we call it to this
daya beautiful cascade of nearly forty feet, the water of which
is of a milky complexion. How she longed, yet how she dreaded,
to see that brother! He was a fierce, impetuous, sanguinary
youth, who, to these characteristics, added another still more
distasteful
to Jocasse;there was not a man among all the
Occonies
who so hated the people of the Green Bird as Cheochee.
What hopes, or rather what fears, were in the bosom of that
maiden!
But he came not. Day after day they looked for his return,
and yet he came not; but in his place a runner, with a bearded
stick, a stick covered with slips of skin, torn from the body of a
wolf. The runner passed by the lodge of Attakulla, and all its
inmates were aroused by the intelligence he brought. A
wolf-hunt
was commanded by Moitoy, the great war-chief or
generalissimo
of the Cherokee nation, to take place, instantly, at
Charashilactay
,
where an immense body of wolves had herded together,
and had become troublesome neighbours. Old and young, who
had either taste for the adventure, or curiosity to behold it, at
once set off upon the summons; and Attakulla, old as he was,
and Nagoochie, whose own great prowess in hunting had made it
a passion, determined readily upon the journey. Jocasse, too,
joined the company,for the maidens of Cherokee were bold
spirits, as well as beautiful, and loved to ramble, particularly
when, as in the present instance, they went forth in company with
their lovers. Lodge after lodge, as they pursued their way,
poured forth its inmates, who joined them in their progress, until
the company had swollen into a goodly caravan, full of life,
anxious for sport, and carrying, as is the fashion among the
Indians
,
provisions of smoked vension and parched grain, in plenty,
for many days.
They came at length to the swelling hills, the long narrow
valleys of the Keochee and its tribute river of Toxaway, named
after that great chief of the Little Estatoees, of whom we have
already heard something. At one and the same moment they
beheld the white waters of Charashilactay, plunging over the
precipice, and the hundred lodges of the Cherokee hunters. There
they had gatheredthe warriors and their womentwenty
different
tribes of the same great nation being represented on the
ground; each tribe having its own cluster of cabins, and rising
up, in the midst of each, the long pole on which hung the peculiar
emblem of the clan. It was not long before Nagoochie
marshalled
himself along with his brother Estatoeeswho had counted
him lostunder the beautiful green bird of his tribe, which
waved about in the wind, over the heads of their small
community
.
The number of warriors representing the Estato in that great
hunt was inconsiderablebut fourteenand the accession,
therefore
,
of so promising a brave as Nagoochie, was no small matter.
They shouted with joy at his coming, and danced gladly in the
ring between the lodgesthe young women in proper taste, and
with due spirit, hailing, with a sweet song, the return of so
handsome
a youth, and one who was yet unmarried.
Over against the lodges of the Estatoees, lay the more
imposing
encampment of the rival Occonies, who turned out strongly,
as it happened, on this occasion. They were more numerous
than any other of the assembled tribes, as the hunt was to take
place on a portion of their own territory. Conscious of their
superiority
,
they had not, you may be sure, forborne any of the
thousand sneers and sarcasms which they were never at a loss to
find when they spoke of the Green Bird warriors; and of all their
clan, none was so bitter, so uncompromising, generally, in look,
speech, and action, as Cheochee, the fierce brother of the
beautiful
Jocasse. Scorn was in his eye, and sarcasm on his lips, when
he heard the rejoicings made by the Estatoees on the return of
the long-lost hunter.
`Now wherefore screams the painted bird to-day? why
makes he a loud cry in the ears of the brown viper that can strike?'
he exclaimed contemptuously yet fiercely.
It was Jocasse that spoke in reply to her brother, with the
quickness of woman's feeling, which they wrong greatly who hold
it subservient to the strength of woman's cunning. In her reply,
Cheochee saw the weakness of her heart.
`They scream for Nagoochie,' said the girl; `it is joy that
the young hunter comes back that makes the green bird to sing
to-day.'
`Has Jocasse taken a tongue from the green bird, that she
screams in the ears of the brown viper? What has the girl to do
with the thoughts of the warrior? Let her gogo, bring drink to
Cheochee.'
Abashed and silent, she did as he commanded, and brought
meekly to the fierce brother, a gourd filled with the bitter beverage
which the Cherokees love. She had nothing further to say on the
subject of the Green Bird warrior, for whom she had already so
unwarily spoken. But her words had not fallen unregarded
upon the ears of Cheochee, nor had the look of the fond heart
which spoke out in her glance, passed unseen by the keen eye of
that jealous brother. He had long before this heard of the great
fame of Nagoochie as a hunter, and in his ire he was bent to
surpass
him. Envy had grown into hate, when he heard that this
great reputation was that of one of the accursed Estatoees; and,
not satisfied with the desire to emulate, he also aimed to destroy.
This feeling worked like so much gall in his bosom; and when
his eyes looked upon the fine form of Nagoochie, and beheld its
symmetry, grace, and manhood, his desire grew into a furious
passion which made him sleepless. The old chief, Attakulla, his
father, told him all the story of Nagoochie's accidenthow
Jocass
e
had found him; and how, in his own lodge, he had been
nursed and tended. The old man spoke approvingly of
Nagoochie
;
and, the better to bring about a good feeling for her lover,
Jocasse humbled herself greatly to her brother,anticipated his
desires, and studiously sought to serve him. But all this failed to
effect a favourable emotion in the breast of the malignant young
savage towards the young hunter of the Green Bird. He said
nothing, however, of his feelings; but they looked out and were
alive to the sight, in every aspect, whenever any reference,
however
small, was made to the subject of his ire. The Indian
passion
is subtlety, and Cheochee was a warrior already famous
among the old chiefs of Cherokee.
CHAPTER IV.
The
next day came the commencement of the great hunt, and
the warriors were up betimes and active. Stations were chosen,
the keepers of which, converging to a centre, were to hem in the
wild animal on whose tracks they were going. The wolves were
known to be in a hollow of the hills, near Charashilactay, which
had but one outlet; and points of close approximation across
this outlet were the stations of honour; for, goaded by the hunters
to this passage, and failing of egress in any other, the wolf, it was
well known, would be then dangerous in the extreme. Well
calculated
to provoke into greater activity the jealousies between the
Occonies and the Green Birds, was the assignment made by
Moitoy
,
the chief, of the more dangerous of these stations to these two
clans. They now stood alongside of one another, and the action
of the two promised to be joint and corresponsive. Such an
appointment
,
in the close encounter with the wolf, necessarily
promised
to bring the two parties into immediate contact; and such
was the event. As the day advanced, and the hunters,
contracting
their circles, brought the different bands of wolves into one,
and pressed upon them to the more obvious and indeed the only
outlet, the badges of the Green Bird and the Brown Viperthe
one consisting of the stuffed skin and plumage of the Carolina
parrot
,
and the other the attenuated viper, filled out with moss, and
winding, with erect head, around the pole, to the top of which it
was stuckwere, at one moment, in the indiscriminate hunt,
almost
mingled over the heads of the two parties. Such a sight was
pleasant to neither, and would, at another time, of a certainty, have
brought about a squabble. As it was, the Occonies drove their
badge-carrier from one to the other end of their ranks, thus
studiously
avoiding the chance of another collision between the viper
so adored, and the green bird so detested. The pride of the
Estatoees
was exceedingly aroused at this exhibition of impertinence,
and though a quiet people enough, they began to think that
forbearance
had been misplaced in their relations with their
presuming
and hostile neighbours. Had it not been for Nagoochie, who
had his own reasons for suffering yet more, the Green Birds would
certainly have plucked out the eyes of the Brown Vipers, or tried
very hard to do it; but the exhortations to peace of the young
warrior, and the near neighbourhood of the wolf, quelled any open
show of the violence they meditated; but, Indian-like, they
determined
to wait for the moment of greatest quiet, as that most fitted
for taking away a few scalps from the Occony. With a
muttered
curse, and a contemptuous slap of the hand upon their thighs,
the more furious among the Estatoees satisfied their present anger,
and then addressed themselves more directly to the business before
them.
The wolves, goaded to desperation by the sight and sound of
hunters strewn all over the hills around them, were now, snapping
and snarling, and with eyes that flashed with a terrible anger,
descending
the narrow gully towards the outlet held by the two
rival
tribes. United action was therefore demanded of those who,
for a long time past, had been conscious of no feeling or
movement
in common. But here they had no choiceno time, indeed,
to think. The fierce wolves were upon them, doubly furious at
finding the only passage stuck full of enemies. Well and
manfully
did the hunters stand and seek the encounter with the
infuriated
beasts. The knife and the hatchet, that day, in the hand
of Occony and Estato, did fearful execution. The Brown
Vipers
fought nobly, and with their ancient reputation. But the
Green Birds were the hunters, after all; and they were now
stimulated into double adventure and effort, by an honourable
ambition to make up for all deficiencies of number by extra valour,
and the careful exercise of all that skill in the arts of hunting for
which they have always been the most renowned of the tribes of
Cherokee. As, one by one, a fearful train, the wolves wound
into sight along this or that crag of the gully, arrow after arrow
told fearfully upon them, for there were no marksmen like the
Estatoees. Nor did they stop at this weapon. The young
Nagoochie
,
more than ever prompted to such audacity, led the way;
and dashing into the very path of the teeth-gnashing and
clawrending
enemy, he grappled in desperate fight the first that
offered
himself, and as the wide jaws of his hairy foe opened upon
him, with a fearful plunge at his side, adroitly leaping to the right,
he thrust a pointed stick down, deep, as far as he could send it,
into the monster's throat, then pressing back upon him, with the
rapidity of an arrow, in spite of all his fearful writhings he
pinned
him to the ground, while his knife, in a moment after, played
fatally in his heart. Another came, and, in a second, his hatchet
cleft and crunched deep into the skull of the angry brute, leaving
him senseless, without need of a second stroke. There was no
rivalling
deeds of valour so desperate as this; and with increased
bitterness of soul did Cheochee and his followers hate in
proportion
as they admired. They saw the day close, and heard the
signal calling them to the presence of the great chief Moitoy,
conscious
,
though superior in numbers, they could not at all compare
in skill and success with the long-despised, but now
thoroughly-hated
Estatoees.
And still more great the vexation, still more deadly the hate,
when the prize was bestowed by the hand of Moitoy, the great
military chief of Cherokeewhen, calling around him the
tribes, and carefully counting the number of their several spoils,
consisting of the skins of the wolves that had been slain, it was
found that of these the greater number, in proportion to their force,
had fallen victims to the superior skill or superior daring of the
people of the Green Bird. And who had been their leader? The
rambling Nagoochiethe young hunter who had broken his leg
among the crags of Occony, and, in the same adventure, no
longer
considered luckless, had won the young heart of the beautiful
Jocasse.
They bore the young and successful warrior into the centre
of the ring, and before the great Moitoy. He stood up in the
presence of the assembled multitude, a brave and fearless, and
fine looking Cherokee. At the signal of the chief, the young
maidens gathered into a group, and sung around him a song of
compliment and approval, which was just as much as to say,
`Ask, and you shall have.' He did ask; and before the people
of the Brown Viper could so far recover from their surprise as to
interfere, or well comprehend the transaction, the bold Nagoochie
had led the then happy Jocasse into the presence of Moitoy and
16
the multitude, and had claimed the girl of Occony to fill the green
lodge of the Estato hunter.
That was the signal for uproar and commotion. The
Occonies
were desperately angered, and the fierce Cheochee, whom
nothing, not even the presence of the great war-chief, could
restrain
,
rushed forward, and dragging the maiden violently from
the hold of Nagoochie, hurled her backward into the ranks of his
people; then, breathing nothing but blood and vengeance, he
confronted him with ready knife and uplifted hatchet, defying the
young hunter in that moment to the fight.
`
E-cha-e-cha, e-herroecha-herro-echa-herro,
' was the
war-whoop
of the Occonies; and it gathered them to a man around
the sanguinary young chief who uttered it. `
Echa-herro,
echa-herro
,
'
he continued, leaping wildly in air with the paroxysm of
rage which had seized him,`the brown viper has a tooth for the
green bird. The Occony is athirsthe would drink blood from
the dog-heart of the Estato.
E-cha-e-cha-herro, Occony
. ' And
again he concluded his fierce speech with that thrilling roll of
sound, which, as the so much dreaded warwhoop, brought a death
feeling to the heart of the early pioneer, and made the mother
clasp closely, in the deep hours of the night, the young and
unconscious
infant to her bosom. But it had no such influence upon
the fearless spirit of Nagoochie. The Estato heard him with
cool composure, but, though evidently unafraid, it was yet equally
evident that he was unwilling to meet the challenger in strife.
Nor was his decision called for on the subject. The great chief
interposed, and all chance of conflict was prevented by his
intervention
.
In that presence they were compelled to keep the
peace, though both the Occonies and Little Estatoees retired to
their several lodges with fever in their veins, and a restless desire
for that collision which Moitoy had denied them. All but
Nagoochie
were vexed at this denial; and all of them wondered
much that a warrior, so brave and daring as he had always
shown himself, should be so backward on such an occasion. It
was true, they knew of his love for the girl of Occony; but they
never dreamed of such a feeling acquiring an influence over the
hunter, of so paralyzing and unmanly a character. Even
Nagoochie
himself, as he listened to some of the speeches uttered
around him, and reflected upon the insolence of Cheocheeeven
he began to wish that the affair might happen again, that he might
take the hissing viper by the neck. And poor Jocassewhat of
her when they took her back to the lodges? She did nothing but
dream all night of Brown Vipers and Green Birds in the thick of
battle.
CHAPTER V.
The
next day came the movement of the hunters, still under
the conduct of Moitoy, from the one to the other side of the upper
branch of the Keowee river, now called the Jocasse, but which,
at that time, went by the name of Sarratay. The various bands
prepared to move with the daylight; and, still near, and still in
sight of one another, the Occonies and Estatoees took up their
line of march with the rest. The long poles of the two, bearing
the green bird of the one, and the brown viper of the other, in
the hands of their respective bearersstout warriors chosen for
this purpose with reference to strength and valourwaved in
parallel courses, though the space between them was made as
great as possible by the common policy of both parties.
Following
the route of the caravan, which had been formed of the
ancient
men, the women and children, to whom had been entrusted
the skins taken in the hunt, the provisions, utensils for cooking,
&c., the great body of hunters were soon in motion for other and
better hunting-grounds, several miles distant, beyond the river.
The Indian warriors have their own mode of doing business,
and do not often travel with the stiff precision which marks
European
civilization. Though having all one point of destination,
each hunter took his own route to gain it, and in this manner
asserted
his independence. This had been the education of the
Indian
boy, and this self-reliance is one source of that spirit and
character which will not suffer him to feel surprise in any
situation
.
Their way, generally, wound along a pleasant valley,
unbroken
for several miles, until you came to Big-knob, a huge
crag which completely divides it, rising formidably up in the
midst, and narrowing the valley on either hand to a fissure,
necessarily
compelling a closer march for all parties than had
heretofore
been pursued. Straggling about as they had been, of
course but little order was perceptible when they came together,
in little groups, where the mountain forced their junction. One
of the Bear tribe found himself alongside a handful of the
Foxes
,
and a chief of the Alligators plunged promiscuously into
the centre of a cluster of the Turkey tribe, whose own chief was
probably doing the proper courtesies among the Alligators. These
little crossings, however, were amusing rather than annoying, and
were, generally, productive of little inconvenience and no strife.
But it so happened that there was one exception to the
accustomed
harmony. The Occonies and Estatoees, like the rest, had
broken up in small parties, and, as might have been foreseen,
when they came individually to where the crag divided the valley
into two, some took the one and some the other hand, and it was
not until one of the paths they had taken opened into a little plain
in which the woods were balda sort of prairiethat a party of
seven Occonies discovered that they had among them two of their
detested rivals, the Little Estatoees. What made the matter
worse, one of these stragglers was the ill-fated warrior who had
been chosen to carry the badge of his tribe; and there, high
above their headsthe heads of the Brown Vipersfloated that
detestable symbol, the green bird itself.
There was no standing that. The Brown Vipers, as if with
a common instinct, were immediately up in arms. They
grappled
the offending stragglers without gloves. They tore the green
bird from the pole, stamped it under foot, smothered it in the mud,
and pulling out the cone-tuft of its head, utterly degraded it in
their own as well as in the estimation of the Estatoees. Not
content
with this, they hung the desecrated emblem about the neck
of the bearer of it, and, spite of all their struggles, binding the
arms of the two stragglers behind their backs, the relentless
Vipers
thrust the long pole which had borne the bird, in such a
manner between their alternate arms as effectually to fasten them
together. In this manner, amidst taunts, blows and revilings,
they were left in the valley to get on as they might, while their
enemies, insolent enough with exultation, proceeded to join the
rest of their party.
CHAPTER VI.
An
hundred canoes were ready on the banks of the river
Sarratay, for the conveyance to the opposite shore of the
assembled
Cherokees. And down they came, warrior after warrior,
tribe after tribe, emblem after emblem, descending from the crags
around, in various order, and hurrying all with shouts, and whoops
and songs, grotesquely leaping to the river's bank, like so many
boys just let out of school. Hilarity is, indeed, the life of nature!
Civilization refines the one at the expense of the other, and then
it is that no human luxury or sport, as known in society,
stimulates
appetite for any length of time. We can only laugh in the
woodssociety suffers but a smile, and desperate sanctity, with
the countenance of a crow, frowns even at that.
But, down, around, and gathering from every side, they came
the tens and the twenties of the several tribes of Cherokee.
Grouped along the banks of the river, were the boats assigned to
each. Some, already filled, were sporting in every direction over
the clear bosom of that beautiful water. Moitoy himself, at the
head of the tribe of Nequasse, from which he came, had already
embarked; while the venerable Attakulla, with Jocasse, the
gentle
,
sat upon a little bank in the neighbourhood of the Occony
boats, awaiting the arrival of Cheochee and his party. And why
came they not? One after another of the several tribes had filled
their boats, and were either on the river or across it. But two
clusters of canoes yet remained, and they were those of the rival
tribesa green bird flaunted over the one, and a brown viper, in
many folds, was twined about the pole of the other.
There was sufficient reason why they came not. The strife
had begun;for, when, gathering his thirteen warriors in a little
hollow at the termination of the valley through which they came,
Nagoochie beheld the slow and painful approach of the two
stragglers
upon whom the Occonies had so practisedwhen he saw
the green bird, the beautiful emblem of his tribe, disfigured and
defiledthere was no longer any measure or method in his
madness
.
There was no longer a thought of Jocasse to keep him
back; and the feeling of ferocious indignation which filled his
bosom was the common feeling with his brother warriors. They
lay in wait for the coming of the Occonies, down at the foot of
the Yellow Hill, where the woods gathered green and thick.
They were fewbut half in number of their enemiesbut they
were strong in ardour, strong in justice, and even death was
preferable
to a longer endurance of that dishonour to which they had
already been too long subjected. They beheld the approach of
the Brown Vipers, as, one by one, they wound out from the gap
of the mountain, with a fierce satisfaction. The two parties were
now in sight of each other, and could not mistake the terms of
their encounter. No word was spoken between them, but each
began the scalp-song of his tribe, preparing at the same time his
weapon, and advancing to the struggle.
`The green bird has a bill,' sang the Estatoees; `and he
flies like an arrow to his prey.'
`The brown viper has poison and a fang,' responded the
Occonies
;
`and he lies under the bush for his enemy.'
`Give me to clutch the war-tuft,' cried the leaders of each
party, almost in the same breath.
`To taste the blood,' cried another.
`And make my knife laugh in the heart that shrinks,' sung
another and another.
`I will put my foot on the heart,' cried an Occony.
`I tear away the scalp,' shouted an Estato, in reply; while
a joint chorus from the two parties, promised
`A dog that runs, to the black spirit that keeps in the dark.'
`
Echa-herro, echa-herro, echa-herro,
' was the grand cry, or
fearful warwhoop, which announced the moment of onset and the
beginning of the strife.
The Occonies were not backward, though the affair was
commenced by the Estatoees. Cheochee, their leader, was quite
as brave as malignant, and now exulted in the near prospect of
that sweet revenge, for all the supposed wrongs and more certain
rivalries which his tribe had suffered from the Green Birds. Nor
was this more the feeling with him than with his tribe. Disposing
themselves, therefore, in readiness to receive the assault, they
rejoiced
in the coming of a strife, in which, having many injuries
to redress, they had the advantages, at the same time, of position
and numbers.
But their fighting at disadvantage was not now a thought with
the Little Estatoees. Their blood was up, and like all usually
patient people, once aroused, they were not so readily quieted.
Nagoochie, the warrior now, and no longer the lover, led on the
attack. You should have seen how that brave young chief went
into battlehow he leapt up in air, slapped his hands upon his
thighs in token of contempt for his foe, and throwing himself open
before his enemies, dashed down his bow and arrows, and waving
his hatchet, signified to them his desire for the conflict,
l'outrance,
and, which would certainly make it so, hand to hand. The
Occonies
took him at his word, and throwing aside the long bow, they
bounded out from their cover to meet their adversaries. Then
should you have seen that meetingthat first rushhow they
threw the tomahawkhow they flourished the knifehow the
brave man rushed to the fierce embrace of his strong enemyand
how the two rolled along the hill in the teeth-binding struggle of
death.
The tomahawk of Nagoochie had wings and a tooth. It flew
and bit in every direction. One after another, the Occonies went
down before it, and still his fierce war cry of `
Echa-mal-Occony,
'
preceding every stroke, announced another and another victim.
They sank away from him like sheep before the wolf that is
hungry, and the disparity of force was not so great in favour of
the Occonies, when we recollect that Nagoochie was against them.
The parties, under his fierce valour, were soon almost equal in
number, and something more was necessary to be done by the
Occonies before they could hope for that favourable result from
the struggle which they had before looked upon as certain. It
was for Cheochee now to seek out and to encounter the gallant
young chief of Estato. Nagoochie, hitherto, for reasons best
known to himself, had studiously avoided the leader of the
Vipers
;
but he could no longer do so. He was contending, in
close strife, with Okonettee, or the One-Eyeda stout warrior of
the Vipersas Cheochee approached him. In the next moment,
the hatchet of Nagoochie entered the skull of Okonettee. The
One-Eyed sunk to the ground, as if in supplication, and, seizing
the legs of his conqueror, in spite of the repeated blows which
descended from the deadly instrument, each of which was a death,
while his head swam, and the blood filled his eyes, and his senses
were fast fleeting, he held on with a death-grasp which nothing
could compel him to forego. In this predicament, Cheochee
confronted
the young brave of Estato. The strife was short, for
though Nagoochie fought as bravely as ever, yet he struck in
vain, while the dying wretch, grappling his legs, disordered,
by his convulsions, not less than by his efforts, every blow which
the strong hand of Nagoochie sought to give. One arm was
already
disabled, and still the dying wretch held on to his legs. In
another moment, the One-Eyed was seized by the last spasms of
death, and in his struggles, he dragged the Estato chief to his
knees. This was the fatal disadvantage. Before any of the
Green Bird warriors could come to his succour, the blow was
given, and Nagoochie lay under the knee of the Brown Viper.
The knife was in his heart, and the life not yet gone, when the
same instrument encircled his head, and his swimming vision
could behold his own scalp waving in the grasp of his conqueror.
The gallant spirit of Nagoochie passed away in a vain effort to
utter his song of deaththe song of a brave warrior conscious of
many victories.
Jocasse looked up to the hills when she heard the fierce cry
of the descending Vipers. Their joy was madness, for they had
fought withthey had slain, the bravest of their enemies. The
intoxication of tone which Cheochee exhibited, when he told the
story of the strife, and announced his victory, went like a
death-stroke
to the heart of the maiden. But she said not a wordshe
uttered no complaintshe shed no tear. Gliding quietly into
the boat in which they were about to cross the river, she sat silent,
gazing, with the fixedness of a marble statue, upon the still
dripping
scalp of her lover, as it dangled about the neck of his
conqueror
.
On a sudden, just as they had reached the middle of the
stream, she started, and her gaze was turned once more backward
upon the banks they had left, as if, on a sudden, some object of
interest had met her sight,then, whether by accident or design,
with look still intent in the same direction, she fell over the side,
before they could save or prevent her, and was buried in the deep
waters of Sarratay for ever. She rose not once to the surface.
The stream, from that moment, lost the name of Sarratay, and
both whites and Indians, to this day, know it only as the river of
Jocasse. The girls of Cherokee, however, contend that she did
not sink, but walking `the waters like a thing of life,' that she
rejoined Nagoochie, whom she saw beckoning to her from the
shore. Nor is this the only tradition. The story goes on to
describe a beautiful lodge, one of the most select in the valleys of
Manneyto, the hunter of which is Nagoochie of the Green Bird,
while the maiden who dresses his venison is certainly known as
Jocasse.